


Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft





















JPMorgan High Yield Fund - A - J.P. Morgan Asset Management






For the best experience on this page, please enable JavaScript in your browser.
Need to know how to enable it? Go here.









CLOSE



My Collections


My ProfileContact Us



Skip to main content













Input search bar



JPMorgan High Yield Fund(OHYAX)A CIR2R5R6  Compare Funds 

Hypothetical Tool 




OverviewKey PointsPerformanceCommentaryFees & MinimumsPortfolioManagementDocuments 



	As of April 3, 2017, this fund's Select share class has been renamed to I. Please see the prospectus for more details.
 








	JPMORGAN HIGH YIELD FUND

Income potential with high yield.

Driven by macro insights and bottom-up fundamental credit research, the High Yield Fund aims to deliver greater income and return potential than core bond holdings, with lower risk than stocks.
Commentary  











Overview widget loading ...







Key Points

Expertise


		Experienced management team has worked together through multiple market cycles over 28 years, including three recessions.

Portfolio


		Combines bottom-up analysis with top-down insight to actively manage credit profile against market risk.

Success


		Consistently delivered lower volatility vs. its benchmark over the long term.

		Top-quartile performance 89% of the time vs. Morningstar High Yield Category over rolling 10-year periods.1





	ROLLING 10-YEAR PERCENTILE RETURN RANKING


 



1For I Shares; High-yield bond category; Bloomberg Barclays U.S. Corporate High Yield-2% Issuer Capped Index. Rolling 10-year periods since fund inception (11/13/1998), as of 3/31/17. Ranked as follows: 1-yr. (332/697), 3-yrs. (229/596), 5-yrs. (191/471) and 10-yrs. (78/318).

Chart source: Morningstar; as of 3/31/17. Shown for illustrative purposes only; calculated using monthly returns since 12/1/08 – 3/31/17. Past performance is no guarantee of future results.





Performance
Performance widget loading ...



Commentary

As of June 30, 2017 

	Quarter in review


		The JPMorgan High Yield Fund (I Class Shares) underperformed the benchmark, the Bloomberg Barclays U.S. Corporate High Yield - 2% Issuer Capped Index, for the quarter ended June 30, 2017.

		The Fund’s security selection within energy has hurt performance. We have consciously chosen to be overweight in a select few higher-volatility names that have traded off amid the recent moves in oil. We see these names as capable of surviving in a lower-for-longer oil environment despite their sensitivity to short-term oil price moves.

		BB-rated credit outperformed, reversing the trend of higher quality underperforming the market seen in 2016 and the first quarter. Our underweight positioning in higher-quality credit hurt performance.

		The Fund’s security selection in the industrial other, avoiding an issuer that went bankrupt, was positive for performance.

		Also adding to performance were market-beating returns in several pharmaceutical names we had viewed as undervalued.


	Looking ahead


		High-yield bonds have been on a remarkable run over the past 16 months, providing investors more than 2.5 times coupon returns over the bull market, driven by the global search for yield, stable economic and credit fundamentals, and increasingly positive views on commodities sectors.

		Volatility in individual sectors (energy and retail) will likely present opportunities to position opportunistically, and we see high yield as an extended sector that can continue to provide diversification and yield to a variety of portfolios.






Fees and Minimums
Fees widget loading ...


Portfolio
Portfolio widget loading ...							
							


Management
Fund Managers 












 William J.  Morgan Portfolio Manager







 James P.  Shanahan JrPortfolio Manager

Load More 



Documents 
Fund Literature

 

Fact Sheet: High Yield (A)




Fund Story: High Yield Fund


Presentation: High Yield Fund






Load More 


 
Supplemental Information

 

Leveraged Credit Mutual Fund Commentary 6/30/2017




Uncertified Portfolio Holdings - High Yield Fund


Product Guide

Building stronger fixed income portfolios



Supplemental Data Sheet - High Yield Fund




Quarterly Certified Holdings - JPMorgan High Yield Fund




Sales Charge / Dealer Concession Schedule




2016 JPMorgan Funds Capital Gains Distribution




Additional Information







Load More 



 
Regulatory Documents

 

Summary Prospectus




Prospectus




Annual Report




Semi Annual Report




Statement of Additional Information







Load More 





Disclaimer1Please refer to the prospectus for additional information about cut-off times. Total return assumes reinvestment of income. The Fund's adviser and/or its affiliates have contractually agreed to waive fees and/or reimburse expenses to the extent Total Annual Fund Operating Expenses (excluding acquired fund fees and expenses, dividend and interest expenses related to short sales, interest, taxes, expenses related to litigation and potential litigation and extraordinary expenses) exceed 1.00% for A Shares, 1.50% for C Shares, 0.75% for I Shares, 1.35% for R2 Shares, 0.70% for R5 Shares and 0.60% for R6 Shares of the average daily net assets. The Fund may invest in one or more money market funds advised by the adviser or its affiliates (affiliated money market funds). The Fund's adviser has contractually agreed to waive fees and/or reimburse expenses in an amount sufficient to offset the fees and expenses of the affiliated money market funds incurred by the Fund because of the Fund's investment in such money market funds. This waiver is in effect through 10/31/2018 for A Shares, 10/31/2018 for C Shares, 10/31/2018 for I Shares, 10/31/2018 for R2 Shares, 10/31/2018 for R5 Shares and 10/31/2018 for R6 Shares, at which time the adviser and/or its affiliates will determine whether to renew or revise it. The difference between net and gross fees includes all applicable fee waivers and expense reimbursements. The quoted performance of the Fund includes performance of a predecessor fund/share class prior to the Fund's commencement of operations. Please refer to the current prospectus for further information.  Mutual funds have fees that reduce their performance: indexes do not. You cannot invest directly in an index. The Bloomberg Barclays U.S. Corporate High Yield - 2% Issuer Capped Index is comprised of fixed rate, non-investment grade debt securities that are dollar denominated and non-convertible. The index limits the maximum exposure to any one issuer to 2%. The performance of the Lipper High Yield Bond Index includes expenses associated with a mutual fund, such as investment management fees. These expenses are not identical to the expenses charged by the Fund. Total return figures (for the fund and any index quoted) assume payment of fees and reinvestment of dividends (after the highest applicable foreign withholding tax) and distributions. Without fee waivers, fund returns would have been lower. Due to rounding, some values may not total 100%. Â©2017, American Bankers Association, CUSIP Database provided by the Standard & Poor's CUSIP Service Bureau, a division of The McGraw-Hill Companies, Inc. All rights reserved.The Morningstar RatingTM for funds, or "star rating", is calculated for managed products (including mutual funds, variable annuity and variable life subaccounts, exchange-traded funds, closed-end funds, and separate accounts) with at least a three-year history. Exchange traded funds and open-ended mutual funds are considered a single population for comparative purposes. It is calculated based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation in a managed product's monthly excess performance, placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent performance. The top 10% of products in each product category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star. The Overall Morningstar Rating for a managed product is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with its three-, five-, and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating metrics. The weights are: 100% three-year rating for 36-59 months of total returns, 60% five-year rating/40% three-year rating for 60-119 months of total returns, and 50% 10- year rating/30% five-year rating/20% three-year rating for 120 or more months of total returns. While the 10-year overall star rating formula seems to give the most weight to the 10-year period, the most recent three-year period actually has the greatest impact because it is included in all three rating periods.Rankings do not take sales loads into account.The following risks could cause the fund to lose money or perform more poorly than other investments. For more complete risk information, see the prospectus. Investments in bonds and other debt securities will change in value based on changes in interest rates. If rates rise, the value of these investments generally drops. Securities rated below investment grade are considered "high-yield," "non-investment grade," "below investment-grade," or "junk bonds." They generally are rated in the fifth or lower rating categories of Standard & Poor's and Moody's Investors Service. Although they can provide higher yields than higher rated securities, they can carry greater risk. Investments in derivatives may be riskier than other types of investments. They may be more sensitive to changes in economic or market conditions than other types of investments. Many derivatives create leverage, which could lead to greater volatility and losses that significantly exceed the original investment.Total return assumes reinvestment of income. The top 10 holdings listed reflect only the Fund's long-term investments. Short-term investments are excluded. Holdings are subject to change. The holdings listed should not be considered recommendations to purchase or sell a particular security. Each individual security is calculated as a percentage of the aggregate market value of the securities held in the Fund and does not include the use of derivative positions, where applicable. The rate of return anticipated on a bond if it is held until the maturity date.  Duration: Measures price sensitivity of fixed income securities to interest rate changes. Average Life: The length of time the principal of a debt issue is expected to be outstanding.
















Fixed Income - J.P. Morgan Asset Management






For the best experience on this page, please enable JavaScript in your browser.
Need to know how to enable it? Go here.









CLOSE



My Collections


My ProfileContact Us



Skip to main content













Input search bar




				Fixed Income
			




Build stronger fixed income portfolios

	We have built and innovated our fixed income capabilities with just one aim: build stronger portfolios to solve our clients’ needs. Today we are one of the top fixed income managers in the world.
Download the framework


Diverse perspectives, integrated solutions 

Research Driven
Access the power of a globally integrated team of investment professionals and our proprietary research, encompassing fundamental, quantitative and technical analysis.


Actionable Insights
Benefit from actionable insights designed to help you invest with conviction, from our regular macro and market views, to our fixed income portfolio construction tools.
 

Outcome Oriented
Choose from a wide variety of outcome-oriented solutions designed to address all your fixed income needs.


Demonstrated Results
Tap into the proven success of one of the world’s largest fixed income managers, with broad experience gained across regions and market cycles.



Featured Fixed Income Funds


 


“Rather than try to outguess the market, investors should seek to craft an all-weather bond portfolio, one that delivers the benefits of fixed income in a variety of scenarios.”
PRISCILLA HANCOCK, GLOBAL FIXED INCOME STRATEGIST 






BUILDING STRONGER FIXED INCOME PORTFOLIOS


Download the framework >






Fixed income funds
                         


View All Taxable Fixed Income Funds   
View All Tax Exempt Fixed Income Funds  




Other Asset Classes
                         


Equity Funds  
Multi-Asset Solutions  
Alternatives Funds  
Money Market Funds  






Investments in bonds and other debt securities will change in value based on changes in interest rates. If rates rise, the value of these investments generally drops.
 
Diversification does not guarantee investment returns and does not eliminate the risk of loss. Diversification among investment options and asset classes may help to reduce overall volatility.

















Guide to the Markets - J.P. Morgan Asset Management






For the best experience on this page, please enable JavaScript in your browser.
Need to know how to enable it? Go here.









CLOSE



My Collections


My ProfileContact Us



Skip to main content













Input search bar




				Guide to the Markets
			



Guide to the Markets
                         


	The Guide illustrates a comprehensive array of market and economic histories, trends and statistics through clear, compelling charts and graphs you can share with your clients.


LAUNCH THE VIEWER


Download the 3Q 2017 Guide to the Markets






Economic & Market Update
Watch Dr. David Kelly’s quarterly presentation using slides from the Guide to the Markets.Continue reading  


On the Bench
Need more Guide to the Markets? Access an additional collection of Guide to the Markets slides, updated on a quarterly basis.Continue reading  


Investing Principles
The Principles for successful long-term investing presentation uses select slides from the Guide to the Markets to explain seven key investment principles that financial professionals can use with their clients. Continue reading  


 Introducing the Guide to the Markets for the third quarter of 2017July 3, 2017Dr. David Kelly, Chief Global Strategist, J.P. Morgan Funds, previews this quarter's themes and invites you to subscribe to the Guide to the Markets. 


 

Quarterly Perspectives





                            Often referred to as the 'guide to the Guide', Quarterly Perspectives provides insightful stories and quarterly themes using slides from the Guide to the Markets. 
                            
View Quarterly Perspectives



Portfolio Discussions





                            Focusing on different asset classes or regions, Portfolio Discussions help to frame investment conversations using slides from Guide to the Markets. 
                            

View Portfolio Discussions





Insights

					Market Insights

					Portfolio Insights

					Retirement Insights


The J. P. Morgan Insights app 

A new way for financial advisors to access and customize J.P. Morgan intellectual capital
                         

                            Get the Insights app:
                            


           
              



Learn more about the Insights App











Past performance is no guarantee of future results. Diversification does not guarantee investment returns and does not eliminate the risk of loss.
Bonds are subject to interest rate risks. Bond prices generally fall when interest rates rise.
The price of equity securities may rise or fall because of changes in the broad market or changes in a company's financial condition, sometimes rapidly or unpredictably. Equity securities are subject to "stock market risk" meaning that stock prices in general may decline over short or extended periods of time.
International investing involves a greater degree of risk and increased volatility. Changes in currency exchange rates and differences in accounting and taxation policies outside the U.S. can raise or lower returns. Also, some overseas markets may not be as politically and economically stable as the United States and other nations. Investments in emerging markets can be more volatile.
Real estate investments may be subject to a higher degree of market risk because of concentration in a specific industry, sector or geographical sector. Real estate investments may be subject to risks including, but not limited to, declines in the value of real estate, risks related to general and economic conditions, changes in the value of the underlying property owned by the trust and defaults by borrower.
Investments in commodities may have greater volatility than investments in traditional securities, particularly if the instruments involve leverage. The value of commodity-linked derivative instruments may be affected by changes in overall market movements, commodity index volatility, changes in interest rates, or factors affecting a particular industry or commodity, such as drought, floods, weather, livestock disease, embargoes, tariffs and international economic, political and regulatory developments. Use of leveraged commodity-linked derivatives creates an opportunity for increased return but, at the same time, creates the possibility for greater loss. 
Derivatives may be riskier than other types of investments because they may be more sensitive to changes in economic or market conditions than other types of investments and could result in losses that significantly exceed the original investment. The use of derivatives may not be successful, resulting in investment losses, and the cost of such strategies may reduce investment returns.
There is no guarantee that the use of long and short positions will succeed in limiting an investor's exposure to domestic stock market movements, capitalization, sector swings or other risk factors. Investing using long and short selling strategies may have higher portfolio turnover rates. Short selling involves certain risks, including additional costs associated with covering short positions and a possibility of unlimited loss on certain short sale positions.
JPMorgan Chase & Co. and its affiliates do not provide tax advice. Accordingly, any discussion of U.S. tax matters contained herein (including any attachments) is not intended or written to be used, and cannot be used, in connection with the promotion, marketing or recommendation by anyone unaffiliated with JPMorgan Chase & Co. of any of the matters addressed herein or for the purpose of avoiding U.S. tax-related penalties. 


















Products - J.P. Morgan Asset Management






For the best experience on this page, please enable JavaScript in your browser.
Need to know how to enable it? Go here.









CLOSE



My Collections


My ProfileContact Us



Skip to main content













Input search bar




				Products
			
Email ThisPrint


Investment Strategies

Providing clients with strategies and expertise that span the full spectrum of asset classes
                         


	As a global leader in asset management with assets under management of $1.7 trillion*, J.P. Morgan Asset Management provides more than 220 investment strategies spanning all major asset classes, investment styles and geographic regions.

	Investing with J.P. Morgan:


		a large global organization made up of small local teams

		a research-driven information advantage

		an unrelenting focus on risk management


* As of December 2015









Featured Funds
                         


Equity  
Fixed Income   
Multi-Asset Solutions   
Alternatives  
SmartRetirement Target Date Funds   
Exchange Traded Funds  
Money Market Funds  






		 





Product Spotlight


U.S. Equity


International & Global Equity


Fixed Income


Multi-Asset Solutions


Alternatives


ETFs


Money Market



U.S. Equity




U.S. Equity


International & Global Equity


Fixed Income


Multi-Asset Solutions


Alternatives


ETFs


Money Market























Insights

					Market Insights

					Portfolio Insights

					Retirement Insights
















Principle #1: Plan on Living a Long Time - J.P. Morgan Asset Management






For the best experience on this page, please enable JavaScript in your browser.
Need to know how to enable it? Go here.









CLOSE



My Collections


My ProfileContact Us



Skip to main content













Input search bar








PRINCIPLE #1: PLAN ON LIVING A LONG TIME

DON’T LET YOUR CLIENTS' MONEY RUN OUT

Your clients are living longer, and many of them haven't saved enough. Use our Principles for Successful Long-Term Investing to talk to them about this reality, and to help them be prepared.
ACCESS ALL 7 PRINCIPLES







 














We are living longer

Thanks to advances in medicine and healthier lifestyles, people who are 65 today have a very good chance of reaching ages 80 or 90. A 65-year-old couple might be surprised to learn that at least one of them has a 48% probability of living another 25 years and needing investments to last until age 90.

	 

Many of us have not saved enough

Studies reveal that individuals do not feel adequately prepared for retirement. Investors should start early by saving more, investing with discipline and having a plan for their future.

	 

	 

Explore More Principles

Learn more about successful long-term investing
   NEXT PRINCIPLE   >   






4 STRATEGIES FOR LONG-TERM INVESTORS

We offer investment strategies covering all asset classes for diversification and risk management to help you and your clients build stronger portfolios.
ACCESS 4 HIGH CONVICTION FUNDS



Diversification does not guarantee investment returns and does not eliminate the risk of loss. Diversification among investment options and asset classes may help to reduce overall volatility.






WisdomTree Rising Rates ETFs









































































The low interest rates of the past several years may be on the cusp of a directional shift. As many prepare for a rising-rate environment, WisdomTree's ETFs may help investors reduce exposure to interest rate risk while preserving coverage and income potential: WisdomTree Barclays Interest Rate Hedged U.S. Aggregate Bond Fund (AGZD), WisdomTree Barclays Negative Duration U.S. Aggregate Bond Fund (AGND), WisdomTree Interest Rate Hedged High Yield Bond Fund (HYZD). WisdomTree Negative Duration High Yield Bond Fund (HYND), WisdomTree Bloomberg Floating Rate Treasury Fund (USFR).


















































Highlighted fields are required to register.


Account Type:






                                                    Individual Investor
                                                    
                                                    Financial Professional 
















Email:






Company Name:



First Name:



Last Name:



Password:



Confirm Password:



Country:

United States
                                                    
                                                    


State:

Select State:
                                                    
                                                    Alabama
                                                    
                                                    Alaska
                                                    
                                                    Arizona
                                                    
                                                    Arkansas
                                                    
                                                    California
                                                    
                                                    Colorado
                                                    
                                                    Connecticut
                                                    
                                                    Delaware
                                                    
                                                    District of Columbia
                                                    
                                                    Florida
                                                    
                                                    Georgia
                                                    
                                                    Hawaii
                                                    
                                                    Idaho
                                                    
                                                    Illinois
                                                    
                                                    Indiana
                                                    
                                                    Iowa
                                                    
                                                    Kansas
                                                    
                                                    Kentucky
                                                    
                                                    Louisiana
                                                    
                                                    Maine
                                                    
                                                    Maryland
                                                    
                                                    Massachusetts
                                                    
                                                    Michigan
                                                    
                                                    Minnesota
                                                    
                                                    Mississippi
                                                    
                                                    Missouri
                                                    
                                                    Montana
                                                    
                                                    Nebraska
                                                    
                                                    Nevada
                                                    
                                                    New Hampshire
                                                    
                                                    New Jersey
                                                    
                                                    New Mexico
                                                    
                                                    New York
                                                    
                                                    North Carolina
                                                    
                                                    North Dakota
                                                    
                                                    Ohio
                                                    
                                                    Oklahoma
                                                    
                                                    Oregon
                                                    
                                                    Pennsylvania
                                                    
                                                    Rhode Island
                                                    
                                                    South Carolina
                                                    
                                                    South Dakota
                                                    
                                                    Tennessee
                                                    
                                                    Texas
                                                    
                                                    Utah
                                                    
                                                    Vermont
                                                    
                                                    Virginia
                                                    
                                                    Washington
                                                    
                                                    West Virginia
                                                    
                                                    Wisconsin
                                                    
                                                    Wyoming
                                                    
                                                    Other
                                                    
                                                    



By submitting below you certify that you have read and agree to our privacy policy.














                                                    Already Registered? Access the Case for
                                                    AGZD,
                                                    
                                                    AGND,
                                                    HYND and
                                                    HYZD



































                                    You cannot invest directly in an Index.

This information must be preceded or accompanied by a prospectus, click here to view or download prospectus. We advise you to consider the fund's objectives, risks, charges and expenses carefully before investing. The prospectus contains this and other important information about the fund. Please read the prospectus carefully before you invest.

                                    There are risks associated with investing, including possible loss of principal. Fixed income investments are subject to interest rate risk; their value will normally decline as interest rates rise. The Fund seeks to mitigate interest rate risk by taking short positions in U.S. Treasuries, but there is no guarantee this will be achieved. Derivative investments can be volatile and these investments may be less liquid than other securities, and more sensitive to the effects of varied economic conditions.

                                    Fixed income investments are also subject to credit risk, the risk that the issuer of a bond will fail to pay interest and principal in a timely manner, or that negative perceptions of the issuer's ability to make such payments will cause the price of that bond to decline. The Funds may engage in “short sale” transactions of U.S. Treasuries where losses may be exaggerated, potentially losing more money than the actual cost of the investment and the third party to the short sale may fail to honor its contract terms, causing a loss to the Funds. While the Funds attempt to limit credit and counterparty exposure, the value of an investment in the Funds may change quickly and without warning in response to issuer or counterparty defaults and changes in the credit ratings of the Funds’ portfolio investments. Investing in mortgage- and asset-backed securities involves interest rate, credit, valuation, extension and liquidity risks and the risk that payments on the underlying assets are delayed, prepaid, subordinated or defaulted on. 

                                    Securities with floating rates can be less sensitive to interest rate changes than securities with fixed interest rates, but may decline in value. The issuance of floating rate notes by the U.S. Treasury is new and the amount of supply will be limited.  Fixed income securities will normally decline in value as interest rates rise.  The value of an investment in the Fund may change quickly and without warning in response to issuer or counterparty defaults and changes in the credit ratings of the Fund’s portfolio investments. Due to the investment strategy of certain Funds’ they may make higher capital gain distributions than other ETFs. Please read the Funds’ prospectus for specific details regarding the Funds’ risk profile.






WisdomTree Funds are distributed by Foreside Fund Services, LLC, in the U.S. only. Foreside Fund Services is not affiliated with the other entities mentioned.

 





































Blog | WisdomTree



























                Menu 
                









WisdomTree ETFs                                                    







 



                                            All ETFs
                




 



                                            Equity ETFs
                




 



                                            Fixed Income ETFs
                




 



                                            Alternative ETFs
                




 



                                            Currency ETFs
                




 



                                            All Indexes
                














Strategies                                                    







 



                                            Smart Beta
                




 



                                            Rising Rates Solutions
                




 



                                            Currency Hedging
                




 



                                            Quality Dividend Growth
                




 



                                            Fixed Income Solutions
                




 



                                            Emerging Markets
                














Resource Library                                                    







 



                                            WisdomTree Resources
                




 



                                            Prospectus & Regulatory
                




 



                                            Fact Sheets & Reports
                














Investor Community                                                    







 



                                            Financial Advisors
                




 



                                            Institutional Accounts
                














Blog                                                    







 



                                            All Blogs
                




 



                                            ETF Education
                




 



                                            Emerging Markets
                




 



                                            Interest Rate Strategies
                
















                                    About
                                












                                            Who we are
                                        









                                            Contact Us
                                        









                                            Press Room
                                        









                                            Careers
                                        














                                                    Investor Relations
                                                













                                                    Contact Us
                                                













                                                International Sites 
                                            












Canada                                                    









Switzerland                                                    









Germany                                                    









Finland                                                    









France                                                    









United Kingdom                                                    









Ireland                                                    









Italy                                                    









Japan                                                    









Luxembourg                                                    









Netherlands                                                    









Norway                                                    









Sweden                                                    









United States















                                                        Sign In / Register
                                                
























 BACK 
                


















About




Who we are


Contact Us


Press Room


Careers





Investor Relations 

Contact Us 




USA






CAN





CHE





DEU





FIN





FRA





GBR





IRL





ITA





JPN





LUX





NLD





NOR





SWE










Get access to exclusive content, industry insights, and more:
SIGN IN/REGISTER

















                                            WisdomTree ETFs
                                        







                            All ETFs
                        



                            Equity ETFs
                        



                            Fixed Income ETFs
                        



                            Alternative ETFs
                        



                            Currency ETFs
                        



                            All Indexes
                        







                                    Domestic Dividends
                                



                                    Domestic Earnings
                                



                                    Multifactor
                                



                                    Developed World ex-U.S.
                                



                                    Global/Global ex-U.S.
                                



                                    Emerging/Frontier Markets
                                



                                    Currency Hedged Equity
                                





                                    Strategic Core
                                



                                    Fundamental
                                



                                    International
                                



                                    Interest Rate Strategies
                                




DYLS
WisdomTree Dynamic Long/Short U.S. Equity Fund


DYB
WisdomTree Dynamic Bearish U.S. Equity Fund


WDTI
WisdomTree Managed Futures Strategy 


PUTW
WisdomTree CBOE S&P 500 PutWrite Strategy Fund


RRF
Global Real Return


GCC
WisdomTree Continuous Commodity Index Fund





                                    Domestic
                                



                                    Emerging Markets
                                






DTD
WisdomTree U.S. Total Dividend Fund


DLN
WisdomTree U.S. LargeCap Dividend Fund


DON
WisdomTree U.S. MidCap Dividend Fund


DES
WisdomTree U.S. SmallCap Dividend Fund


DHS
WisdomTree U.S. High Dividend Fund


DTN
WisdomTree U.S. Dividend ex-Financials Fund


DGRW
WisdomTree U.S. Quality Dividend Growth Fund


DGRS
WisdomTree U.S. SmallCap Quality Dividend Growth Fund




EXT
WisdomTree U.S. Total Earnings Fund


EPS
WisdomTree U.S. Earnings 500 Fund


EZM
WisdomTree U.S. MidCap Earnings Fund


EES
WisdomTree U.S. SmallCap Earnings Fund


EZY
WisdomTree U.S. LargeCap Value Fund


WUSA
WisdomTree U.S. Domestic Economy Fund


WEXP
WisdomTree U.S. Export and Multinational Fund




USMF
WisdomTree U.S. Multifactor Fund




DWM
WisdomTree International Equity Fund


DOL
WisdomTree International LargeCap Dividend Fund


DIM
WisdomTree International MidCap Dividend  Fund


DLS
WisdomTree International SmallCap Dividend Fund


DTH
WisdomTree International High Dividend Fund


DOO
WisdomTree International Dividend ex-Financials Fund


IQDG
WisdomTree International Quality Dividend Growth Fund


EUDG
WisdomTree Europe Quality Dividend Growth Fund


EDOM
WisdomTree Europe Domestic Economy Fund


DFE
WisdomTree Europe SmallCap Dividend Fund


DFJ
WisdomTree Japan SmallCap Dividend Fund


AUSE
WisdomTree Australia Dividend Fund




DEW
WisdomTree Global High Dividend Fund


DNL
WisdomTree Global ex‐U.S. Quality Dividend Growth Fund


GSD
WisdomTree Global SmallCap Dividend Fund


DRW
WisdomTree Global ex-U.S. Real Estate Fund


AXJL
WisdomTree Asia Pacific ex-Japan Fund


XMX
WisdomTree Global ex-Mexico Equity Fund




DVEM
WisdomTree Emerging Markets Dividend Fund


DEM
WisdomTree Emerging Markets High Dividend Fund


DGS
WisdomTree Emerging Markets SmallCap Dividend Fund


DGRE
WisdomTree Emerging Markets Quality Dividend Growth Fund


EMCG
WisdomTree Emerging Markets Consumer Growth Fund


EMSD
WisdomTree Strong Dollar Emerging Markets Equity Fund


EPI
WisdomTree India Earnings Fund


XSOE
WisdomTree Emerging Markets ex-State-Owned Enterprises Fund


CXSE
WisdomTree China ex-State-Owned Enterprises Fund


GULF
WisdomTree Middle East Dividend Fund




HEDJ
WisdomTree Europe Hedged Equity Fund


EUSC
WisdomTree Europe Hedged SmallCap Equity Fund


DXGE
WisdomTree Germany Hedged Equity Fund


DXUS
WisdomTree Global ex-U.S. Hedged Dividend Fund


IHDG
WisdomTree International Hedged Quality Dividend Growth Fund


HGSD
WisdomTree Global Hedged SmallCap Dividend Fund


DXPS
WisdomTree United Kingdom Hedged Equity Fund


HDRW
WisdomTree Global ex-U.S. Hedged Real Estate Fund


DXJ
WisdomTree Japan Hedged Equity Fund


JHDG
WisdomTree Japan Hedged Quality Dividend Growth Fund


DXJS
WisdomTree Japan Hedged SmallCap Equity Fund


DXJF
WisdomTree Japan Hedged Financials Fund


DXJR
WisdomTree Japan Hedged Real Estate Fund


DXJC
WisdomTree Japan Hedged Capital Goods Fund


DXJH
WisdomTree Japan Hedged Health Care Fund


DDWM
WisdomTree Dynamic Currency Hedged International Equity Fund


DHDG
WisdomTree Dynamic Currency Hedged International Quality Dividend Growth Fund


DDLS
WisdomTree Dynamic Currency Hedged International SmallCap Equity Fund


DDEZ
WisdomTree Dynamic Currency Hedged Europe Equity Fund


DDJP
WisdomTree Dynamic Currency Hedged Japan Equity Fund




CRDT
WisdomTree Strategic Corporate Bond Fund


UBND
WisdomTree Western Asset Unconstrained Bond Fund


AGGY
WisdomTree Barclays Yield Enhanced U.S. Aggregate Bond Fund


SHAG
WisdomTree Barclays Yield Enhanced U.S. Short-Term Aggregate Bond Fund




WFIG
WisdomTree Fundamental U.S. Corporate Bond Fund


SFIG
WisdomTree Fundamental U.S. Short-Term Corporate Bond Fund


WFHY
WisdomTree Fundamental U.S. High Yield Corporate Bond Fund


SFHY
WisdomTree Fundamental U.S. Short-Term High Yield Corporate Bond Fund




EMCB
WisdomTree Emerging Markets Corporate Bond Fund


ELD
WisdomTree Emerging Markets Local Debt Fund


ALD
WisdomTree Asia Local Debt Fund




AGZD
WisdomTree Barclays Interest Rate Hedged U.S. Aggregate Bond Fund


AGND
WisdomTree Barclays Negative Duration U.S. Aggregate Bond Fund


HYZD
WisdomTree Interest Rate Hedged High Yield Bond Fund


HYND
WisdomTree Negative Duration High Yield Bond Fund


USFR
WisdomTree Bloomberg Floating Rate Treasury Fund




USDU
WisdomTree Bloomberg U.S. Dollar Bullish Fund




CYB
WisdomTree Chinese Yuan Strategy Fund


BZF
WisdomTree Brazilian Real Strategy Fund


CEW
WisdomTree Emerging Currency Strategy Fund












                                            STRATEGIES
                                        



Smart Beta
Rising Rates Solutions
Currency Hedging
Quality Dividend Growth
Fixed Income Solutions
Emerging Markets






                                            RESOURCE LIBRARY
                                        



WisdomTree Resources
Prospectus & Regulatory
Fact Sheets & Reports






                                            INVESTOR COMMUNITY
                                        



Financial Advisors
Institutional Accounts






                                            BLOG
                                        



All Blogs
ETF Education
Emerging Markets
Interest Rate Strategies














My WisdomTree - Sign in
 










Remember me


SIGN IN


Forgot your password?








Not Registered? Register Now.
Individual investors who register can access daily blog posts, latest videos, podcasts and snapshots, and stay current with industry insights. On top of that, Financial Professionals get additional access to thoughtful research, smart analytics and unique economic commentary from Jeremy Siegel.
1. My Profile >2. Additional Information




 


Account Type


Individual Investor



 Financial Professional


































Select Country
Afghanistan
Åland Islands
Albania
Algeria
American Samoa
Andorra
Angola
Anguilla
Antarctica
Antigua and Barbuda
Argentina
Armenia
Aruba
Australia
Austria
Azerbaijan
Bahamas
Bahrain
Bangladesh
Barbados
Belarus
Belgium
Belize
Benin
Bermuda
Bhutan
Bolivia
Bosnia and Herzegovina
Botswana
Bouvet Island
Brazil
British Indian Ocean Territory
Brunei Darussalam
Bulgaria
Burkina Faso
Burundi
Cambodia
Cameroon
Canada
Cape Verde
Cayman Islands
Central African Republic
Chad
Chile
China
Christmas Island
Cocos (Keeling) Islands
Colombia
Comoros
Congo
Congo, The Democratic Republic of the
Cook Islands
Costa Rica
Côte d'Ivoire
Croatia
Cuba
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Denmark
Djibouti
Dominica
Dominican Republic
Ecuador
Egypt
El Salvador
Equatorial Guinea
Eritrea
Estonia
Ethiopia
Falkland Islands (Malvinas)
Faroe Islands
Fiji
Finland
France
French Guiana
French Polynesia
French Southern Territories
Gabon
Gambia
Georgia
Germany
Ghana
Gibraltar
Greece
Greenland
Grenada
Guadeloupe
Guam
Guatemala
Guernsey
Guinea
Guinea-Bissau
Guyana
Haiti
Heard Island and McDonald Islands
Holy See (Vatican City State)
Honduras
Hong Kong
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Iran, Islamic Republic of
Iraq
Ireland
Isle of Man
Israel
Italy
Jamaica
Japan
Jersey
Jordan
Kazakhstan
Kenya
Kiribati
Kuwait
Kyrgyzstan
Laos People's Democratic Republic
Latvia
Lebanon
Lesotho
Liberia
Libyan Arab Jamahiriya
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Macau
Madagascar
Malawi
Malaysia
Maldives
Mali
Malta
Marshall Islands
Martinique
Mauritania
Mauritius
Mayotte
Mexico
Micronesia, Federated States of
Moldova
Monaco
Mongolia
Montenegro
Montserrat
Morocco
Mozambique
Myanmar
Namibia
Nauru
Nepal
Netherlands
Netherlands Antilles
New Caledonia
New Zealand
Nicaragua
Niger
Nigeria
Niue
Norfolk Island
Korea, Democratic People's Republic of
Northern Mariana Islands
Norway
Oman
Pakistan
Palau
Palestinian Territory, Occupied
Panama
Papua New Guinea
Paraguay
Peru
Philippines
Pitcairn Islands
Poland
Portugal
Puerto Rico
Qatar
Réunion
Romania
Russian Federation
Rwanda
Saint Barthélemy
Saint Helena
Saint Kitts and Nevis
Saint Lucia
Saint Martin
Saint Pierre and Miquelon
Saint Vincent and the Grenadines
Samoa
San Marino
Sao Tome and Principe
Saudi Arabia
Senegal
Serbia
Seychelles
Sierra Leone
Singapore
Slovakia
Slovenia
Solomon Islands
Somalia
South Africa
Korea, Republic of
Spain
Sri Lanka
Sudan
Suriname
Svalbard and Jan Mayen
Swaziland
Sweden
Switzerland
Syrian Arab Republic
Taiwan, Province of China
Tajikistan
Tanzania, United Republic of
Thailand
Timor-Leste
Togo
Tokelau
Tonga
Trinidad and Tobago
Tunisia
Turkey
Turkmenistan
Turks and Caicos Islands
Tuvalu
Uganda
Ukraine
United Arab Emirates
United Kingdom
United States
United States Minor Outlying Islands
Uruguay
Uzbekistan
Vanuatu
Venezuela
Vietnam
Virgin Islands, British
Virgin Islands, U.S.
Wallis and Futuna
Western Sahara
Yemen
Zambia
Zimbabwe




State
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming
Other





By submitting below you certify that you have read and agree to our privacy policy.









NEXT STEP










Home


Blog

 
THE WisdomTree BLOG
 






                                    POSTS
                                









                                    CONTRIBUTORS
                                









                                    ARCHIVE
                                














Kevin Flanagan 
									/ Fixed Income, U.S. Treasuries, Interest Rate Strategies, Income Strategies
 05/10/2017
								

Fixed Income Strategy: Staying on Course


Kevin Flanagan 



									When examining the appropriate course for fixed income strategies thus far in 2017, we appear to be staying on course. The overall premise for fixed income investing has essentially been playing out according to our base case: blending a strategic core approach with a complementary solution for the potential of higher rates later in the year.
								

SEE MORE







Bradley Krom 
									/ Interest Rate Strategies
 03/23/2017
								

Playing Better Defense with Rate-Hedged High-Yield Bonds


Bradley Krom 



With global economic activity accelerating, a commonsense trade has been to be over-weight high-yield debt as the outlook for risky borrowers continues to improve. While we have long advocated for this shift in portfolios, we believe there may be a more intuitive way for investors to play defense via interest rate-hedged high-yield bonds.


SEE MORE







Luciano Siracusano III 
											,
										Christopher Carrano 
									/ Equity, Small Caps, Mid-Caps, Earnings, Japan, Currency Hedged Equity, Interest Rate Strategies
 03/16/2017
								

The Fed Moves: What It May Mean for Equities


Luciano Siracusano III,										Christopher Carrano 



									From the presidential election through March 9, the U.S. dollar rallied 4.3%, according to the Bloomberg Dollar Spot Index. Given the recent rate hike, and that many market participants believe there are additional rate hikes on the horizon, what are the equity asset classes that may benefit from rising rates and a rising dollar?
								

SEE MORE







Kevin Flanagan 
									/ Market News, U.S. Treasuries, Fixed Income, Interest Rate Strategies
 03/15/2017
								

Fed Watch: Spring Forward


Kevin Flanagan 



									Much like our clocks this past weekend, the Federal Reserve decided to “spring forward” with its monetary policy decisions. What was the reasoning behind this latest rate hike, and where does that leave potential policy decisions going forward?
								

SEE MORE







Kevin Flanagan 
									/ Fixed Income, Floating Rate Treasury, Interest Rate Strategies
 03/01/2017
								

In Like a Lion?


Kevin Flanagan 



The fixed income arena seems to be facing an interesting dilemma as the calendar turns to March. Will the money and bond markets have to weather the storm from potentially higher rates, or will the storm clouds part as monetary policy developments here in the U.S. give way to the upcoming elections in the Netherlands and France?


SEE MORE


























Jeremy J  Siegel
Senior Investment Strategy Advisor



                        Jeremy J. Siegel, WisdomTree’s Senior Investment Strategy Advisor, is the Russell E. Palmer Professor of Finance at The Wharton School of the University of Pennsylvania. Professor Siegel has written and lectured extensively about the economy and financial markets and is a regular contributor to the financial news media. In 1994, he received the highest teaching rating in a ranking of business school professors conducted by BusinessWeek magazine. His book Stocks for the Long Run was named by The Washington Post as one of the 10 best investment books of all time. His latest book, The Future for Investors, is a bestseller.
                    

Read All Articles






Luciano Siracusano III
Chief Investment Strategist



                        Luciano Siracusano is WisdomTree’s Chief Investment Strategist. He is the co-creator, with CEO Jonathan Steinberg, of WisdomTree’s patented Indexing methodology. Mr. Siracusano led WisdomTree’s sales organization from October 2008 until June of 2015, while also serving as the firm’s Chief Investment Strategist. Luciano stepped down as WisdomTree’s Head of Sales in 2015 to focus full time on his duties as Chief Investment Strategist. From 2001 until October 2008, Luciano was WisdomTree’s Director of Research and was responsible for the creation and development of WisdomTree’s proprietary stock indexes. Luciano is a regular guest on CNBC and FOX Business, and speaks and writes frequently on ETFs, indexing and global financial markets. A former equity analyst at Value Line, Luciano began his career as a speechwriter for former New York Governor Mario Cuomo and HUD Secretary Henry Cisneros. He graduated from Columbia University with a B.A. in Political Science in 1987.
                    

Read All Articles






Jonathan Steinberg
CEO of WisdomTree



                        Prior to establishing WisdomTree, Jonathan founded, and served as Chairman and CEO of Individual Investor Group, Inc. From 1998 to 2004, he held the role of Editor-in-Chief of Individual Investor and Ticker magazines. Before his entrepreneurial accomplishments, Jonathan was an Analyst in the Mergers & Acquisitions division at Bear Stearns & Co. He attended The Wharton School at the University of Pennsylvania and is the author of Midas Investing, published by Random House in 1996.
                    

Read All Articles






Jesper Koll
WisdomTree's Head of Japan



                        Jesper Koll was appointed WisdomTree's Head of Japan on July 1, 2015. Over the past two decades Jesper has been consistently ranked as one of the top Japan strategists/economists, working as Chief Strategist and Head of Research for major U.S. investment banks J.P. Morgan and Merrill Lynch. His analysis and insights have earned him a position on several Japanese government advisory committees and Jesper is also one of the few non-Japanese members of the Keizai Doyukai, the Japan Association of Corporate Executives. He has written two books in Japanese, Towards a New Japanese Golden Age and The End of Heisei Deflation. After arriving in Japan in 1986 Jesper initially worked as an aide to a Member of Parliament. Jesper has a Masters degree from the School of Advanced and International Studies at Johns Hopkins University and was a research fellow at both Tokyo University and Kyoto University. He is a graduate of the Lester B. Pearson College of the Pacific.
                    

Read All Articles






Jeremy Schwartz
Director of Research



                        Jeremy is responsible for the WisdomTree equity index construction process and oversees research across the WisdomTree family. Prior to joining WisdomTree, Jeremy was Professor Jeremy Siegel's head research assistant and helped with the research and writing of Stocks for the Long Run and The Future for Investors. He is also co-author of the Financial Analysts Journal paper "What Happened to the Original Stocks in the S&P 500?" Jeremy is a graduate of The Wharton School of the University of Pennsylvania and currently stays involved with Wharton by hosting the Wharton Business Radio program “Behind the Markets” on SiriusXM 111. Jeremy is also a member of the CFA Society of Philadelphia.
                    

Read All Articles






Christopher Gannatti
Associate Director of Research



                        Christopher Gannatti began at WisdomTree as a Research Analyst in December 2010, working directly with Jeremy Schwartz, CFA®, Director of Research. He is involved in creating and communicating WisdomTree’s thoughts on the markets, as well as analyzing existing strategies and developing new approaches. Christopher came to WisdomTree from Lord Abbett, where he worked for four and a half years as a Regional Consultant. He received his MBA in Quantitative Finance, Accounting, and Economics from NYU’s Stern School of Business in 2010, and he received his bachelor’s degree from Colgate University in Economics in 2006. Christopher is a holder of the Chartered Financial Analyst designation.
                    

Read All Articles






Kevin Flanagan
Senior Fixed Income Strategist



                        As part of WisdomTree’s Investment Strategy group, Kevin serves as Senior Fixed Income Strategist. In this role, he contributes to the asset allocation team, writes fixed income-related content and travels with the sales team, conducting client-facing meetings and providing expertise on WisdomTree’s existing and future bond ETFs. In addition, Kevin works closely with the fixed income team. Prior to joining WisdomTree, Kevin spent 30 years at Morgan Stanley, where he was most recently a Managing Director. He was responsible for tactical and strategic recommendations and created asset allocation models for fixed income securities. He was a contributor to the Morgan Stanley Wealth Management Global Investment Committee, primary author of Morgan Stanley Wealth Management’s monthly and weekly fixed income publications, and collaborated with the firm’s Research and Consulting Group Divisions to build ETF and fund manager asset allocation models. Kevin has an MBA from Pace University’s Lubin Graduate School of Business, and a B.S in Finance from Fairfield University.
                    

Read All Articles






Bradley Krom
Fixed Income & Currency



                        Bradley Krom joined WisdomTree as a member of the Fixed Income and Currency team in December 2010. He is involved in creating and communicating WisdomTree’s thoughts on currency and fixed income markets, as well as analyzing existing and new fund strategies. Prior to joining WisdomTree, Bradley served as a senior trader on a proprietary trading desk at TransMarket Group. Bradley is a graduate of the Wharton School, University of Pennsylvania.
                    

Read All Articles






Tripp Zimmerman
Associate Director of Research



                        Tripp Zimmerman began at WisdomTree as a Research Analyst in February 2013. Now, as an Associate Director of Research, he leads the Firm’s data analytics group, responsible for index creation, maintenance and reconstitution. Tripp travels domestically and internationally to speak about WisdomTree index capabilities and meets with clients across various sales channels. He is also involved in creating and communicating WisdomTree’s thoughts on the markets. Prior to joining WisdomTree, Tripp worked in various investment-related roles for TD Ameritrade, Wells Fargo Advisors, TIAA-CREF and Evergreen Investments. Tripp graduated from The University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill with dual degrees in Economics and Philosophy. Tripp is a holder of the Chartered Financial Analyst designation.
                    

Read All Articles






Rick Harper
Head of Fixed Income & Currency



                        Rick Harper serves as the Head of Fixed Income and Currency for WisdomTree Asset Management, where he oversees the firm’s suite of fixed income and currency exchange-traded funds.  Rick has over 22 years investment experience in strategy and portfolio management positions at prominent investment firms. Prior to joining WisdomTree in 2007, Rick held senior level strategist roles with RBC Dain Rauscher, Bank One Capital Markets, ETF Advisors, and Nuveen Investments. At ETF Advisors, he was the portfolio manager and developer of some of the first fixed income exchange-traded funds. His research has been featured in leading periodicals including the Journal of Portfolio Management and the Journal of Indexes. He graduated from Emory University and earned his MBA at Indiana University.
                    

Read All Articles






Ambar Bajaj
Fixed Income & Currency



                        Ambar Bajaj joined WisdomTree as a member of the Fixed Income and Currency team in September 2011. He is involved in creating and communicating WisdomTree’s thoughts on currency and fixed income markets, as well as analyzing existing and new fund strategies. Prior to joining WisdomTree, Ambar traded interest rate derivatives and US Treasuries for a proprietary trading firm. Ambar graduated from the University of Rochester with dual degrees in Economics and Mathematics.
                    

Read All Articles






Gaurav Sinha
Asset Allocation Strategist



                        Gaurav Sinha is currently working as Asset Allocation Strategist at WisdomTree since November 2014. He is leading the Portfolio Analytics and Solutions team and builds specialized investment solutions along with customized analytics for our clients. He is also deeply involved in advancing WisdomTree’s product suite, and has particular expertise on India. Gaurav came to WisdomTree after stints at World Bank, Morgan Stanley and recently with Windhaven Investment Management. He received his Masters in Financial Engineering from Columbia University in 2009 and holds a bachelors Engineering degree from the prestigious Indian Institute Of Technology (IIT).
                    

Read All Articles






Anita Rausch
Head of Capital Markets



                        Anita Rausch is Head of the Capital Markets team. The Capital Markets group is involved in all aspects of WisdomTree ETFs including product development, seeding and bringing new products to market, and working with the client base on trading strategies and best execution strategies. Anita is responsible for the relationships with the trading community and works with them to support the liquidity of the WisdomTree ETFs. Prior to joining WisdomTree, Anita was an Executive Director on the JP Morgan ETF trading desk where she facilitated trades for a wide subset of clients across all ETFs. Anita started her career at Morgan Stanley and became an Executive Director on their ETF trading desk, in charge of the International ETF product. Anita is also a major contributor to both of David Abner’s books, The ETF Handbook (Wiley, 2010) and The Visual Guide to ETFs (Bloomberg, 2013).
                    

Read All Articles






Michael Barrer
Senior Associate of Capital Markets



                        Michael Barrer is a member of the Capital Markets team based in New York. The Capital Markets group is involved in all aspects of WisdomTree ETFs, including product development, seeding and bringing new products to market and working with the client base on trading strategies and best execution strategies. Michael also supports the trading community on providing liquidity and works closely with Hedge Funds on trading and investing in WisdomTree ETFs. Michael began his career in finance as an equity and ETF proprietary trader, followed by two years at Merrill Lynch in an investment-related role. Since joining WisdomTree in 2013, Michael spent a year and a half as an integral member of the sales team and later joined the Capital Markets group to concentrate on his passion for ETF markets and trading. Michael graduated in 2004 from Syracuse University with a focus on business and technology.
                    

Read All Articles






Paige Corbin
Capital Markets Associate



                        Paige Corbin is a member of the Capital Markets team based in New York. The Capital Markets group is involved in all aspects of WisdomTree ETFs, including product development, seeding and bringing new products to market and working with the investor base on trading and best execution strategies. Paige also supports the trading community on providing liquidity and works closely with Hedge Funds and RIAs on trading and investing in WisdomTree ETFs. Paige began her career in finance at Bloomberg LP and subsequently at Bloomberg Tradebook working with clients on electronic trading solutions, developing an expertise in ETF trading. Paige graduated in 2009 from the University of Virginia.
                    

Read All Articles






Zach Hascoe
Capital Markets



                        Zach Hascoe is currently a member of the WisdomTree Corporate Strategy team based in New York.  Prior to this, Zach was the Director of Capital Markets for WisdomTree Europe Ltd based in London. He was responsible for building and growing the capital markets infrastructure for the WisdomTree Europe product set among the various market making and trading counterparties across Europe. In addition, Zach was responsible for managing the capital markets relationships with the stock exchanges, authorized participants (APs), market making firms and investment bank institutional sales and trading businesses.  Zach began at WisdomTree in New York in August 2010 and has been involved in all aspects of the WisdomTree ETFs including product development, helping to seed and bring new products to market, as well as trading strategies and best execution strategies for the client base. He is a frequent contributor to the WisdomTree blog on topics related to the capital markets, liquidity, structure and best execution. Zach received a B.A. from Bucknell University in Political Science and was Captain of the Bucknell Tennis Team. 
                    

Read All Articles






David Abner
Head of Europe



                        David Abner is WisdomTree's Head of Europe. Prior to joining WisdomTree in 2008, David spent two years as a Managing Director and the head of ETF Trading Americas at BNP Paribas. David started his career at Bear Stearns & Co. in 1992. David holds an MS in Management and a BA in Economics from Stony Brook University on Long Island. He is the author of The ETF Handbook (Wiley, 2010) and The Visual Guide to ETFs (Bloomberg, summer 2012).
                    

Read All Articles






Christopher Carrano
Investment Analyst



                        Christopher Carrano is an investment analyst at WisdomTree. He works under Luciano Siracusano, WisdomTree’s Chief Investment Strategist, assisting with market and editorial research. Christopher first joined WisdomTree in April of 2014, and later rejoined the company in September of 2015 after spending time abroad. Prior to WisdomTree, Christopher was an investment consulting intern at Mercer where he monitored and analyzed the investments, and investment managers, of retirement plans and endowments. He graduated from Columbia University with a B.A. in Economics in 2014.
                    

Read All Articles






Joseph Tenaglia
Asset Allocation Strategist



                        Joseph Tenaglia joined WisdomTree as an Asset Allocation Strategist in July 2016. He is responsible for building model portfolios and creating custom solutions for WisdomTree’s clients. Within the research team, Joseph maintains a particular focus on emerging markets. Prior to joining WisdomTree, Joseph worked at Emerging Global Advisors as an Emerging Markets Portfolio Specialist, where he sat on the firm’s Investment Strategy team, oversaw capital markets, and maintained relationships with client home office research and due diligence teams. He started his career at BNY Mellon as a Regional Consultant and also worked as an analyst on the national accounts team.  Joseph graduated in 2009 from Boston College. Joseph is a holder of the Chartered Financial Analyst designation.
                    

Read All Articles






Jeff Weniger, CFA
Asset Allocation Strategist



                        Jeff Weniger, CFA serves as Asset Allocation Strategist at WisdomTree. Jeff has a background in fundamental, economic and behavioral analysis for strategic and tactical asset allocation. Prior to joining WisdomTree, he was Director, Senior Strategist with BMO from 2006 to 2017, serving on the Asset Allocation Committee and co-managing the firm’s ETF model portfolios. Jeff has a B.S. in Finance from the University of Florida and an MBA from Notre Dame. He is a CFA charter holder and an active member of the CFA Society of Chicago and the CFA Institute since 2006. He has appeared in various financial publications such as Barron’s and the Wall Street Journal and makes regular appearances on Canada’s Business News Network (BNN) and Wharton Business Radio.
 


Read All Articles






Matt Wagner
Research Analyst 



                        Matt Wagner joined WisdomTree in May 2017 as a Research Analyst. He works under Christopher Gannatti, Associate Director of Research, where he is responsible for research on WisdomTree’s products and views on the market. He started his career at Morgan Stanley, working as an analyst in Treasury Capital Markets from 2015 to 2017 where he focused on unsecured funding planning, execution and risk management. Matt graduated from Boston College in 2015 with a B.A. in International Studies with a concentration in Economics.  
                    

Read All Articles





Josh Russell
Quantitative Equity Strategist





Read All Articles













Jeremy J  Siegel 
									/ Interest Rate Strategies, Market News
 12/18/2015
								

Jeremy Siegel on the Fed Rate Hike and What It Means for 2016


Jeremy J  Siegel 



On Wednesday afternoon the Federal Reserve raised rates by 25 basis points, effectively raising its target band for the Federal Funds Rate to 25−50 bps. A widely anticipated move, it is an important and positive development for risk markets such as equities in that it removes a level of uncertainty.


SEE MORE







Bradley Krom 
									/ Interest Rate Strategies, Market News
 12/17/2015
								

The Impact of Fed Tightening on U.S. Investment Grade Credit


Bradley Krom 



After nearly two and a half years of debate, the Federal Reserve finally lifted the Federal Funds Rate target by 25 basis points on December 16, 2015. While investors continue to grapple with what impact this might have for markets and the economy, we thought it could be instructive to understand what impact a tightening cycle has historically had on the cost of credit for investment-grade corporations.


SEE MORE







Jeremy Schwartz 
									/ Conversations with Professor Siegel, Interest Rate Strategies, Market News, U.S. Dollar
 12/16/2015
								

The Fed to Perpetuate a Strong Dollar


Jeremy Schwartz 



Last week, Professor Siegel and I chat with Marc Chandler, Head of Global Markets Strategy at Brown Brothers Harriman, about his views on divergent central bank policy actions, implications for the U.S. dollar, euro and yen, as well as his thoughts regarding emerging markets.
 


SEE MORE







Luciano Siracusano III 
									/ Interest Rate Strategies, Market News
 12/15/2015
								

What Happens When Interest Rates Rise?


Luciano Siracusano III 



With December 16 marking the last opportunity for the Federal Reserve (Fed) to raise interest rates in 2015, market participants now put the odds of a Fed rate hike in December at nearly 80%—up from the 32% probability given to a rate hike just three months ago in September.


SEE MORE







Bradley Krom 
									/ Fixed Income, Currency & Alternative, Income Strategies, Interest Rate Strategies
 10/19/2015
								

What Drives Returns (and Volatility) of the Barclays U.S. Aggregate Index?


Bradley Krom 



Over the last couple of months, volatility across asset classes has ticked up markedly. Interestingly, although interest rates have declined from their highs of the year, rates haven’t fallen that much compared to the downdraft in global equity prices. Brad Krom explains why this has resulted in the returns of the Barclays U.S. Aggregate Index (Agg) remaining approximately unchanged year-to-date.  


SEE MORE
























 
CATEGORIES



All Articles


ETF Education


Emerging Markets


Earnings


Currency Hedged Equity


Interest Rate Strategies


Japan


Europe


BTM Podcast Series


 
POPULAR



Why the Timing Is Ripe for Emerging Market Equities


Macron vs. the Coalition of the Unwilling: It’s HEDJ Time


What Makes ETFs Tax Efficient?



RELATED LINKS
 
Glossary
 
                    FOLLOW US
                


email@wisdomtree.com





Twitter


YouTube


LinkedIn





REGISTER TO RECEIVE BLOG ALERTS
Already registered? Please log in to sign up for blogs.


 





Individual Investor





 Financial Professional
































Select Country
Afghanistan
Åland Islands
Albania
Algeria
American Samoa
Andorra
Angola
Anguilla
Antarctica
Antigua and Barbuda
Argentina
Armenia
Aruba
Australia
Austria
Azerbaijan
Bahamas
Bahrain
Bangladesh
Barbados
Belarus
Belgium
Belize
Benin
Bermuda
Bhutan
Bolivia
Bosnia and Herzegovina
Botswana
Bouvet Island
Brazil
British Indian Ocean Territory
Brunei Darussalam
Bulgaria
Burkina Faso
Burundi
Cambodia
Cameroon
Canada
Cape Verde
Cayman Islands
Central African Republic
Chad
Chile
China
Christmas Island
Cocos (Keeling) Islands
Colombia
Comoros
Congo
Congo, The Democratic Republic of the
Cook Islands
Costa Rica
Côte d'Ivoire
Croatia
Cuba
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Denmark
Djibouti
Dominica
Dominican Republic
Ecuador
Egypt
El Salvador
Equatorial Guinea
Eritrea
Estonia
Ethiopia
Falkland Islands (Malvinas)
Faroe Islands
Fiji
Finland
France
French Guiana
French Polynesia
French Southern Territories
Gabon
Gambia
Georgia
Germany
Ghana
Gibraltar
Greece
Greenland
Grenada
Guadeloupe
Guam
Guatemala
Guernsey
Guinea
Guinea-Bissau
Guyana
Haiti
Heard Island and McDonald Islands
Holy See (Vatican City State)
Honduras
Hong Kong
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Iran, Islamic Republic of
Iraq
Ireland
Isle of Man
Israel
Italy
Jamaica
Japan
Jersey
Jordan
Kazakhstan
Kenya
Kiribati
Kuwait
Kyrgyzstan
Laos People's Democratic Republic
Latvia
Lebanon
Lesotho
Liberia
Libyan Arab Jamahiriya
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Macau
Madagascar
Malawi
Malaysia
Maldives
Mali
Malta
Marshall Islands
Martinique
Mauritania
Mauritius
Mayotte
Mexico
Micronesia, Federated States of
Moldova
Monaco
Mongolia
Montenegro
Montserrat
Morocco
Mozambique
Myanmar
Namibia
Nauru
Nepal
Netherlands
Netherlands Antilles
New Caledonia
New Zealand
Nicaragua
Niger
Nigeria
Niue
Norfolk Island
Korea, Democratic People's Republic of
Northern Mariana Islands
Norway
Oman
Pakistan
Palau
Palestinian Territory, Occupied
Panama
Papua New Guinea
Paraguay
Peru
Philippines
Pitcairn Islands
Poland
Portugal
Puerto Rico
Qatar
Réunion
Romania
Russian Federation
Rwanda
Saint Barthélemy
Saint Helena
Saint Kitts and Nevis
Saint Lucia
Saint Martin
Saint Pierre and Miquelon
Saint Vincent and the Grenadines
Samoa
San Marino
Sao Tome and Principe
Saudi Arabia
Senegal
Serbia
Seychelles
Sierra Leone
Singapore
Slovakia
Slovenia
Solomon Islands
Somalia
South Africa
Korea, Republic of
Spain
Sri Lanka
Sudan
Suriname
Svalbard and Jan Mayen
Swaziland
Sweden
Switzerland
Syrian Arab Republic
Taiwan, Province of China
Tajikistan
Tanzania, United Republic of
Thailand
Timor-Leste
Togo
Tokelau
Tonga
Trinidad and Tobago
Tunisia
Turkey
Turkmenistan
Turks and Caicos Islands
Tuvalu
Uganda
Ukraine
United Arab Emirates
United Kingdom
United States
United States Minor Outlying Islands
Uruguay
Uzbekistan
Vanuatu
Venezuela
Vietnam
Virgin Islands, British
Virgin Islands, U.S.
Wallis and Futuna
Western Sahara
Yemen
Zambia
Zimbabwe




State
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming
Other













NEXT STEP

 












RESTRICTED MATERIAL
This material is intended for Financial Professionals only. Financial Professionals who register with WisdomTree get exclusive access to our timely research and market insights.
LOGIN
Register












You are now leaving the WisdomTree Website


                     Hyperlinks on this website are provided as a convenience and we disclaim any responsibility for information, services or products found on the websites linked hereto.
                
Click here to continue











Rising Interest Rates & ETF Solutions | WisdomTree



























                Menu 
                









WisdomTree ETFs                                                    







 



                                            All ETFs
                




 



                                            Equity ETFs
                




 



                                            Fixed Income ETFs
                




 



                                            Alternative ETFs
                




 



                                            Currency ETFs
                




 



                                            All Indexes
                














Strategies                                                    







 



                                            Smart Beta
                




 



                                            Rising Rates Solutions
                




 



                                            Currency Hedging
                




 



                                            Quality Dividend Growth
                




 



                                            Fixed Income Solutions
                




 



                                            Emerging Markets
                














Resource Library                                                    







 



                                            WisdomTree Resources
                




 



                                            Prospectus & Regulatory
                




 



                                            Fact Sheets & Reports
                














Investor Community                                                    







 



                                            Financial Advisors
                




 



                                            Institutional Accounts
                














Blog                                                    







 



                                            All Blogs
                




 



                                            ETF Education
                




 



                                            Emerging Markets
                




 



                                            Interest Rate Strategies
                
















                                    About
                                












                                            Who we are
                                        









                                            Contact Us
                                        









                                            Press Room
                                        









                                            Careers
                                        














                                                    Investor Relations
                                                













                                                    Contact Us
                                                













                                                International Sites 
                                            












Canada                                                    









Switzerland                                                    









Germany                                                    









Finland                                                    









France                                                    









United Kingdom                                                    









Ireland                                                    









Italy                                                    









Japan                                                    









Luxembourg                                                    









Netherlands                                                    









Norway                                                    









Sweden                                                    









United States















                                                        Sign In / Register
                                                
























 BACK 
                


















About




Who we are


Contact Us


Press Room


Careers





Investor Relations 

Contact Us 




USA






CAN





CHE





DEU





FIN





FRA





GBR





IRL





ITA





JPN





LUX





NLD





NOR





SWE










Get access to exclusive content, industry insights, and more:
SIGN IN/REGISTER

















                                            WisdomTree ETFs
                                        







                            All ETFs
                        



                            Equity ETFs
                        



                            Fixed Income ETFs
                        



                            Alternative ETFs
                        



                            Currency ETFs
                        



                            All Indexes
                        







                                    Domestic Dividends
                                



                                    Domestic Earnings
                                



                                    Multifactor
                                



                                    Developed World ex-U.S.
                                



                                    Global/Global ex-U.S.
                                



                                    Emerging/Frontier Markets
                                



                                    Currency Hedged Equity
                                





                                    Strategic Core
                                



                                    Fundamental
                                



                                    International
                                



                                    Interest Rate Strategies
                                




DYLS
WisdomTree Dynamic Long/Short U.S. Equity Fund


DYB
WisdomTree Dynamic Bearish U.S. Equity Fund


WDTI
WisdomTree Managed Futures Strategy 


PUTW
WisdomTree CBOE S&P 500 PutWrite Strategy Fund


RRF
Global Real Return


GCC
WisdomTree Continuous Commodity Index Fund





                                    Domestic
                                



                                    Emerging Markets
                                






DTD
WisdomTree U.S. Total Dividend Fund


DLN
WisdomTree U.S. LargeCap Dividend Fund


DON
WisdomTree U.S. MidCap Dividend Fund


DES
WisdomTree U.S. SmallCap Dividend Fund


DHS
WisdomTree U.S. High Dividend Fund


DTN
WisdomTree U.S. Dividend ex-Financials Fund


DGRW
WisdomTree U.S. Quality Dividend Growth Fund


DGRS
WisdomTree U.S. SmallCap Quality Dividend Growth Fund




EXT
WisdomTree U.S. Total Earnings Fund


EPS
WisdomTree U.S. Earnings 500 Fund


EZM
WisdomTree U.S. MidCap Earnings Fund


EES
WisdomTree U.S. SmallCap Earnings Fund


EZY
WisdomTree U.S. LargeCap Value Fund


WUSA
WisdomTree U.S. Domestic Economy Fund


WEXP
WisdomTree U.S. Export and Multinational Fund




USMF
WisdomTree U.S. Multifactor Fund




DWM
WisdomTree International Equity Fund


DOL
WisdomTree International LargeCap Dividend Fund


DIM
WisdomTree International MidCap Dividend  Fund


DLS
WisdomTree International SmallCap Dividend Fund


DTH
WisdomTree International High Dividend Fund


DOO
WisdomTree International Dividend ex-Financials Fund


IQDG
WisdomTree International Quality Dividend Growth Fund


EUDG
WisdomTree Europe Quality Dividend Growth Fund


EDOM
WisdomTree Europe Domestic Economy Fund


DFE
WisdomTree Europe SmallCap Dividend Fund


DFJ
WisdomTree Japan SmallCap Dividend Fund


AUSE
WisdomTree Australia Dividend Fund




DEW
WisdomTree Global High Dividend Fund


DNL
WisdomTree Global ex‐U.S. Quality Dividend Growth Fund


GSD
WisdomTree Global SmallCap Dividend Fund


DRW
WisdomTree Global ex-U.S. Real Estate Fund


AXJL
WisdomTree Asia Pacific ex-Japan Fund


XMX
WisdomTree Global ex-Mexico Equity Fund




DVEM
WisdomTree Emerging Markets Dividend Fund


DEM
WisdomTree Emerging Markets High Dividend Fund


DGS
WisdomTree Emerging Markets SmallCap Dividend Fund


DGRE
WisdomTree Emerging Markets Quality Dividend Growth Fund


EMCG
WisdomTree Emerging Markets Consumer Growth Fund


EMSD
WisdomTree Strong Dollar Emerging Markets Equity Fund


EPI
WisdomTree India Earnings Fund


XSOE
WisdomTree Emerging Markets ex-State-Owned Enterprises Fund


CXSE
WisdomTree China ex-State-Owned Enterprises Fund


GULF
WisdomTree Middle East Dividend Fund




HEDJ
WisdomTree Europe Hedged Equity Fund


EUSC
WisdomTree Europe Hedged SmallCap Equity Fund


DXGE
WisdomTree Germany Hedged Equity Fund


DXUS
WisdomTree Global ex-U.S. Hedged Dividend Fund


IHDG
WisdomTree International Hedged Quality Dividend Growth Fund


HGSD
WisdomTree Global Hedged SmallCap Dividend Fund


DXPS
WisdomTree United Kingdom Hedged Equity Fund


HDRW
WisdomTree Global ex-U.S. Hedged Real Estate Fund


DXJ
WisdomTree Japan Hedged Equity Fund


JHDG
WisdomTree Japan Hedged Quality Dividend Growth Fund


DXJS
WisdomTree Japan Hedged SmallCap Equity Fund


DXJF
WisdomTree Japan Hedged Financials Fund


DXJR
WisdomTree Japan Hedged Real Estate Fund


DXJC
WisdomTree Japan Hedged Capital Goods Fund


DXJH
WisdomTree Japan Hedged Health Care Fund


DDWM
WisdomTree Dynamic Currency Hedged International Equity Fund


DHDG
WisdomTree Dynamic Currency Hedged International Quality Dividend Growth Fund


DDLS
WisdomTree Dynamic Currency Hedged International SmallCap Equity Fund


DDEZ
WisdomTree Dynamic Currency Hedged Europe Equity Fund


DDJP
WisdomTree Dynamic Currency Hedged Japan Equity Fund




CRDT
WisdomTree Strategic Corporate Bond Fund


UBND
WisdomTree Western Asset Unconstrained Bond Fund


AGGY
WisdomTree Barclays Yield Enhanced U.S. Aggregate Bond Fund


SHAG
WisdomTree Barclays Yield Enhanced U.S. Short-Term Aggregate Bond Fund




WFIG
WisdomTree Fundamental U.S. Corporate Bond Fund


SFIG
WisdomTree Fundamental U.S. Short-Term Corporate Bond Fund


WFHY
WisdomTree Fundamental U.S. High Yield Corporate Bond Fund


SFHY
WisdomTree Fundamental U.S. Short-Term High Yield Corporate Bond Fund




EMCB
WisdomTree Emerging Markets Corporate Bond Fund


ELD
WisdomTree Emerging Markets Local Debt Fund


ALD
WisdomTree Asia Local Debt Fund




AGZD
WisdomTree Barclays Interest Rate Hedged U.S. Aggregate Bond Fund


AGND
WisdomTree Barclays Negative Duration U.S. Aggregate Bond Fund


HYZD
WisdomTree Interest Rate Hedged High Yield Bond Fund


HYND
WisdomTree Negative Duration High Yield Bond Fund


USFR
WisdomTree Bloomberg Floating Rate Treasury Fund




USDU
WisdomTree Bloomberg U.S. Dollar Bullish Fund




CYB
WisdomTree Chinese Yuan Strategy Fund


BZF
WisdomTree Brazilian Real Strategy Fund


CEW
WisdomTree Emerging Currency Strategy Fund












                                            STRATEGIES
                                        



Smart Beta
Rising Rates Solutions
Currency Hedging
Quality Dividend Growth
Fixed Income Solutions
Emerging Markets






                                            RESOURCE LIBRARY
                                        



WisdomTree Resources
Prospectus & Regulatory
Fact Sheets & Reports






                                            INVESTOR COMMUNITY
                                        



Financial Advisors
Institutional Accounts






                                            BLOG
                                        



All Blogs
ETF Education
Emerging Markets
Interest Rate Strategies














My WisdomTree - Sign in
 










Remember me


SIGN IN


Forgot your password?








Not Registered? Register Now.
Individual investors who register can access daily blog posts, latest videos, podcasts and snapshots, and stay current with industry insights. On top of that, Financial Professionals get additional access to thoughtful research, smart analytics and unique economic commentary from Jeremy Siegel.
1. My Profile >2. Additional Information




 


Account Type


Individual Investor



 Financial Professional


































Select Country
Afghanistan
Åland Islands
Albania
Algeria
American Samoa
Andorra
Angola
Anguilla
Antarctica
Antigua and Barbuda
Argentina
Armenia
Aruba
Australia
Austria
Azerbaijan
Bahamas
Bahrain
Bangladesh
Barbados
Belarus
Belgium
Belize
Benin
Bermuda
Bhutan
Bolivia
Bosnia and Herzegovina
Botswana
Bouvet Island
Brazil
British Indian Ocean Territory
Brunei Darussalam
Bulgaria
Burkina Faso
Burundi
Cambodia
Cameroon
Canada
Cape Verde
Cayman Islands
Central African Republic
Chad
Chile
China
Christmas Island
Cocos (Keeling) Islands
Colombia
Comoros
Congo
Congo, The Democratic Republic of the
Cook Islands
Costa Rica
Côte d'Ivoire
Croatia
Cuba
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Denmark
Djibouti
Dominica
Dominican Republic
Ecuador
Egypt
El Salvador
Equatorial Guinea
Eritrea
Estonia
Ethiopia
Falkland Islands (Malvinas)
Faroe Islands
Fiji
Finland
France
French Guiana
French Polynesia
French Southern Territories
Gabon
Gambia
Georgia
Germany
Ghana
Gibraltar
Greece
Greenland
Grenada
Guadeloupe
Guam
Guatemala
Guernsey
Guinea
Guinea-Bissau
Guyana
Haiti
Heard Island and McDonald Islands
Holy See (Vatican City State)
Honduras
Hong Kong
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Iran, Islamic Republic of
Iraq
Ireland
Isle of Man
Israel
Italy
Jamaica
Japan
Jersey
Jordan
Kazakhstan
Kenya
Kiribati
Kuwait
Kyrgyzstan
Laos People's Democratic Republic
Latvia
Lebanon
Lesotho
Liberia
Libyan Arab Jamahiriya
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Macau
Madagascar
Malawi
Malaysia
Maldives
Mali
Malta
Marshall Islands
Martinique
Mauritania
Mauritius
Mayotte
Mexico
Micronesia, Federated States of
Moldova
Monaco
Mongolia
Montenegro
Montserrat
Morocco
Mozambique
Myanmar
Namibia
Nauru
Nepal
Netherlands
Netherlands Antilles
New Caledonia
New Zealand
Nicaragua
Niger
Nigeria
Niue
Norfolk Island
Korea, Democratic People's Republic of
Northern Mariana Islands
Norway
Oman
Pakistan
Palau
Palestinian Territory, Occupied
Panama
Papua New Guinea
Paraguay
Peru
Philippines
Pitcairn Islands
Poland
Portugal
Puerto Rico
Qatar
Réunion
Romania
Russian Federation
Rwanda
Saint Barthélemy
Saint Helena
Saint Kitts and Nevis
Saint Lucia
Saint Martin
Saint Pierre and Miquelon
Saint Vincent and the Grenadines
Samoa
San Marino
Sao Tome and Principe
Saudi Arabia
Senegal
Serbia
Seychelles
Sierra Leone
Singapore
Slovakia
Slovenia
Solomon Islands
Somalia
South Africa
Korea, Republic of
Spain
Sri Lanka
Sudan
Suriname
Svalbard and Jan Mayen
Swaziland
Sweden
Switzerland
Syrian Arab Republic
Taiwan, Province of China
Tajikistan
Tanzania, United Republic of
Thailand
Timor-Leste
Togo
Tokelau
Tonga
Trinidad and Tobago
Tunisia
Turkey
Turkmenistan
Turks and Caicos Islands
Tuvalu
Uganda
Ukraine
United Arab Emirates
United Kingdom
United States
United States Minor Outlying Islands
Uruguay
Uzbekistan
Vanuatu
Venezuela
Vietnam
Virgin Islands, British
Virgin Islands, U.S.
Wallis and Futuna
Western Sahara
Yemen
Zambia
Zimbabwe




State
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming
Other





By submitting below you certify that you have read and agree to our privacy policy.









NEXT STEP










Home


Strategies


Rising Rates ETFs

 
RISING RATES ETFs


RELATED LINKS

Prepare Your Portfolio for Rising Rates


 






                                    RISING RATES
                                









                                    AGZD
                                









                                    AGND
                                









                                    HYZD
                                









                                    HYND
                                









                                    USFR
                                








How can you use ETFs to navigate interest rate changes at the Fed?
 
Bonds and interest rates have an inverse relationship, so when interest rates rise, bond prices (and total returns) fall. WisdomTree partnered with Bloomberg, Barclays, and BofA Merrill Lynch to create a family of five unique bond ETFs that can help investors navigate rising interest rates, while maintaining exposure to familiar strategies (and potentially supplementing income). 
 
AGZD


AGGREGATE BOND EXPOSURE WITH ZERO DURATION

The WisdomTree Barclays Interest Rate Hedged U.S. Aggregate Bond Fund (AGZD) can help investors maintain traditional bond exposures while decreasing their overall sensitivity to rising interest rates.


 
AGND


AGGREGATE BOND EXPOSURE WITH NEGATIVE DURATION

The WisdomTree Barclays Negative Duration U.S. Aggregate Bond Fund (AGND) can help investors maintain traditional bond exposures while decreasing their overall sensitivity to rising interest rates.


 
HYZD


HIGH YIELD WITH ZERO DURATION

The WisdomTree Interest Rate Hedged High Yield Bond Fund (HYZD) can help investors reduce the interest rate risk of their overall portfolio while supplementing income levels.


 
HYND


HIGH YIELD WITH NEGATIVE DURATION

The WisdomTree Negative Duration High Yield Bond Fund (HYND) can help investors reduce the interest rate risk of their overall portfolio while supplementing income levels.


 
USFR


U.S. TREASURY FLOATING RATE

The WisdomTree Bloomberg Floating Rate Treasury Fund (USFR) seeks to track the price and yield performance of the Bloomberg U.S. Treasury Floating Rate Bond Index.




AGGREGATE BOND EXPOSURE WITH ZERO DURATION

 
Many investors view the Barclays U.S. Aggregate Index (Agg), as a broad approximation of the U.S. investment-grade1 bond market—and mirror it for much of their core bond portfolios. In the current environment, however, investors may face increasing volatility and low levels of income from this subset of the fixed income markets.



The WisdomTree Barclays Interest Rate Hedged U.S. Aggregate Bond Fund (AGZD) can help investors maintain traditional bond exposures while decreasing their overall sensitivity to rising interest rates.

 

AGZD essentially combines a long position in cash bonds representative of the Agg with a short position in Treasury Bonds and/or Treasury futures to target the zero interest rate exposure. Investors can use the portfolio as a stand-alone tool for combatting rising interest rates or combine it with other interest rate-sensitive assets in their portfolio to target their desired level of risk.



As shown in the hypothetical allocation below, by allocating a portion of their overall portfolio to AGZD, investors can reduce their overall exposure to interest rate risk2.




Learn more about Zero Duration Bond Funds 

Get the facts about AGZD 


 

1Bonds with ratings of BBB-/Baa or higher are considered investment grade.

2Interest rate risk: The risk that an investment's value will decline due to an increase in interest rates.


AGGREGATE BOND EXPOSURE WITH NEGATIVE DURATION
 
Many investors view the Barclays U.S. Aggregate Index (Agg), as a broad approximation of the U.S. investment-grade1 bond market—and mirror it for much of their core bond portfolios. In the current environment, however, investors may face increasing volatility and low levels of income from this subset of the fixed income markets.



The WisdomTree Barclays Negative Duration U.S. Aggregate Bond Fund (AGND) can help investors maintain traditional bond exposures while decreasing their overall sensitivity to rising interest rates.

 
AGND essentially combines a long position in cash bonds representative of the Agg with a short position in Treasury Bonds and/or Treasury futures to target the negative interest rate exposure. Investors can use the portfolio as a stand-alone tool for combatting rising interest rates or combine it with other interest rate-sensitive assets in their portfolio to target their desired level of risk.



As shown in the hypothetical allocation below, by allocating a portion of their overall portfolio to AGND, investors can reduce their overall exposure to interest rate risk2.




Learn more about Negative Duration Bond Funds

Get the facts about AGND 


 

1Bonds with ratings of BBB-/Baa or higher are considered investment grade.

2Interest rate risk: The risk that an investment's value will decline due to an increase in interest rates.


HIGH YIELD WITH ZERO DURATIONHigh yield bonds continue to be one of the most popular segments of the fixed income market. But as concerns about credit risk trend lower, fear of interest rate risk is on the rise.



The WisdomTree Interest Rate Hedged High Yield Bond Fund (HYZD) can help investors reduce the interest rate risk of their overall portfolio while supplementing income levels.
 

HYZD essentially combines a long position in cash bonds from the BofA Merrill Lynch 0-5 Year US High Yield Constrained Index with a short position in Treasury bonds and/or Treasury futures to target the zero duration exposure. When incorporated into a core fixed income portfolio, HYZD could provide many benefits in a rising rate environment.




As shown in the hypothetical allocation below on the right, by allocating a portion of their overall portfolio to HYZD, investors can reduce their overall exposure to interest rate risk1.





Learn more about Zero Duration Bond Funds

Get the facts about HYZD


 
1Interest rate risk: The risk that an investment's value will decline due to an increase in interest rates.


HIGH YIELD WITH NEGATIVE DURATION

High yield bonds continue to be one of the most popular segments of the fixed income market1. But as concerns about credit risk trend lower, fear of interest rate risk is on the rise.



The WisdomTree Negative Duration High Yield Bond Fund (HYND) can help investors reduce the interest rate risk of their overall portfolio while supplementing income levels.




HYND essentially combines a long position in cash bonds from the BofA Merrill Lynch 0-5 Year US High Yield Constrained Index with a short position in Treasury bonds and/or Treasury futures to target the negative interest rate exposure. When incorporated into a core fixed income portfolio, HYND could provide many benefits in a rising rate environment.



As shown in the hypothetical allocation below, by allocating a portion of their overall portfolio to HYND, investors can reduce their overall exposure to interest rate risk2.
 




Learn more about Negative Duration Bond Funds

Get the facts about HYND


 

1Sources: Bloomberg, BofA Merrill Lynch, as of 12/31/13.

2Interest rate risk: The risk that an investment's value will decline due to an increase in interest rates.


U.S. TREASURY FLOATING RATE


In response to the growing demand from investors looking to reduce interest rate risk, the United States Treasury is issuing floating rate notes (FRNs)1 for the first time in its history. We believe this new class of issuance is an attractive option for investors looking to limit their exposure to credit risk2, while maintaining the potential to benefit from increases in interest rates.



The WisdomTree Bloomberg Floating Rate Treasury Fund (USFR) seeks to track the price and yield performance of the Bloomberg U.S. Treasury Floating Rate Bond Index.

Floating rate notes help bridge an important gap between short-maturity Treasury bills3 and longer-maturity, fixed rate Treasury bonds4 providing:

 
1


Potential to benefit from rising interest rates and higher yields


 
2


Income payments backed by the full faith and credit of the U.S. government





Learn more about Floating Rate Treasuries

Get the facts about USFR




1Floating rate notes: A debt instrument whose coupon payments are tied to a short-term borrowing rate such as a US Treasury Bill Rate or the London Interbank Offered Rate (LIBOR).

2Credit risk: The risk that a borrower will not meet their contractual obligations in conjunction with an investment.

3Treasury bill: A short-term debt obligation backed by the U.S. government with a maturity of less than one year.

4Treasury bonds: A debt obligation backed by the U.S. government with a maturity of more than ten years.













RESTRICTED MATERIAL
This material is intended for Financial Professionals only. Financial Professionals who register with WisdomTree get exclusive access to our timely research and market insights.
LOGIN
Register












You are now leaving the WisdomTree Website


                     Hyperlinks on this website are provided as a convenience and we disclaim any responsibility for information, services or products found on the websites linked hereto.
                
Click here to continue











Page Not Found | WisdomTree



























                Menu 
                









WisdomTree ETFs                                                    







 



                                            All ETFs
                




 



                                            Equity ETFs
                




 



                                            Fixed Income ETFs
                




 



                                            Alternative ETFs
                




 



                                            Currency ETFs
                




 



                                            All Indexes
                














Strategies                                                    







 



                                            Smart Beta
                




 



                                            Rising Rates Solutions
                




 



                                            Currency Hedging
                




 



                                            Quality Dividend Growth
                




 



                                            Fixed Income Solutions
                




 



                                            Emerging Markets
                














Resource Library                                                    







 



                                            WisdomTree Resources
                




 



                                            Prospectus & Regulatory
                




 



                                            Fact Sheets & Reports
                














Investor Community                                                    







 



                                            Financial Advisors
                




 



                                            Institutional Accounts
                














Blog                                                    







 



                                            All Blogs
                




 



                                            ETF Education
                




 



                                            Emerging Markets
                




 



                                            Interest Rate Strategies
                
















                                    About
                                












                                            Who we are
                                        









                                            Contact Us
                                        









                                            Press Room
                                        









                                            Careers
                                        














                                                    Investor Relations
                                                













                                                    Contact Us
                                                













                                                International Sites 
                                            












Canada                                                    









Switzerland                                                    









Germany                                                    









Finland                                                    









France                                                    









United Kingdom                                                    









Ireland                                                    









Italy                                                    









Japan                                                    









Luxembourg                                                    









Netherlands                                                    









Norway                                                    









Sweden                                                    









United States















                                                        Sign In / Register
                                                
























 BACK 
                


















About




Who we are


Contact Us


Press Room


Careers





Investor Relations 

Contact Us 




USA






CAN





CHE





DEU





FIN





FRA





GBR





IRL





ITA





JPN





LUX





NLD





NOR





SWE










Get access to exclusive content, industry insights, and more:
SIGN IN/REGISTER

















                                            WisdomTree ETFs
                                        







                            All ETFs
                        



                            Equity ETFs
                        



                            Fixed Income ETFs
                        



                            Alternative ETFs
                        



                            Currency ETFs
                        



                            All Indexes
                        







                                    Domestic Dividends
                                



                                    Domestic Earnings
                                



                                    Multifactor
                                



                                    Developed World ex-U.S.
                                



                                    Global/Global ex-U.S.
                                



                                    Emerging/Frontier Markets
                                



                                    Currency Hedged Equity
                                





                                    Strategic Core
                                



                                    Fundamental
                                



                                    International
                                



                                    Interest Rate Strategies
                                




DYLS
WisdomTree Dynamic Long/Short U.S. Equity Fund


DYB
WisdomTree Dynamic Bearish U.S. Equity Fund


WDTI
WisdomTree Managed Futures Strategy 


PUTW
WisdomTree CBOE S&P 500 PutWrite Strategy Fund


RRF
Global Real Return


GCC
WisdomTree Continuous Commodity Index Fund





                                    Domestic
                                



                                    Emerging Markets
                                






DTD
WisdomTree U.S. Total Dividend Fund


DLN
WisdomTree U.S. LargeCap Dividend Fund


DON
WisdomTree U.S. MidCap Dividend Fund


DES
WisdomTree U.S. SmallCap Dividend Fund


DHS
WisdomTree U.S. High Dividend Fund


DTN
WisdomTree U.S. Dividend ex-Financials Fund


DGRW
WisdomTree U.S. Quality Dividend Growth Fund


DGRS
WisdomTree U.S. SmallCap Quality Dividend Growth Fund




EXT
WisdomTree U.S. Total Earnings Fund


EPS
WisdomTree U.S. Earnings 500 Fund


EZM
WisdomTree U.S. MidCap Earnings Fund


EES
WisdomTree U.S. SmallCap Earnings Fund


EZY
WisdomTree U.S. LargeCap Value Fund


WUSA
WisdomTree U.S. Domestic Economy Fund


WEXP
WisdomTree U.S. Export and Multinational Fund




USMF
WisdomTree U.S. Multifactor Fund




DWM
WisdomTree International Equity Fund


DOL
WisdomTree International LargeCap Dividend Fund


DIM
WisdomTree International MidCap Dividend  Fund


DLS
WisdomTree International SmallCap Dividend Fund


DTH
WisdomTree International High Dividend Fund


DOO
WisdomTree International Dividend ex-Financials Fund


IQDG
WisdomTree International Quality Dividend Growth Fund


EUDG
WisdomTree Europe Quality Dividend Growth Fund


EDOM
WisdomTree Europe Domestic Economy Fund


DFE
WisdomTree Europe SmallCap Dividend Fund


DFJ
WisdomTree Japan SmallCap Dividend Fund


AUSE
WisdomTree Australia Dividend Fund




DEW
WisdomTree Global High Dividend Fund


DNL
WisdomTree Global ex‐U.S. Quality Dividend Growth Fund


GSD
WisdomTree Global SmallCap Dividend Fund


DRW
WisdomTree Global ex-U.S. Real Estate Fund


AXJL
WisdomTree Asia Pacific ex-Japan Fund


XMX
WisdomTree Global ex-Mexico Equity Fund




DVEM
WisdomTree Emerging Markets Dividend Fund


DEM
WisdomTree Emerging Markets High Dividend Fund


DGS
WisdomTree Emerging Markets SmallCap Dividend Fund


DGRE
WisdomTree Emerging Markets Quality Dividend Growth Fund


EMCG
WisdomTree Emerging Markets Consumer Growth Fund


EMSD
WisdomTree Strong Dollar Emerging Markets Equity Fund


EPI
WisdomTree India Earnings Fund


XSOE
WisdomTree Emerging Markets ex-State-Owned Enterprises Fund


CXSE
WisdomTree China ex-State-Owned Enterprises Fund


GULF
WisdomTree Middle East Dividend Fund




HEDJ
WisdomTree Europe Hedged Equity Fund


EUSC
WisdomTree Europe Hedged SmallCap Equity Fund


DXGE
WisdomTree Germany Hedged Equity Fund


DXUS
WisdomTree Global ex-U.S. Hedged Dividend Fund


IHDG
WisdomTree International Hedged Quality Dividend Growth Fund


HGSD
WisdomTree Global Hedged SmallCap Dividend Fund


DXPS
WisdomTree United Kingdom Hedged Equity Fund


HDRW
WisdomTree Global ex-U.S. Hedged Real Estate Fund


DXJ
WisdomTree Japan Hedged Equity Fund


JHDG
WisdomTree Japan Hedged Quality Dividend Growth Fund


DXJS
WisdomTree Japan Hedged SmallCap Equity Fund


DXJF
WisdomTree Japan Hedged Financials Fund


DXJR
WisdomTree Japan Hedged Real Estate Fund


DXJC
WisdomTree Japan Hedged Capital Goods Fund


DXJH
WisdomTree Japan Hedged Health Care Fund


DDWM
WisdomTree Dynamic Currency Hedged International Equity Fund


DHDG
WisdomTree Dynamic Currency Hedged International Quality Dividend Growth Fund


DDLS
WisdomTree Dynamic Currency Hedged International SmallCap Equity Fund


DDEZ
WisdomTree Dynamic Currency Hedged Europe Equity Fund


DDJP
WisdomTree Dynamic Currency Hedged Japan Equity Fund




CRDT
WisdomTree Strategic Corporate Bond Fund


UBND
WisdomTree Western Asset Unconstrained Bond Fund


AGGY
WisdomTree Barclays Yield Enhanced U.S. Aggregate Bond Fund


SHAG
WisdomTree Barclays Yield Enhanced U.S. Short-Term Aggregate Bond Fund




WFIG
WisdomTree Fundamental U.S. Corporate Bond Fund


SFIG
WisdomTree Fundamental U.S. Short-Term Corporate Bond Fund


WFHY
WisdomTree Fundamental U.S. High Yield Corporate Bond Fund


SFHY
WisdomTree Fundamental U.S. Short-Term High Yield Corporate Bond Fund




EMCB
WisdomTree Emerging Markets Corporate Bond Fund


ELD
WisdomTree Emerging Markets Local Debt Fund


ALD
WisdomTree Asia Local Debt Fund




AGZD
WisdomTree Barclays Interest Rate Hedged U.S. Aggregate Bond Fund


AGND
WisdomTree Barclays Negative Duration U.S. Aggregate Bond Fund


HYZD
WisdomTree Interest Rate Hedged High Yield Bond Fund


HYND
WisdomTree Negative Duration High Yield Bond Fund


USFR
WisdomTree Bloomberg Floating Rate Treasury Fund




USDU
WisdomTree Bloomberg U.S. Dollar Bullish Fund




CYB
WisdomTree Chinese Yuan Strategy Fund


BZF
WisdomTree Brazilian Real Strategy Fund


CEW
WisdomTree Emerging Currency Strategy Fund












                                            STRATEGIES
                                        



Smart Beta
Rising Rates Solutions
Currency Hedging
Quality Dividend Growth
Fixed Income Solutions
Emerging Markets






                                            RESOURCE LIBRARY
                                        



WisdomTree Resources
Prospectus & Regulatory
Fact Sheets & Reports






                                            INVESTOR COMMUNITY
                                        



Financial Advisors
Institutional Accounts






                                            BLOG
                                        



All Blogs
ETF Education
Emerging Markets
Interest Rate Strategies














My WisdomTree - Sign in
 










Remember me


SIGN IN


Forgot your password?








Not Registered? Register Now.
Individual investors who register can access daily blog posts, latest videos, podcasts and snapshots, and stay current with industry insights. On top of that, Financial Professionals get additional access to thoughtful research, smart analytics and unique economic commentary from Jeremy Siegel.
1. My Profile >2. Additional Information




 


Account Type


Individual Investor



 Financial Professional


































Select Country
Afghanistan
Åland Islands
Albania
Algeria
American Samoa
Andorra
Angola
Anguilla
Antarctica
Antigua and Barbuda
Argentina
Armenia
Aruba
Australia
Austria
Azerbaijan
Bahamas
Bahrain
Bangladesh
Barbados
Belarus
Belgium
Belize
Benin
Bermuda
Bhutan
Bolivia
Bosnia and Herzegovina
Botswana
Bouvet Island
Brazil
British Indian Ocean Territory
Brunei Darussalam
Bulgaria
Burkina Faso
Burundi
Cambodia
Cameroon
Canada
Cape Verde
Cayman Islands
Central African Republic
Chad
Chile
China
Christmas Island
Cocos (Keeling) Islands
Colombia
Comoros
Congo
Congo, The Democratic Republic of the
Cook Islands
Costa Rica
Côte d'Ivoire
Croatia
Cuba
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Denmark
Djibouti
Dominica
Dominican Republic
Ecuador
Egypt
El Salvador
Equatorial Guinea
Eritrea
Estonia
Ethiopia
Falkland Islands (Malvinas)
Faroe Islands
Fiji
Finland
France
French Guiana
French Polynesia
French Southern Territories
Gabon
Gambia
Georgia
Germany
Ghana
Gibraltar
Greece
Greenland
Grenada
Guadeloupe
Guam
Guatemala
Guernsey
Guinea
Guinea-Bissau
Guyana
Haiti
Heard Island and McDonald Islands
Holy See (Vatican City State)
Honduras
Hong Kong
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Iran, Islamic Republic of
Iraq
Ireland
Isle of Man
Israel
Italy
Jamaica
Japan
Jersey
Jordan
Kazakhstan
Kenya
Kiribati
Kuwait
Kyrgyzstan
Laos People's Democratic Republic
Latvia
Lebanon
Lesotho
Liberia
Libyan Arab Jamahiriya
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Macau
Madagascar
Malawi
Malaysia
Maldives
Mali
Malta
Marshall Islands
Martinique
Mauritania
Mauritius
Mayotte
Mexico
Micronesia, Federated States of
Moldova
Monaco
Mongolia
Montenegro
Montserrat
Morocco
Mozambique
Myanmar
Namibia
Nauru
Nepal
Netherlands
Netherlands Antilles
New Caledonia
New Zealand
Nicaragua
Niger
Nigeria
Niue
Norfolk Island
Korea, Democratic People's Republic of
Northern Mariana Islands
Norway
Oman
Pakistan
Palau
Palestinian Territory, Occupied
Panama
Papua New Guinea
Paraguay
Peru
Philippines
Pitcairn Islands
Poland
Portugal
Puerto Rico
Qatar
Réunion
Romania
Russian Federation
Rwanda
Saint Barthélemy
Saint Helena
Saint Kitts and Nevis
Saint Lucia
Saint Martin
Saint Pierre and Miquelon
Saint Vincent and the Grenadines
Samoa
San Marino
Sao Tome and Principe
Saudi Arabia
Senegal
Serbia
Seychelles
Sierra Leone
Singapore
Slovakia
Slovenia
Solomon Islands
Somalia
South Africa
Korea, Republic of
Spain
Sri Lanka
Sudan
Suriname
Svalbard and Jan Mayen
Swaziland
Sweden
Switzerland
Syrian Arab Republic
Taiwan, Province of China
Tajikistan
Tanzania, United Republic of
Thailand
Timor-Leste
Togo
Tokelau
Tonga
Trinidad and Tobago
Tunisia
Turkey
Turkmenistan
Turks and Caicos Islands
Tuvalu
Uganda
Ukraine
United Arab Emirates
United Kingdom
United States
United States Minor Outlying Islands
Uruguay
Uzbekistan
Vanuatu
Venezuela
Vietnam
Virgin Islands, British
Virgin Islands, U.S.
Wallis and Futuna
Western Sahara
Yemen
Zambia
Zimbabwe




State
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming
Other





By submitting below you certify that you have read and agree to our privacy policy.









NEXT STEP








404 Error
 
We’re sorry the page you are looking for could not be found.
Please see one of the following instead:
 

Home
WisdomTree Resources
WisdomTree ETFs











RESTRICTED MATERIAL
This material is intended for Financial Professionals only. Financial Professionals who register with WisdomTree get exclusive access to our timely research and market insights.
LOGIN
Register












You are now leaving the WisdomTree Website


                     Hyperlinks on this website are provided as a convenience and we disclaim any responsibility for information, services or products found on the websites linked hereto.
                
Click here to continue











	Income Investing | CEF | Nuveen



















































Nuveen









Individual Investor
Financial Advisor
Institutional Investor









Products





Products
Mutual Funds
Closed-End Funds
Separately Managed Accounts
Exchange-Traded Funds
Commodity Exchange-Traded Products
Unit Trusts
Products for Non-U.S. Investors
Other
Alternatives
Multi-Asset Solutions




Performance
Mutual Funds
Separately Managed Accounts
Pricing
Mutual Funds
Closed-End Funds
Unit Trusts







Insights





Market Commentary
Weekly Investment Commentary
Weekly Fixed Income Update
Product Commentary
Video Library
Conference Calls & Webinars




Investment Ideas
Adapt to Municipal Market Changes
Manage Key Income Risks
Reinvent Retirement Income Investing







Literature





Literature Center
Mutual Funds

									Forms & Applications
Prospectuses
									& Reports

									Fact Sheets & Commentary
Closed-End Funds
Fact
									Sheets & Reports










Resources





Client Resources

									Mutual Funds
Closed-End Funds

									Tax Information
Mutual Funds Education
Overview
Advisor Resources
Wealth Management Services

									Account Access
Tools and Calculators
Bond Investing Ladder Tool




Alternatives Education
Alternatives Education Center
Closed-End Funds Education
Closed-End Fund Strategies
Understanding Closed-End Funds
Multi-Asset Resources
Explore Multi-Asset Investing







Retirement





Retirement Solutions
About Us
Investment Solutions




Practice Management
Resources
401(k)ollege
Plan Profit (k)alculator
Contact Us


































Closed the Income Gap®
with Nuveen Closed-End Funds



Closed-End Funds Offer Attractive Income Potential
In the search for increased income opportunities, closed-end funds can be a smart choice. Designed and built for income, closed-end funds seek to provide regular, stable cash flow over time and can serve as a compelling tool for optimizing an income portfolio.
Consider closed-end funds if you’re seeking to:1


1


Enhance Income and Cash Flow
Because of their unique closed structure and ability to use leverage,2 closed-end funds offer potentially higher distributions3 than traditional income investments.4


2


Manage Interest Rate Risk 
Floating rate, shorter duration or equity closed-end funds may help reduce a portfolio’s interest rate sensitivity.


3


Protect Purchasing Power
Closed-end funds that invest in real assets and dividend-paying stocks, which typically increase their payments with rising inflation, may help buffer the effects of rising inflation.


4


Maximize After-Tax Efficiency
Nuveen offers a wide array of national, state specific and AMT-free municipal closed-end funds that may help reduce your tax liability on investment income.5


5


Improve Diversification
With strategies that provide access to specialized asset classes, including alternatives, Nuveen closed-end funds may enhance portfolio diversification.





Additional Resources



How Do CEFs Compare? 


Additional Advisor Resources










What is a Closed-End Fund?
Anne KritzmireClosed-End Fund & Structured Products










Consider Nuveen closed-end funds if you’re seeking1



Fund Name
Ticker
Leveraged?
Primary Investment Focus 
Enhance Income
Manage Interest Rate Risk
Protect Purchasing Power
Maximize After-Tax Efficiency
Improve Diversification 




Tax-Exempt Municipal Debt


Nuveen Quality Municipal Income Fund
NAD
•
Investment Grade Municipal Bonds
•


•



Nuveen AMT-Free Municipal Credit Income Fund
NVG
•
AMT-Free, Hybrid Investment Grade/High Yield Municipal Bonds
•


•



Nuveen Municipal Value Fund, Inc.
NUV

Investment Grade Municipal Bonds
•


•



Nuveen Municipal High Income Opportunity Fund
NMZ
•
High Yield Municipal Bonds
•


•





Taxable Debt


Nuveen Credit Strategies Income Fund
JQC
•
Senior Loans
•
•
•

•


Nuveen Mortgage Opportunity Term Fund
JLS
•
Mortgage-Backed Securities
•
•


•


Nuveen Preferred Securities Income Fund
JPS
•
Preferred Securities
•






Nuveen Global High Income Fund
JGH
•
Global High Yield Securities
•
•


•




Equity


Nuveen Real Asset Income and Growth Fund
JRI
•
Real Assets
•
•
•

•


Nuveen Tax-Advantaged Total Return Strategy Fund
JTA
•
Equity-Global
•
•
•

•


Nuveen S&P 500 Buy-Write Income Fund
BXMX

Equity-Option
•
•

•
•








There is no guarantee that any of the funds will achieve their stated objectives. For detailed information on the specific risks associated with each fund, please view the fund overview by clicking on the fund name above.
1 Goal classifications represent common investor concerns when evaluating portfolio needs, are provided for informational purposes only, and are not intended to be relied upon as investment advice or recommendations.
2 Leverage typically magnifies the total return of a fund’s portfolio, whether that return is positive or negative, and creates an opportunity for increased common share net income as well as higher volatility of net asset value, market price, and distributions. There is no assurance that a fund’s leveraging strategy will be successful.
3 Potential distribution sources include net investment income, realized gains and return of capital.  
4 Different types of asset investments have different types of risks, which may provide higher returns but also greater volatility. In general, equity securities tend to be more volatile that fixed income securities. The value of, and income generated by, debt securities will decrease or increase based on changes in market interest rates. As interest rates risk, bond prices fall. In general, below investment grade (high-yield) debt securities tend to be more volatile than investment grade securities. Preferred securities are subordinated to bonds and other debt instruments in a company's capital structure, and therefore are subject to greater credit risk. The interest and principal payments of U.S. Treasury securities are guaranteed.
5 Income may be subject to state and local income taxes and the alternative minimum tax. Capital gains, if any, will be subject to capital gains tax.














Investment Affiliates

Nuveen Asset Management
TIAA Investments
Symphony Asset Management
NWQ
Santa Barbara Asset Management
Winslow Capital


AGR Partners
Churchill Asset Management
GreenWood Resources
Gresham Investment Management
TH Real Estate
Westchester Agriculture Asset Management





Media Center
About Nuveen
Contact Us
Careers
Non-U.S. Investors
FINRA BrokerCheck




Follow Us:









There are risks inherent in any investment, including the possible loss of principal. There can be no assurance that fund objectives will be achieved. Closed-end funds frequently trade at a discount to their net asset value.
Past performance is no guarantee of future results.
NOT FDIC INSUREDMAY LOSE VALUENO BANK GUARANTEE









See our privacy policy, terms of use and our business continuity plan summary. The content of this site, including but not limited to the text and images herein and their arrangement are Copyright by Nuveen Investments. Securities offered through Nuveen Securities, LLC, a subsidiary of Nuveen, 333 W. Wacker Drive, Chicago, IL  60606.  Nuveen provides innovative investment strategies and portfolio management services through its independent investment affiliates: Nuveen Asset Management, TIAA Investments, Symphony Asset Management, NWQ Investment Management Company, Santa Barbara Asset Management, Winslow Capital Management, AGR Partners, Churchill Asset Management, GreenWood Resources Capital Management, Gresham Investment Management, TH Real Estate, and Westchester Agriculture Asset Management. 
Investor line: 1-800-257-8787. Advisor line: 1-800-752-8700.
The material contained on this website is not intended to be a recommendation or investment advice, does not constitute a solicitation to buy or sell securities, and is not provided in a fiduciary capacity. The information provided does not take into account the specific objectives or circumstances of any particular investor, or suggest any specific course of action. Investment decisions should be made based on an investor’s objectives and circumstances and in consultation with his or her advisors.
The information on this web site is intended for U.S. residents only.  If you are a non-U.S. resident, please visit www.nuveenglobal.com. The information provided does not constitute a solicitation of an offer to buy, or an offer to sell securities in any jurisdiction to any person to whom it is not lawful to make such an offer.
21247-INV-Y-03/17



















Login
Register
Client Accounts
Your Contacts







Not registered?
Register for access to investment team commentary, detailed portfolio information, and other advisor resources.  For instant access, register now.








Your Contacts
Our goal is to deliver lasting value to our clients. For assistance, please call or email our advisor service team or contact your personal Nuveen Service Team.
Log in to nuveen.com to access your personal Nuveen Service Team.



Financial Advisors
800-752-8700Email


Registered Investment Advisors
800-558-4487





Account Access
For more information on Mutual Fund Vision, FAN Mail, or accessing client accounts, please visit our advisor account access page.


Advisor Access

Vision
FAN Mail



Investor Access

Mutual Funds
Closed-End Funds




















	CEF Types & Strategies | Nuveen














































Nuveen









Individual Investor
Financial Advisor
Institutional Investor









Products





Products
Mutual Funds
Closed-End Funds
Separately Managed Accounts
Exchange-Traded Funds
Commodity Exchange-Traded Products
Unit Trusts
Products for Non-U.S. Investors
Other
Alternatives
Multi-Asset Solutions




Performance
Mutual Funds
Separately Managed Accounts
Pricing
Mutual Funds
Closed-End Funds
Unit Trusts







Insights





Market Commentary
Weekly Investment Commentary
Weekly Fixed Income Update
Product Commentary
Video Library
Conference Calls & Webinars




Investment Ideas
Adapt to Municipal Market Changes
Manage Key Income Risks
Reinvent Retirement Income Investing







Literature





Literature Center
Mutual Funds

									Forms & Applications
Prospectuses
									& Reports

									Fact Sheets & Commentary
Closed-End Funds
Fact
									Sheets & Reports










Resources





Client Resources

									Mutual Funds
Closed-End Funds

									Tax Information
Mutual Funds Education
Overview
Advisor Resources
Wealth Management Services

									Account Access
Tools and Calculators
Bond Investing Ladder Tool




Alternatives Education
Alternatives Education Center
Closed-End Funds Education
Closed-End Fund Strategies
Understanding Closed-End Funds
Multi-Asset Resources
Explore Multi-Asset Investing







Retirement





Retirement Solutions
About Us
Investment Solutions




Practice Management
Resources
401(k)ollege
Plan Profit (k)alculator
Contact Us













Strategies


MF
CEF
SMA
ETF
COM
UIT



CEF




Overview
Taxable Income
Tax-Exempt Income
Multi-Strategy
Equity









CEF Types & Strategies

Find out more about the types of closed-end funds we offer and their investment
			strategies using the chart below.





Multi-Strategy



				 

Global Debt

Equity Option



Preferred Securities

MBS

Global Equity



Floating Rate

MLPs

Domestic Equity



Municipal Debt

REITs

				 





Chart Definitions
Income-oriented closed-end funds make payouts largely from interest	and dividends.
Income and capital appreciation funds seek regular cash	flow made up of interest and dividends, with the remainder from capital appreciation or, if necessary, return of capital.
Capital appreciation and income closed-end funds seek cash flow mainly from capital appreciation.
Single-asset-class funds invest primarily in one asset class, which can be used as components in a well-diversified income portfolio.
Pre-packaged combinations are funds featuring multiple asset types, which are designed to work together to diversify fund cash flow risks.






















Investment Affiliates

Nuveen Asset Management
TIAA Investments
Symphony Asset Management
NWQ
Santa Barbara Asset Management
Winslow Capital


AGR Partners
Churchill Asset Management
GreenWood Resources
Gresham Investment Management
TH Real Estate
Westchester Agriculture Asset Management





Media Center
About Nuveen
Contact Us
Careers
Non-U.S. Investors
FINRA BrokerCheck




Follow Us:









There are risks inherent in any investment, including the possible loss of principal. There can be no assurance that fund objectives will be achieved. Closed-end funds frequently trade at a discount to their net asset value.
Past performance is no guarantee of future results.
NOT FDIC INSUREDMAY LOSE VALUENO BANK GUARANTEE







See our privacy policy, terms of use and our business continuity plan summary. The content of this site, including but not limited to the text and images herein and their arrangement are Copyright by Nuveen Investments. Securities offered through Nuveen Securities, LLC, a subsidiary of Nuveen, 333 W. Wacker Drive, Chicago, IL  60606.  Nuveen provides innovative investment strategies and portfolio management services through its independent investment affiliates: Nuveen Asset Management, TIAA Investments, Symphony Asset Management, NWQ Investment Management Company, Santa Barbara Asset Management, Winslow Capital Management, AGR Partners, Churchill Asset Management, GreenWood Resources Capital Management, Gresham Investment Management, TH Real Estate, and Westchester Agriculture Asset Management. 
Investor line: 1-800-257-8787. Advisor line: 1-800-752-8700.
The material contained on this website is not intended to be a recommendation or investment advice, does not constitute a solicitation to buy or sell securities, and is not provided in a fiduciary capacity. The information provided does not take into account the specific objectives or circumstances of any particular investor, or suggest any specific course of action. Investment decisions should be made based on an investor’s objectives and circumstances and in consultation with his or her advisors.
The information on this web site is intended for U.S. residents only.  If you are a non-U.S. resident, please visit www.nuveenglobal.com. The information provided does not constitute a solicitation of an offer to buy, or an offer to sell securities in any jurisdiction to any person to whom it is not lawful to make such an offer.




















Login
Register
Client Accounts
Your Contacts







Not registered?
Register for access to investment team commentary, detailed portfolio information, and other advisor resources.  For instant access, register now.








Your Contacts
Our goal is to deliver lasting value to our clients. For assistance, please call or email our advisor service team or contact your personal Nuveen Service Team.
Log in to nuveen.com to access your personal Nuveen Service Team.



Financial Advisors
800-752-8700Email


Registered Investment Advisors
800-558-4487





Account Access
For more information on Mutual Fund Vision, FAN Mail, or accessing client accounts, please visit our advisor account access page.


Advisor Access

Vision
FAN Mail



Investor Access

Mutual Funds
Closed-End Funds





















	Income Investing | CEF | Nuveen



















































Nuveen









Individual Investor
Financial Advisor
Institutional Investor









Products





Products
Mutual Funds
Closed-End Funds
Separately Managed Accounts
Exchange-Traded Funds
Commodity Exchange-Traded Products
Unit Trusts
Products for Non-U.S. Investors
Other
Alternatives
Multi-Asset Solutions




Performance
Mutual Funds
Separately Managed Accounts
Pricing
Mutual Funds
Closed-End Funds
Unit Trusts







Insights





Market Commentary
Weekly Investment Commentary
Weekly Fixed Income Update
Product Commentary
Video Library
Conference Calls & Webinars




Investment Ideas
Adapt to Municipal Market Changes
Manage Key Income Risks
Reinvent Retirement Income Investing







Literature





Literature Center
Mutual Funds

									Forms & Applications
Prospectuses
									& Reports

									Fact Sheets & Commentary
Closed-End Funds
Fact
									Sheets & Reports










Resources





Client Resources

									Mutual Funds
Closed-End Funds

									Tax Information
Mutual Funds Education
Overview
Advisor Resources
Wealth Management Services

									Account Access
Tools and Calculators
Bond Investing Ladder Tool




Alternatives Education
Alternatives Education Center
Closed-End Funds Education
Closed-End Fund Strategies
Understanding Closed-End Funds
Multi-Asset Resources
Explore Multi-Asset Investing







Retirement





Retirement Solutions
About Us
Investment Solutions




Practice Management
Resources
401(k)ollege
Plan Profit (k)alculator
Contact Us


































Closed the Income Gap®
with Nuveen Closed-End Funds



Closed-End Funds Offer Attractive Income Potential
In the search for increased income opportunities, closed-end funds can be a smart choice. Designed and built for income, closed-end funds seek to provide regular, stable cash flow over time and can serve as a compelling tool for optimizing an income portfolio.
Consider closed-end funds if you’re seeking to:1


1


Enhance Income and Cash Flow
Because of their unique closed structure and ability to use leverage,2 closed-end funds offer potentially higher distributions3 than traditional income investments.4


2


Manage Interest Rate Risk 
Floating rate, shorter duration or equity closed-end funds may help reduce a portfolio’s interest rate sensitivity.


3


Protect Purchasing Power
Closed-end funds that invest in real assets and dividend-paying stocks, which typically increase their payments with rising inflation, may help buffer the effects of rising inflation.


4


Maximize After-Tax Efficiency
Nuveen offers a wide array of national, state specific and AMT-free municipal closed-end funds that may help reduce your tax liability on investment income.5


5


Improve Diversification
With strategies that provide access to specialized asset classes, including alternatives, Nuveen closed-end funds may enhance portfolio diversification.





Additional Resources



How Do CEFs Compare? 


Additional Advisor Resources










What is a Closed-End Fund?
Anne KritzmireClosed-End Fund & Structured Products










Consider Nuveen closed-end funds if you’re seeking1



Fund Name
Ticker
Leveraged?
Primary Investment Focus 
Enhance Income
Manage Interest Rate Risk
Protect Purchasing Power
Maximize After-Tax Efficiency
Improve Diversification 




Tax-Exempt Municipal Debt


Nuveen Quality Municipal Income Fund
NAD
•
Investment Grade Municipal Bonds
•


•



Nuveen AMT-Free Municipal Credit Income Fund
NVG
•
AMT-Free, Hybrid Investment Grade/High Yield Municipal Bonds
•


•



Nuveen Municipal Value Fund, Inc.
NUV

Investment Grade Municipal Bonds
•


•



Nuveen Municipal High Income Opportunity Fund
NMZ
•
High Yield Municipal Bonds
•


•





Taxable Debt


Nuveen Credit Strategies Income Fund
JQC
•
Senior Loans
•
•
•

•


Nuveen Mortgage Opportunity Term Fund
JLS
•
Mortgage-Backed Securities
•
•


•


Nuveen Preferred Securities Income Fund
JPS
•
Preferred Securities
•






Nuveen Global High Income Fund
JGH
•
Global High Yield Securities
•
•


•




Equity


Nuveen Real Asset Income and Growth Fund
JRI
•
Real Assets
•
•
•

•


Nuveen Tax-Advantaged Total Return Strategy Fund
JTA
•
Equity-Global
•
•
•

•


Nuveen S&P 500 Buy-Write Income Fund
BXMX

Equity-Option
•
•

•
•








There is no guarantee that any of the funds will achieve their stated objectives. For detailed information on the specific risks associated with each fund, please view the fund overview by clicking on the fund name above.
1 Goal classifications represent common investor concerns when evaluating portfolio needs, are provided for informational purposes only, and are not intended to be relied upon as investment advice or recommendations.
2 Leverage typically magnifies the total return of a fund’s portfolio, whether that return is positive or negative, and creates an opportunity for increased common share net income as well as higher volatility of net asset value, market price, and distributions. There is no assurance that a fund’s leveraging strategy will be successful.
3 Potential distribution sources include net investment income, realized gains and return of capital.  
4 Different types of asset investments have different types of risks, which may provide higher returns but also greater volatility. In general, equity securities tend to be more volatile that fixed income securities. The value of, and income generated by, debt securities will decrease or increase based on changes in market interest rates. As interest rates risk, bond prices fall. In general, below investment grade (high-yield) debt securities tend to be more volatile than investment grade securities. Preferred securities are subordinated to bonds and other debt instruments in a company's capital structure, and therefore are subject to greater credit risk. The interest and principal payments of U.S. Treasury securities are guaranteed.
5 Income may be subject to state and local income taxes and the alternative minimum tax. Capital gains, if any, will be subject to capital gains tax.














Investment Affiliates

Nuveen Asset Management
TIAA Investments
Symphony Asset Management
NWQ
Santa Barbara Asset Management
Winslow Capital


AGR Partners
Churchill Asset Management
GreenWood Resources
Gresham Investment Management
TH Real Estate
Westchester Agriculture Asset Management





Media Center
About Nuveen
Contact Us
Careers
Non-U.S. Investors
FINRA BrokerCheck




Follow Us:









There are risks inherent in any investment, including the possible loss of principal. There can be no assurance that fund objectives will be achieved. Closed-end funds frequently trade at a discount to their net asset value.
Past performance is no guarantee of future results.
NOT FDIC INSUREDMAY LOSE VALUENO BANK GUARANTEE









See our privacy policy, terms of use and our business continuity plan summary. The content of this site, including but not limited to the text and images herein and their arrangement are Copyright by Nuveen Investments. Securities offered through Nuveen Securities, LLC, a subsidiary of Nuveen, 333 W. Wacker Drive, Chicago, IL  60606.  Nuveen provides innovative investment strategies and portfolio management services through its independent investment affiliates: Nuveen Asset Management, TIAA Investments, Symphony Asset Management, NWQ Investment Management Company, Santa Barbara Asset Management, Winslow Capital Management, AGR Partners, Churchill Asset Management, GreenWood Resources Capital Management, Gresham Investment Management, TH Real Estate, and Westchester Agriculture Asset Management. 
Investor line: 1-800-257-8787. Advisor line: 1-800-752-8700.
The material contained on this website is not intended to be a recommendation or investment advice, does not constitute a solicitation to buy or sell securities, and is not provided in a fiduciary capacity. The information provided does not take into account the specific objectives or circumstances of any particular investor, or suggest any specific course of action. Investment decisions should be made based on an investor’s objectives and circumstances and in consultation with his or her advisors.
The information on this web site is intended for U.S. residents only.  If you are a non-U.S. resident, please visit www.nuveenglobal.com. The information provided does not constitute a solicitation of an offer to buy, or an offer to sell securities in any jurisdiction to any person to whom it is not lawful to make such an offer.
21247-INV-Y-03/17



















Login
Register
Client Accounts
Your Contacts







Not registered?
Register for access to investment team commentary, detailed portfolio information, and other advisor resources.  For instant access, register now.








Your Contacts
Our goal is to deliver lasting value to our clients. For assistance, please call or email our advisor service team or contact your personal Nuveen Service Team.
Log in to nuveen.com to access your personal Nuveen Service Team.



Financial Advisors
800-752-8700Email


Registered Investment Advisors
800-558-4487





Account Access
For more information on Mutual Fund Vision, FAN Mail, or accessing client accounts, please visit our advisor account access page.


Advisor Access

Vision
FAN Mail



Investor Access

Mutual Funds
Closed-End Funds


















 



Putnam Short Duration Income Fund (PSDTX) - Putnam Investments



































Putnam Investments - Individual Investors


Login
About Putnam
Contact Us










 



Email
Facebook
Twitter
Google+
LinkedIn


Home
Mutual funds




Select another fund:
Absolute Return 100 Fund
Absolute Return 300 Fund
Absolute Return 500 Fund
Absolute Return 700 Fund
American Government Income Fund
AMT-Free Municipal Fund
California Tax Exempt Income Fund
Capital Opportunities Fund
Capital Spectrum Fund
Convertible Securities Fund
Diversified Income Trust
Dynamic Asset Allocation Balanced Fund
Dynamic Asset Allocation Conservative Fund
Dynamic Asset Allocation Growth Fund
Dynamic Risk Allocation Fund
Emerging Markets Equity Fund
Emerging Markets Income Fund
Equity Income Fund
Equity Spectrum Fund
Europe Equity Fund
Floating Rate Income Fund
George Putnam Balanced Fund
Global Consumer Fund
Global Equity Fund
Global Financials Fund
Global Health Care Fund
Global Income Trust
Global Industrials Fund
Global Natural Resources Fund
Global Sector Fund
Global Technology Fund
Global Telecommunications Fund
Global Utilities Fund
Government Money Market Fund
Growth Opportunities Fund
High Yield Fund
Income Fund
Intermediate-Term Municipal Income Fund
International Capital Opportunities Fund
International Equity Fund
International Growth Fund
International Value Fund
Investors Fund
Low Volatility Equity Fund
Massachusetts Tax Exempt Income Fund
Minnesota Tax Exempt Income Fund
Money Market Fund
Multi-Cap Core Fund
Multi-Cap Growth Fund
Multi-Cap Value Fund
New Jersey Tax Exempt Income Fund
New York Tax Exempt Income Fund
Ohio Tax Exempt Income Fund
Pennsylvania Tax Exempt Income Fund
Research Fund
Retirement Income Fund Lifestyle 1
RetirementReady 2020 Fund
RetirementReady 2025 Fund
RetirementReady 2030 Fund
RetirementReady 2035 Fund
RetirementReady 2040 Fund
RetirementReady 2045 Fund
RetirementReady 2050 Fund
RetirementReady 2055 Fund
RetirementReady 2060 Fund
Short Duration Income Fund
Short-Term Municipal Income Fund
Small Cap Growth Fund
Small Cap Value Fund
Tax Exempt Income Fund
Tax-Free High Yield Fund
U.S. Government Income Trust




Class A
Class B
Class C
Class M
Class R
Class R6
Class Y









Short Duration Income Fund (PSDTX)

 Seeking capital preservation and a higher rate of current income





Highlights
Performance
Holdings
Expenses


Summary




Fund price
Yesterday's close
52-week high
52-week low




Net asset value

$10.06

0.00%
(
$0.00
)

$10.06

(07/13/17)


$10.04

(10/25/16)





 Historical







On:





Please select a valid start date

to:





Please select a valid date
(Optional)

Get prices


 



Management team






(pictured left to right)
Michael V. Salm (industry since 1989)Joanne M. Driscoll, CFA (industry since 1992)Emily E. Shanks (industry since 1999)




Strategy and process

A broader opportunity set: The fund invests in a diversified portfolio composed of short duration, investment-grade money market and other fixed-income securities.
Active risk management: In today's complex bond market, the fund's experienced managers actively manage risk with the goal of superior risk-adjusted performance over time.
Higher income potential: Access to a wider range of income opportunities means the fund may offer higher income potential than other short-term investments.



 Current performance may be lower or higher than the quoted past performance, which cannot guarantee future results. Share price, principal value, and return will vary, and you may have a gain or a loss when you sell your shares. To obtain the most recent month-end performance, visit putnam.com.
Performance assumes reinvestment of distributions and does not account for taxes. Class A, M, and R shares have no initial sales charge. Class A and M shares generally have no contingent deferred sales charge (CDSC). However, a CDSC may apply to redemptions of class A shares obtained by exchanging shares from another Putnam fund that were originally purchased without an initial sales charge. This CDSC applies if the shares are redeemed within nine months of the original purchase. A CDSC on class M shares may apply to redemptions of shares from certain rollover accounts. See the prospectus for details. Class B and C shares do not carry a CDSC. Class Y shares, available to investors through an asset-based fee program or for institutional clients, are sold without an initial sales charge and have no CDSC. Class R5/R6 shares, available to qualified employee-benefit plans only, are sold without an initial sales charge and have no CDSC.  Performance for Class R5/R6 shares before their inception are derived from the historical performance of class Y shares, which have not been adjusted for the lower expenses; had they, returns would have been higher. For a portion of the period the fund had expenses limitations, without which returns would be lower. 



Objective
The fund seeks as high a rate of current income as we believe is consistent with preservation of capital and maintenance of liquidity.


Fund facts
as of 06/30/17





Fiscal year end
July


Asset Class
Taxable Income


Inception date

10/17/11



Total net assets

$6,575.30M



Dividend frequency
Monthly


View distribution rate
 


Number of issuers
207



Open to new investors



CUSIP

74676P755



Fund code

0078



Turnover (fiscal year end)

51%



Ticker

PSDTX







Literature


Prospectuses/SAI


Fact Sheet (A share) (PDF)


Fact Sheet (Y share) (PDF)


Monthly Fact Sheet (PDF)


Annual Fund Report (PDF)


Semiannual Fund Report (PDF)


Brochure (PDF)


Full holdings (PDF)




Related topics


Putnam's Tax Center


Perspectives


Quarterly commentary (PDF)







Performance

Total return (%) as of 06/30/17


Annual

Cumulative





Annualized performance
1 yr.
3 yrs.
5 yrs.
Life (inception: 10/17/11
)




Before sales charge

1.14%


0.65%


0.71%


0.69%



After sales charge

1.14%


0.65%


0.71%


0.69%



BofA Merrill Lynch U.S. Treasury Bill Index

0.46%

0.26%

0.20%
-- 







Cumulative performance
1 yr.
3 yrs.
5 yrs.
Life




Before sales charge

1.14%


1.97%


3.62%


4.00%



After sales charge

1.14%


1.97%


3.62%


4.00%







Class A shares do not carry an initial charge or, generally, a contingent deferred sales charge. Redemptions of shares that had been exchanged from another fund may be subject to a CDSC. See disclosure below.


Annual performance as of 06/30/17




 
 2012

 2013

 2014

 2015

 2016





Before sales charge

0.94%


0.59%


0.51%


0.27%


0.98%



BofA Merrill Lynch U.S. Treasury Bill Index

0.12%


0.09%


0.06%


0.09%


0.37%






 Current performance may be lower or higher than the quoted past performance, which cannot guarantee future results. Share price, principal value, and return will vary, and you may have a gain or a loss when you sell your shares. To obtain the most recent month-end performance, visit putnam.com.
Performance assumes reinvestment of distributions and does not account for taxes. Class A, M, and R shares have no initial sales charge. Class A and M shares generally have no contingent deferred sales charge (CDSC). However, a CDSC may apply to redemptions of class A shares obtained by exchanging shares from another Putnam fund that were originally purchased without an initial sales charge. This CDSC applies if the shares are redeemed within nine months of the original purchase. A CDSC on class M shares may apply to redemptions of shares from certain rollover accounts. See the prospectus for details. Class B and C shares do not carry a CDSC. Class Y shares, available to investors through an asset-based fee program or for institutional clients, are sold without an initial sales charge and have no CDSC. Class R5/R6 shares, available to qualified employee-benefit plans only, are sold without an initial sales charge and have no CDSC.  Performance for Class R5/R6 shares before their inception are derived from the historical performance of class Y shares, which have not been adjusted for the lower expenses; had they, returns would have been higher. For a portion of the period the fund had expenses limitations, without which returns would be lower. 



Performance snapshot




 
Before sales charge
After sales charge




1 mt.

0.10
%

0.10
%


as of 06/30/17


YTD

0.80
%

0.80
%


as of 07/26/17






Yield




Distribution rate before sales chargeas of 07/26/17

1.25%



Distribution rate after sales chargeas of 07/26/17

1.25%



30-day SEC yield with subsidyas of 06/30/17 (after sales charge)

1.07%



30-day SEC yield without subsidyas of 06/30/17 (after sales charge)

0.93%








Morningstar ratings as of 06/30/17




Ultrashort Bond
Rating
Number of funds in category




Overall



3


(134)



3 yrs.



3


(134)



5 yrs.



3


(101)






Distributions




Accrual days
30


Accrual start date
06/01/17


Accrual end date
06/30/17


Payable date
06/30/17


Income

$0.010218373



Extra taxable income

$0.0



Dividend frequency
Monthly






Volatility as of
06/30/17





Standard deviation (3 yrs.)

0.20%



Beta

1.01



R-squared

0.16







Risk-adjusted performance as of
06/30/17





Sharpe ratio (3 yrs.)

2.34



Information ratio (3 yrs.)

2.12








Lipper rankings are based on total return without sales charge
relative to all share classes of funds with similar objectives as
determined by Lipper. Past performance is not indicative of future
results.


The Morningstar RatingTM for funds, or "star rating", is calculated for managed products (including mutual funds, variable annuity and variable life subaccounts, exchange-traded funds, closed-end funds, and separate accounts) with at least a three-year history. Exchange-traded funds and open-ended mutual funds are considered a single population for comparative purposes. It is calculated based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation in a managed product's monthly excess performance, placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent performance. The top 10% of products in each product category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star. The Overall Morningstar Rating for a managed product is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with its three-, five-, and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating metrics. The weights are: 100% three-year rating for 36-59 months of total returns, 60% five-year rating/40% three-year rating for 60-119 months of total returns, and 50% 10-year rating/30% five-year rating/20% three-year rating for 120 or more months of total returns. While the 10-year overall star rating formula seems to give the most weight to the 10-year period, the most recent three-year period actually has the greatest impact because it is included in all three rating periods.


The up-market capture ratio is used to evaluate how well an investment manager performed relative to an index during periods when that index has risen. The ratio is
calculated by dividing the manager’s returns by the returns of the index during the up-market, and multiplying that factor by 100. The down-market capture ratio
is used to evaluate how well an investment manager performed relative to an index during periods when that index has dropped. The ratio is calculated by dividing the
manager’s returns by the returns of the index during the down-market and multiplying that factor by 100.



Holdings

Top 10 issuers as of 06/30/17




JPMorgan Chase

1.07%



 





Rabobank

1.06%



 





Citigroup

1.05%



 





Nordea Bank

1.05%



 





Berkshire Hathaway

1.04%



 





Australia & New Zealand Banking Group

1.04%



 





Bank of America

1.02%



 





Wells Fargo

1.02%



 





Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce

1.01%



 





Bank Of Montreal

1.01%



 





Top 10 issuers, percent of portfolio

10.37%



 








 | Prior top 10 issuers


Full portfolio holdings







Prior top 10 issuers



Top 10 issuers as of 06/30/17




JPMorgan Chase


Rabobank


Citigroup


Nordea Bank


Berkshire Hathaway


Australia & New Zealand Banking Group


Bank of America


Wells Fargo


Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce


Bank Of Montreal




Issuers represent
10.37%
of portfolio






Top 10 issuers as of 05/31/17




Rabobank


Nordea Bank


Australia & New Zealand Banking Group


Danske Bank


Citigroup


Royal Bank Of Canada


Wells Fargo


Barclays


PNC Bank


Canadian Imperial Bank Comm




Issuers represent
10.93%
of portfolio






Top 10 issuers as of 04/30/17




Canadian Imperial Bank Comm


Royal Bank Of Canada


Simon Property Group


Berkshire Hathaway


Bb&T Corporation


JPMorgan Chase


Wells Fargo


Citigroup


Commonwealth Bank


NRW Bank




Issuers represent
10.66%
of portfolio






Top 10 issuers as of 03/31/17




Simon Property Group


Royal Bank Of Canada


Bb&T Corporation


Nordea Bank


Citigroup


Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce


Wells Fargo


Westpac Banking


Bank of America


Australia New Zealand Banking Group




Issuers represent
10.56%
of portfolio






Portfolio composition as of 06/30/17





Investment-grade corporate bonds


45.79%



 






Commercial paper


43.36%



 






Certificates of deposit


5.04%



 






Asset-backed commercial paper


3.01%



 






Residential MBS (non-agency)


1.57%



 






Agency CMO


1.21%



 






Asset-backed securities (ABS)


0.60%



 






Agency pass-through


0.01%



 






Net cash


-0.59%



 









Fixed income statistics as of 06/30/17



Average effective maturity

0.86
yrs.


Average effective duration

0.14
yrs.


Average yield to maturity

1.55%



Average coupon

1.12%



Average price

$100.35






Quality rating as of 06/30/17



A-1+

6.60%



A-1

10.14%



A-2

30.21%



A-3

4.45%



AAA

1.60%



AA

14.69%



A

27.50%



BBB

5.30%



Not Rated

0.10%



Net cash

-0.59%









Country Allocation
 as of 06/30/17





United States

63.49%



Canada

8.98%



Netherlands

5.08%



Australia

5.08%



United Kingdom

4.35%



Sweden

3.04%



France

2.53%



Japan

2.36%



Luxembourg

1.47%



 Other

3.62%







Germany

1.45%



Denmark

0.86%



Spain

0.65%



Ireland

0.27%



Norway

0.26%



Switzerland

0.13%





0



Fund characteristics will vary over time.
Due to rounding, percentages may not equal 100%.


 Current performance may be lower or higher than the quoted past performance, which cannot guarantee future results. Share price, principal value, and return will vary, and you may have a gain or a loss when you sell your shares. To obtain the most recent month-end performance, visit putnam.com.
Performance assumes reinvestment of distributions and does not account for taxes. Class A, M, and R shares have no initial sales charge. Class A and M shares generally have no contingent deferred sales charge (CDSC). However, a CDSC may apply to redemptions of class A shares obtained by exchanging shares from another Putnam fund that were originally purchased without an initial sales charge. This CDSC applies if the shares are redeemed within nine months of the original purchase. A CDSC on class M shares may apply to redemptions of shares from certain rollover accounts. See the prospectus for details. Class B and C shares do not carry a CDSC. Class Y shares, available to investors through an asset-based fee program or for institutional clients, are sold without an initial sales charge and have no CDSC. Class R5/R6 shares, available to qualified employee-benefit plans only, are sold without an initial sales charge and have no CDSC.  Performance for Class R5/R6 shares before their inception are derived from the historical performance of class Y shares, which have not been adjusted for the lower expenses; had they, returns would have been higher. For a portion of the period the fund had expenses limitations, without which returns would be lower. 


Expenses






Expense ratio
Class A
Class B
Class C
Class M
Class R
Class R6
Class Y




Total expense ratio

0.55%


0.95%


0.95%


0.60%


0.95%


0.44%


0.45%



What you pay†

0.40%


0.80%


0.80%


0.45%


0.80%


0.29%


0.30%






† The fund's expense ratio is taken from the most recent prospectus and is subject to change. What you pay reflects Putnam Management's decision to contractually limit expenses through
11/30/17



Sales chargePutnam Short Duration Income Fund has no up-front sales charge.




Investment Breakpoint
Class A
Class B
Class C
Class M
Class R
Class R6
Class Y




$0-$49,999
 --

 --

 --

 --

 --

 --

 --



$50,000-$99,999
 --

 --

 --

 --

 --

 --

 --



$100,000-$249,999
 --

 --

 --

 --

 --

 --

 --



$250,000-$499,999
 --

 --

 --

 --

 --

 --

 --



$500,000-$999,999
 --

 --

 --

 --

 --

 --

 --



$1M-$4M
 --

 --

 --

 --

 --

 --

 --



$4M-$50M
 --

 --

 --

 --

 --

 --

 --



$50M+
 --

 --

 --

 --

 --

 --

 --







CDSC †Putnam Short Duration Income Fund has no redemption fees except under certain circumstances.




 

Class A


Class B


Class C


Class M


Class R


Class R6


Class Y





0 to 9 mts.

1.00%


5.00%


1.00%


0.15%

 --

 --

 --



9 to 12 mts.

0.00%


5.00%


1.00%


0.15%

 --

 --

 --



2 yrs.
 --


4.00%


0.00%

 --

 --

 --

 --



3 yrs.
 --


3.00%


0.00%

 --

 --

 --

 --



4 yrs.
 --


3.00%


0.00%

 --

 --

 --

 --



5 yrs.
 --


2.00%


0.00%

 --

 --

 --

 --



6 yrs.
 --


1.00%


0.00%

 --

 --

 --

 --



7+ yrs.
 --


0.00%


0.00%

 --

 --

 --

 --






† A deferred sales charge on class A, B and C shares may apply to certain redemptions of shares purchased by exchange from another Putnam fund. A deferred sales charge on class M shares may
apply to redemptions of shares from certain rollover accounts.






The BofA Merrill Lynch U.S. Treasury Bill Index is an unmanaged index that tracks the performance of U.S. dollar denominated U.S. Treasury Bills publicly issued in the U.S. domestic market. Qualifying securities must have a remaining term of at least one month to final maturity and a minimum amount outstanding of $1 billion. You cannot invest directly in an index.
 Consider these risks before investing: Putnam Short Duration Income Fund is not a money market fund. The effects of inflation may erode the value of your investment over time. Funds that invest in government securities are not guaranteed. Mortgage-backed investments, unlike traditional debt investments, are also subject to prepayment risk, which means that they may increase in value less than other bonds when interest rates decline and decline in value more than other bonds when interest rates rise. We may have to invest the proceeds from prepaid investments, including mortgage backed investments, in other investments with less attractive terms and yields. Bond prices may fall or fail to rise over time for several reasons, including general financial market conditions, changing market perceptions of the risk of default, changes in government intervention, and factors related to a specific issuer or industry. These factors may also lead to periods of high volatility and reduced liquidity in the bond markets. Bond investments are subject to interest-rate risk (the risk of bond prices falling if interest rates rise) and credit risk (the risk of an issuer defaulting on interest or principal payments). Interest-rate risk is greater for longer-term bonds, and credit risk is greater for below-investment-grade bonds. Credit risk is generally greater for debt not backed by the full faith and credit of the U.S. government. Risks associated with derivatives include increased investment exposure (which may be considered leverage) and, in the case of over-the-counter instruments, the potential inability to terminate or sell derivatives positions and the potential failure of the other party to the instrument to meet its obligations. Unlike bonds, funds that invest in bonds have fees and expenses. You can lose money by investing in the fund.
Credit qualities are shown as a percentage of net assets as of the date indicated above. A bond rated BBB or higher (A-3/SP-3 or higher, for short-term debt) is considered investment grade. This chart reflects the highest security rating provided by one or more of Standard & Poor's, Moody's, and Fitch. Ratings and portfolio credit quality will vary over time. Derivative instruments are only included to the extent of any unrealized gain or loss on such instruments and are shown in the cash and net other assets category. The fund itself has not been rated by an independent rating agency. The `Cash and net other assets` category may show a negative market value percentage as a result of the timing of trade date versus settlement date transactions.






















 



Putnam Short Duration Income Fund (PSDTX) - Putnam Investments



































Putnam Investments - Individual Investors


Login
About Putnam
Contact Us










 



Email
Facebook
Twitter
Google+
LinkedIn


Home
Mutual funds




Select another fund:
Absolute Return 100 Fund
Absolute Return 300 Fund
Absolute Return 500 Fund
Absolute Return 700 Fund
American Government Income Fund
AMT-Free Municipal Fund
California Tax Exempt Income Fund
Capital Opportunities Fund
Capital Spectrum Fund
Convertible Securities Fund
Diversified Income Trust
Dynamic Asset Allocation Balanced Fund
Dynamic Asset Allocation Conservative Fund
Dynamic Asset Allocation Growth Fund
Dynamic Risk Allocation Fund
Emerging Markets Equity Fund
Emerging Markets Income Fund
Equity Income Fund
Equity Spectrum Fund
Europe Equity Fund
Floating Rate Income Fund
George Putnam Balanced Fund
Global Consumer Fund
Global Equity Fund
Global Financials Fund
Global Health Care Fund
Global Income Trust
Global Industrials Fund
Global Natural Resources Fund
Global Sector Fund
Global Technology Fund
Global Telecommunications Fund
Global Utilities Fund
Government Money Market Fund
Growth Opportunities Fund
High Yield Fund
Income Fund
Intermediate-Term Municipal Income Fund
International Capital Opportunities Fund
International Equity Fund
International Growth Fund
International Value Fund
Investors Fund
Low Volatility Equity Fund
Massachusetts Tax Exempt Income Fund
Minnesota Tax Exempt Income Fund
Money Market Fund
Multi-Cap Core Fund
Multi-Cap Growth Fund
Multi-Cap Value Fund
New Jersey Tax Exempt Income Fund
New York Tax Exempt Income Fund
Ohio Tax Exempt Income Fund
Pennsylvania Tax Exempt Income Fund
Research Fund
Retirement Income Fund Lifestyle 1
RetirementReady 2020 Fund
RetirementReady 2025 Fund
RetirementReady 2030 Fund
RetirementReady 2035 Fund
RetirementReady 2040 Fund
RetirementReady 2045 Fund
RetirementReady 2050 Fund
RetirementReady 2055 Fund
RetirementReady 2060 Fund
Short Duration Income Fund
Short-Term Municipal Income Fund
Small Cap Growth Fund
Small Cap Value Fund
Tax Exempt Income Fund
Tax-Free High Yield Fund
U.S. Government Income Trust




Class A
Class B
Class C
Class M
Class R
Class R6
Class Y









Short Duration Income Fund (PSDTX)

 Seeking capital preservation and a higher rate of current income





Highlights
Performance
Holdings
Expenses


Summary




Fund price
Yesterday's close
52-week high
52-week low




Net asset value

$10.06

0.00%
(
$0.00
)

$10.06

(07/13/17)


$10.04

(10/25/16)





 Historical







On:





Please select a valid start date

to:





Please select a valid date
(Optional)

Get prices


 



Management team






(pictured left to right)
Michael V. Salm (industry since 1989)Joanne M. Driscoll, CFA (industry since 1992)Emily E. Shanks (industry since 1999)




Strategy and process

A broader opportunity set: The fund invests in a diversified portfolio composed of short duration, investment-grade money market and other fixed-income securities.
Active risk management: In today's complex bond market, the fund's experienced managers actively manage risk with the goal of superior risk-adjusted performance over time.
Higher income potential: Access to a wider range of income opportunities means the fund may offer higher income potential than other short-term investments.



 Current performance may be lower or higher than the quoted past performance, which cannot guarantee future results. Share price, principal value, and return will vary, and you may have a gain or a loss when you sell your shares. To obtain the most recent month-end performance, visit putnam.com.
Performance assumes reinvestment of distributions and does not account for taxes. Class A, M, and R shares have no initial sales charge. Class A and M shares generally have no contingent deferred sales charge (CDSC). However, a CDSC may apply to redemptions of class A shares obtained by exchanging shares from another Putnam fund that were originally purchased without an initial sales charge. This CDSC applies if the shares are redeemed within nine months of the original purchase. A CDSC on class M shares may apply to redemptions of shares from certain rollover accounts. See the prospectus for details. Class B and C shares do not carry a CDSC. Class Y shares, available to investors through an asset-based fee program or for institutional clients, are sold without an initial sales charge and have no CDSC. Class R5/R6 shares, available to qualified employee-benefit plans only, are sold without an initial sales charge and have no CDSC.  Performance for Class R5/R6 shares before their inception are derived from the historical performance of class Y shares, which have not been adjusted for the lower expenses; had they, returns would have been higher. For a portion of the period the fund had expenses limitations, without which returns would be lower. 



Objective
The fund seeks as high a rate of current income as we believe is consistent with preservation of capital and maintenance of liquidity.


Fund facts
as of 06/30/17





Fiscal year end
July


Asset Class
Taxable Income


Inception date

10/17/11



Total net assets

$6,575.30M



Dividend frequency
Monthly


View distribution rate
 


Number of issuers
207



Open to new investors



CUSIP

74676P755



Fund code

0078



Turnover (fiscal year end)

51%



Ticker

PSDTX







Literature


Prospectuses/SAI


Fact Sheet (A share) (PDF)


Fact Sheet (Y share) (PDF)


Monthly Fact Sheet (PDF)


Annual Fund Report (PDF)


Semiannual Fund Report (PDF)


Brochure (PDF)


Full holdings (PDF)




Related topics


Putnam's Tax Center


Perspectives


Quarterly commentary (PDF)







Performance

Total return (%) as of 06/30/17


Annual

Cumulative





Annualized performance
1 yr.
3 yrs.
5 yrs.
Life (inception: 10/17/11
)




Before sales charge

1.14%


0.65%


0.71%


0.69%



After sales charge

1.14%


0.65%


0.71%


0.69%



BofA Merrill Lynch U.S. Treasury Bill Index

0.46%

0.26%

0.20%
-- 







Cumulative performance
1 yr.
3 yrs.
5 yrs.
Life




Before sales charge

1.14%


1.97%


3.62%


4.00%



After sales charge

1.14%


1.97%


3.62%


4.00%







Class A shares do not carry an initial charge or, generally, a contingent deferred sales charge. Redemptions of shares that had been exchanged from another fund may be subject to a CDSC. See disclosure below.


Annual performance as of 06/30/17




 
 2012

 2013

 2014

 2015

 2016





Before sales charge

0.94%


0.59%


0.51%


0.27%


0.98%



BofA Merrill Lynch U.S. Treasury Bill Index

0.12%


0.09%


0.06%


0.09%


0.37%






 Current performance may be lower or higher than the quoted past performance, which cannot guarantee future results. Share price, principal value, and return will vary, and you may have a gain or a loss when you sell your shares. To obtain the most recent month-end performance, visit putnam.com.
Performance assumes reinvestment of distributions and does not account for taxes. Class A, M, and R shares have no initial sales charge. Class A and M shares generally have no contingent deferred sales charge (CDSC). However, a CDSC may apply to redemptions of class A shares obtained by exchanging shares from another Putnam fund that were originally purchased without an initial sales charge. This CDSC applies if the shares are redeemed within nine months of the original purchase. A CDSC on class M shares may apply to redemptions of shares from certain rollover accounts. See the prospectus for details. Class B and C shares do not carry a CDSC. Class Y shares, available to investors through an asset-based fee program or for institutional clients, are sold without an initial sales charge and have no CDSC. Class R5/R6 shares, available to qualified employee-benefit plans only, are sold without an initial sales charge and have no CDSC.  Performance for Class R5/R6 shares before their inception are derived from the historical performance of class Y shares, which have not been adjusted for the lower expenses; had they, returns would have been higher. For a portion of the period the fund had expenses limitations, without which returns would be lower. 



Performance snapshot




 
Before sales charge
After sales charge




1 mt.

0.10
%

0.10
%


as of 06/30/17


YTD

0.80
%

0.80
%


as of 07/26/17






Yield




Distribution rate before sales chargeas of 07/26/17

1.25%



Distribution rate after sales chargeas of 07/26/17

1.25%



30-day SEC yield with subsidyas of 06/30/17 (after sales charge)

1.07%



30-day SEC yield without subsidyas of 06/30/17 (after sales charge)

0.93%








Morningstar ratings as of 06/30/17




Ultrashort Bond
Rating
Number of funds in category




Overall



3


(134)



3 yrs.



3


(134)



5 yrs.



3


(101)






Distributions




Accrual days
30


Accrual start date
06/01/17


Accrual end date
06/30/17


Payable date
06/30/17


Income

$0.010218373



Extra taxable income

$0.0



Dividend frequency
Monthly






Volatility as of
06/30/17





Standard deviation (3 yrs.)

0.20%



Beta

1.01



R-squared

0.16







Risk-adjusted performance as of
06/30/17





Sharpe ratio (3 yrs.)

2.34



Information ratio (3 yrs.)

2.12








Lipper rankings are based on total return without sales charge
relative to all share classes of funds with similar objectives as
determined by Lipper. Past performance is not indicative of future
results.


The Morningstar RatingTM for funds, or "star rating", is calculated for managed products (including mutual funds, variable annuity and variable life subaccounts, exchange-traded funds, closed-end funds, and separate accounts) with at least a three-year history. Exchange-traded funds and open-ended mutual funds are considered a single population for comparative purposes. It is calculated based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation in a managed product's monthly excess performance, placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent performance. The top 10% of products in each product category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star. The Overall Morningstar Rating for a managed product is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with its three-, five-, and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating metrics. The weights are: 100% three-year rating for 36-59 months of total returns, 60% five-year rating/40% three-year rating for 60-119 months of total returns, and 50% 10-year rating/30% five-year rating/20% three-year rating for 120 or more months of total returns. While the 10-year overall star rating formula seems to give the most weight to the 10-year period, the most recent three-year period actually has the greatest impact because it is included in all three rating periods.


The up-market capture ratio is used to evaluate how well an investment manager performed relative to an index during periods when that index has risen. The ratio is
calculated by dividing the manager’s returns by the returns of the index during the up-market, and multiplying that factor by 100. The down-market capture ratio
is used to evaluate how well an investment manager performed relative to an index during periods when that index has dropped. The ratio is calculated by dividing the
manager’s returns by the returns of the index during the down-market and multiplying that factor by 100.



Holdings

Top 10 issuers as of 06/30/17




JPMorgan Chase

1.07%



 





Rabobank

1.06%



 





Citigroup

1.05%



 





Nordea Bank

1.05%



 





Berkshire Hathaway

1.04%



 





Australia & New Zealand Banking Group

1.04%



 





Bank of America

1.02%



 





Wells Fargo

1.02%



 





Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce

1.01%



 





Bank Of Montreal

1.01%



 





Top 10 issuers, percent of portfolio

10.37%



 








 | Prior top 10 issuers


Full portfolio holdings







Prior top 10 issuers



Top 10 issuers as of 06/30/17




JPMorgan Chase


Rabobank


Citigroup


Nordea Bank


Berkshire Hathaway


Australia & New Zealand Banking Group


Bank of America


Wells Fargo


Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce


Bank Of Montreal




Issuers represent
10.37%
of portfolio






Top 10 issuers as of 05/31/17




Rabobank


Nordea Bank


Australia & New Zealand Banking Group


Danske Bank


Citigroup


Royal Bank Of Canada


Wells Fargo


Barclays


PNC Bank


Canadian Imperial Bank Comm




Issuers represent
10.93%
of portfolio






Top 10 issuers as of 04/30/17




Canadian Imperial Bank Comm


Royal Bank Of Canada


Simon Property Group


Berkshire Hathaway


Bb&T Corporation


JPMorgan Chase


Wells Fargo


Citigroup


Commonwealth Bank


NRW Bank




Issuers represent
10.66%
of portfolio






Top 10 issuers as of 03/31/17




Simon Property Group


Royal Bank Of Canada


Bb&T Corporation


Nordea Bank


Citigroup


Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce


Wells Fargo


Westpac Banking


Bank of America


Australia New Zealand Banking Group




Issuers represent
10.56%
of portfolio






Portfolio composition as of 06/30/17





Investment-grade corporate bonds


45.79%



 






Commercial paper


43.36%



 






Certificates of deposit


5.04%



 






Asset-backed commercial paper


3.01%



 






Residential MBS (non-agency)


1.57%



 






Agency CMO


1.21%



 






Asset-backed securities (ABS)


0.60%



 






Agency pass-through


0.01%



 






Net cash


-0.59%



 









Fixed income statistics as of 06/30/17



Average effective maturity

0.86
yrs.


Average effective duration

0.14
yrs.


Average yield to maturity

1.55%



Average coupon

1.12%



Average price

$100.35






Quality rating as of 06/30/17



A-1+

6.60%



A-1

10.14%



A-2

30.21%



A-3

4.45%



AAA

1.60%



AA

14.69%



A

27.50%



BBB

5.30%



Not Rated

0.10%



Net cash

-0.59%









Country Allocation
 as of 06/30/17





United States

63.49%



Canada

8.98%



Netherlands

5.08%



Australia

5.08%



United Kingdom

4.35%



Sweden

3.04%



France

2.53%



Japan

2.36%



Luxembourg

1.47%



 Other

3.62%







Germany

1.45%



Denmark

0.86%



Spain

0.65%



Ireland

0.27%



Norway

0.26%



Switzerland

0.13%





0



Fund characteristics will vary over time.
Due to rounding, percentages may not equal 100%.


 Current performance may be lower or higher than the quoted past performance, which cannot guarantee future results. Share price, principal value, and return will vary, and you may have a gain or a loss when you sell your shares. To obtain the most recent month-end performance, visit putnam.com.
Performance assumes reinvestment of distributions and does not account for taxes. Class A, M, and R shares have no initial sales charge. Class A and M shares generally have no contingent deferred sales charge (CDSC). However, a CDSC may apply to redemptions of class A shares obtained by exchanging shares from another Putnam fund that were originally purchased without an initial sales charge. This CDSC applies if the shares are redeemed within nine months of the original purchase. A CDSC on class M shares may apply to redemptions of shares from certain rollover accounts. See the prospectus for details. Class B and C shares do not carry a CDSC. Class Y shares, available to investors through an asset-based fee program or for institutional clients, are sold without an initial sales charge and have no CDSC. Class R5/R6 shares, available to qualified employee-benefit plans only, are sold without an initial sales charge and have no CDSC.  Performance for Class R5/R6 shares before their inception are derived from the historical performance of class Y shares, which have not been adjusted for the lower expenses; had they, returns would have been higher. For a portion of the period the fund had expenses limitations, without which returns would be lower. 


Expenses






Expense ratio
Class A
Class B
Class C
Class M
Class R
Class R6
Class Y




Total expense ratio

0.55%


0.95%


0.95%


0.60%


0.95%


0.44%


0.45%



What you pay†

0.40%


0.80%


0.80%


0.45%


0.80%


0.29%


0.30%






† The fund's expense ratio is taken from the most recent prospectus and is subject to change. What you pay reflects Putnam Management's decision to contractually limit expenses through
11/30/17



Sales chargePutnam Short Duration Income Fund has no up-front sales charge.




Investment Breakpoint
Class A
Class B
Class C
Class M
Class R
Class R6
Class Y




$0-$49,999
 --

 --

 --

 --

 --

 --

 --



$50,000-$99,999
 --

 --

 --

 --

 --

 --

 --



$100,000-$249,999
 --

 --

 --

 --

 --

 --

 --



$250,000-$499,999
 --

 --

 --

 --

 --

 --

 --



$500,000-$999,999
 --

 --

 --

 --

 --

 --

 --



$1M-$4M
 --

 --

 --

 --

 --

 --

 --



$4M-$50M
 --

 --

 --

 --

 --

 --

 --



$50M+
 --

 --

 --

 --

 --

 --

 --







CDSC †Putnam Short Duration Income Fund has no redemption fees except under certain circumstances.




 

Class A


Class B


Class C


Class M


Class R


Class R6


Class Y





0 to 9 mts.

1.00%


5.00%


1.00%


0.15%

 --

 --

 --



9 to 12 mts.

0.00%


5.00%


1.00%


0.15%

 --

 --

 --



2 yrs.
 --


4.00%


0.00%

 --

 --

 --

 --



3 yrs.
 --


3.00%


0.00%

 --

 --

 --

 --



4 yrs.
 --


3.00%


0.00%

 --

 --

 --

 --



5 yrs.
 --


2.00%


0.00%

 --

 --

 --

 --



6 yrs.
 --


1.00%


0.00%

 --

 --

 --

 --



7+ yrs.
 --


0.00%


0.00%

 --

 --

 --

 --






† A deferred sales charge on class A, B and C shares may apply to certain redemptions of shares purchased by exchange from another Putnam fund. A deferred sales charge on class M shares may
apply to redemptions of shares from certain rollover accounts.






The BofA Merrill Lynch U.S. Treasury Bill Index is an unmanaged index that tracks the performance of U.S. dollar denominated U.S. Treasury Bills publicly issued in the U.S. domestic market. Qualifying securities must have a remaining term of at least one month to final maturity and a minimum amount outstanding of $1 billion. You cannot invest directly in an index.
 Consider these risks before investing: Putnam Short Duration Income Fund is not a money market fund. The effects of inflation may erode the value of your investment over time. Funds that invest in government securities are not guaranteed. Mortgage-backed investments, unlike traditional debt investments, are also subject to prepayment risk, which means that they may increase in value less than other bonds when interest rates decline and decline in value more than other bonds when interest rates rise. We may have to invest the proceeds from prepaid investments, including mortgage backed investments, in other investments with less attractive terms and yields. Bond prices may fall or fail to rise over time for several reasons, including general financial market conditions, changing market perceptions of the risk of default, changes in government intervention, and factors related to a specific issuer or industry. These factors may also lead to periods of high volatility and reduced liquidity in the bond markets. Bond investments are subject to interest-rate risk (the risk of bond prices falling if interest rates rise) and credit risk (the risk of an issuer defaulting on interest or principal payments). Interest-rate risk is greater for longer-term bonds, and credit risk is greater for below-investment-grade bonds. Credit risk is generally greater for debt not backed by the full faith and credit of the U.S. government. Risks associated with derivatives include increased investment exposure (which may be considered leverage) and, in the case of over-the-counter instruments, the potential inability to terminate or sell derivatives positions and the potential failure of the other party to the instrument to meet its obligations. Unlike bonds, funds that invest in bonds have fees and expenses. You can lose money by investing in the fund.
Credit qualities are shown as a percentage of net assets as of the date indicated above. A bond rated BBB or higher (A-3/SP-3 or higher, for short-term debt) is considered investment grade. This chart reflects the highest security rating provided by one or more of Standard & Poor's, Moody's, and Fitch. Ratings and portfolio credit quality will vary over time. Derivative instruments are only included to the extent of any unrealized gain or loss on such instruments and are shown in the cash and net other assets category. The fund itself has not been rated by an independent rating agency. The `Cash and net other assets` category may show a negative market value percentage as a result of the timing of trade date versus settlement date transactions.






















 



Putnam Short Duration Income Fund (PSDTX) - Putnam Investments



































Putnam Investments - Individual Investors


Login
About Putnam
Contact Us










 



Email
Facebook
Twitter
Google+
LinkedIn


Home
Mutual funds




Select another fund:
Absolute Return 100 Fund
Absolute Return 300 Fund
Absolute Return 500 Fund
Absolute Return 700 Fund
American Government Income Fund
AMT-Free Municipal Fund
California Tax Exempt Income Fund
Capital Opportunities Fund
Capital Spectrum Fund
Convertible Securities Fund
Diversified Income Trust
Dynamic Asset Allocation Balanced Fund
Dynamic Asset Allocation Conservative Fund
Dynamic Asset Allocation Growth Fund
Dynamic Risk Allocation Fund
Emerging Markets Equity Fund
Emerging Markets Income Fund
Equity Income Fund
Equity Spectrum Fund
Europe Equity Fund
Floating Rate Income Fund
George Putnam Balanced Fund
Global Consumer Fund
Global Equity Fund
Global Financials Fund
Global Health Care Fund
Global Income Trust
Global Industrials Fund
Global Natural Resources Fund
Global Sector Fund
Global Technology Fund
Global Telecommunications Fund
Global Utilities Fund
Government Money Market Fund
Growth Opportunities Fund
High Yield Fund
Income Fund
Intermediate-Term Municipal Income Fund
International Capital Opportunities Fund
International Equity Fund
International Growth Fund
International Value Fund
Investors Fund
Low Volatility Equity Fund
Massachusetts Tax Exempt Income Fund
Minnesota Tax Exempt Income Fund
Money Market Fund
Multi-Cap Core Fund
Multi-Cap Growth Fund
Multi-Cap Value Fund
New Jersey Tax Exempt Income Fund
New York Tax Exempt Income Fund
Ohio Tax Exempt Income Fund
Pennsylvania Tax Exempt Income Fund
Research Fund
Retirement Income Fund Lifestyle 1
RetirementReady 2020 Fund
RetirementReady 2025 Fund
RetirementReady 2030 Fund
RetirementReady 2035 Fund
RetirementReady 2040 Fund
RetirementReady 2045 Fund
RetirementReady 2050 Fund
RetirementReady 2055 Fund
RetirementReady 2060 Fund
Short Duration Income Fund
Short-Term Municipal Income Fund
Small Cap Growth Fund
Small Cap Value Fund
Tax Exempt Income Fund
Tax-Free High Yield Fund
U.S. Government Income Trust




Class A
Class B
Class C
Class M
Class R
Class R6
Class Y









Short Duration Income Fund (PSDTX)

 Seeking capital preservation and a higher rate of current income





Highlights
Performance
Holdings
Expenses


Summary




Fund price
Yesterday's close
52-week high
52-week low




Net asset value

$10.06

0.00%
(
$0.00
)

$10.06

(07/13/17)


$10.04

(10/25/16)





 Historical







On:





Please select a valid start date

to:





Please select a valid date
(Optional)

Get prices


 



Management team






(pictured left to right)
Michael V. Salm (industry since 1989)Joanne M. Driscoll, CFA (industry since 1992)Emily E. Shanks (industry since 1999)




Strategy and process

A broader opportunity set: The fund invests in a diversified portfolio composed of short duration, investment-grade money market and other fixed-income securities.
Active risk management: In today's complex bond market, the fund's experienced managers actively manage risk with the goal of superior risk-adjusted performance over time.
Higher income potential: Access to a wider range of income opportunities means the fund may offer higher income potential than other short-term investments.



 Current performance may be lower or higher than the quoted past performance, which cannot guarantee future results. Share price, principal value, and return will vary, and you may have a gain or a loss when you sell your shares. To obtain the most recent month-end performance, visit putnam.com.
Performance assumes reinvestment of distributions and does not account for taxes. Class A, M, and R shares have no initial sales charge. Class A and M shares generally have no contingent deferred sales charge (CDSC). However, a CDSC may apply to redemptions of class A shares obtained by exchanging shares from another Putnam fund that were originally purchased without an initial sales charge. This CDSC applies if the shares are redeemed within nine months of the original purchase. A CDSC on class M shares may apply to redemptions of shares from certain rollover accounts. See the prospectus for details. Class B and C shares do not carry a CDSC. Class Y shares, available to investors through an asset-based fee program or for institutional clients, are sold without an initial sales charge and have no CDSC. Class R5/R6 shares, available to qualified employee-benefit plans only, are sold without an initial sales charge and have no CDSC.  Performance for Class R5/R6 shares before their inception are derived from the historical performance of class Y shares, which have not been adjusted for the lower expenses; had they, returns would have been higher. For a portion of the period the fund had expenses limitations, without which returns would be lower. 



Objective
The fund seeks as high a rate of current income as we believe is consistent with preservation of capital and maintenance of liquidity.


Fund facts
as of 06/30/17





Fiscal year end
July


Asset Class
Taxable Income


Inception date

10/17/11



Total net assets

$6,575.30M



Dividend frequency
Monthly


View distribution rate
 


Number of issuers
207



Open to new investors



CUSIP

74676P755



Fund code

0078



Turnover (fiscal year end)

51%



Ticker

PSDTX







Literature


Prospectuses/SAI


Fact Sheet (A share) (PDF)


Fact Sheet (Y share) (PDF)


Monthly Fact Sheet (PDF)


Annual Fund Report (PDF)


Semiannual Fund Report (PDF)


Brochure (PDF)


Full holdings (PDF)




Related topics


Putnam's Tax Center


Perspectives


Quarterly commentary (PDF)







Performance

Total return (%) as of 06/30/17


Annual

Cumulative





Annualized performance
1 yr.
3 yrs.
5 yrs.
Life (inception: 10/17/11
)




Before sales charge

1.14%


0.65%


0.71%


0.69%



After sales charge

1.14%


0.65%


0.71%


0.69%



BofA Merrill Lynch U.S. Treasury Bill Index

0.46%

0.26%

0.20%
-- 







Cumulative performance
1 yr.
3 yrs.
5 yrs.
Life




Before sales charge

1.14%


1.97%


3.62%


4.00%



After sales charge

1.14%


1.97%


3.62%


4.00%







Class A shares do not carry an initial charge or, generally, a contingent deferred sales charge. Redemptions of shares that had been exchanged from another fund may be subject to a CDSC. See disclosure below.


Annual performance as of 06/30/17




 
 2012

 2013

 2014

 2015

 2016





Before sales charge

0.94%


0.59%


0.51%


0.27%


0.98%



BofA Merrill Lynch U.S. Treasury Bill Index

0.12%


0.09%


0.06%


0.09%


0.37%






 Current performance may be lower or higher than the quoted past performance, which cannot guarantee future results. Share price, principal value, and return will vary, and you may have a gain or a loss when you sell your shares. To obtain the most recent month-end performance, visit putnam.com.
Performance assumes reinvestment of distributions and does not account for taxes. Class A, M, and R shares have no initial sales charge. Class A and M shares generally have no contingent deferred sales charge (CDSC). However, a CDSC may apply to redemptions of class A shares obtained by exchanging shares from another Putnam fund that were originally purchased without an initial sales charge. This CDSC applies if the shares are redeemed within nine months of the original purchase. A CDSC on class M shares may apply to redemptions of shares from certain rollover accounts. See the prospectus for details. Class B and C shares do not carry a CDSC. Class Y shares, available to investors through an asset-based fee program or for institutional clients, are sold without an initial sales charge and have no CDSC. Class R5/R6 shares, available to qualified employee-benefit plans only, are sold without an initial sales charge and have no CDSC.  Performance for Class R5/R6 shares before their inception are derived from the historical performance of class Y shares, which have not been adjusted for the lower expenses; had they, returns would have been higher. For a portion of the period the fund had expenses limitations, without which returns would be lower. 



Performance snapshot




 
Before sales charge
After sales charge




1 mt.

0.10
%

0.10
%


as of 06/30/17


YTD

0.80
%

0.80
%


as of 07/26/17






Yield




Distribution rate before sales chargeas of 07/26/17

1.25%



Distribution rate after sales chargeas of 07/26/17

1.25%



30-day SEC yield with subsidyas of 06/30/17 (after sales charge)

1.07%



30-day SEC yield without subsidyas of 06/30/17 (after sales charge)

0.93%








Morningstar ratings as of 06/30/17




Ultrashort Bond
Rating
Number of funds in category




Overall



3


(134)



3 yrs.



3


(134)



5 yrs.



3


(101)






Distributions




Accrual days
30


Accrual start date
06/01/17


Accrual end date
06/30/17


Payable date
06/30/17


Income

$0.010218373



Extra taxable income

$0.0



Dividend frequency
Monthly






Volatility as of
06/30/17





Standard deviation (3 yrs.)

0.20%



Beta

1.01



R-squared

0.16







Risk-adjusted performance as of
06/30/17





Sharpe ratio (3 yrs.)

2.34



Information ratio (3 yrs.)

2.12








Lipper rankings are based on total return without sales charge
relative to all share classes of funds with similar objectives as
determined by Lipper. Past performance is not indicative of future
results.


The Morningstar RatingTM for funds, or "star rating", is calculated for managed products (including mutual funds, variable annuity and variable life subaccounts, exchange-traded funds, closed-end funds, and separate accounts) with at least a three-year history. Exchange-traded funds and open-ended mutual funds are considered a single population for comparative purposes. It is calculated based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation in a managed product's monthly excess performance, placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent performance. The top 10% of products in each product category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star. The Overall Morningstar Rating for a managed product is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with its three-, five-, and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating metrics. The weights are: 100% three-year rating for 36-59 months of total returns, 60% five-year rating/40% three-year rating for 60-119 months of total returns, and 50% 10-year rating/30% five-year rating/20% three-year rating for 120 or more months of total returns. While the 10-year overall star rating formula seems to give the most weight to the 10-year period, the most recent three-year period actually has the greatest impact because it is included in all three rating periods.


The up-market capture ratio is used to evaluate how well an investment manager performed relative to an index during periods when that index has risen. The ratio is
calculated by dividing the manager’s returns by the returns of the index during the up-market, and multiplying that factor by 100. The down-market capture ratio
is used to evaluate how well an investment manager performed relative to an index during periods when that index has dropped. The ratio is calculated by dividing the
manager’s returns by the returns of the index during the down-market and multiplying that factor by 100.



Holdings

Top 10 issuers as of 06/30/17




JPMorgan Chase

1.07%



 





Rabobank

1.06%



 





Citigroup

1.05%



 





Nordea Bank

1.05%



 





Berkshire Hathaway

1.04%



 





Australia & New Zealand Banking Group

1.04%



 





Bank of America

1.02%



 





Wells Fargo

1.02%



 





Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce

1.01%



 





Bank Of Montreal

1.01%



 





Top 10 issuers, percent of portfolio

10.37%



 








 | Prior top 10 issuers


Full portfolio holdings







Prior top 10 issuers



Top 10 issuers as of 06/30/17




JPMorgan Chase


Rabobank


Citigroup


Nordea Bank


Berkshire Hathaway


Australia & New Zealand Banking Group


Bank of America


Wells Fargo


Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce


Bank Of Montreal




Issuers represent
10.37%
of portfolio






Top 10 issuers as of 05/31/17




Rabobank


Nordea Bank


Australia & New Zealand Banking Group


Danske Bank


Citigroup


Royal Bank Of Canada


Wells Fargo


Barclays


PNC Bank


Canadian Imperial Bank Comm




Issuers represent
10.93%
of portfolio






Top 10 issuers as of 04/30/17




Canadian Imperial Bank Comm


Royal Bank Of Canada


Simon Property Group


Berkshire Hathaway


Bb&T Corporation


JPMorgan Chase


Wells Fargo


Citigroup


Commonwealth Bank


NRW Bank




Issuers represent
10.66%
of portfolio






Top 10 issuers as of 03/31/17




Simon Property Group


Royal Bank Of Canada


Bb&T Corporation


Nordea Bank


Citigroup


Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce


Wells Fargo


Westpac Banking


Bank of America


Australia New Zealand Banking Group




Issuers represent
10.56%
of portfolio






Portfolio composition as of 06/30/17





Investment-grade corporate bonds


45.79%



 






Commercial paper


43.36%



 






Certificates of deposit


5.04%



 






Asset-backed commercial paper


3.01%



 






Residential MBS (non-agency)


1.57%



 






Agency CMO


1.21%



 






Asset-backed securities (ABS)


0.60%



 






Agency pass-through


0.01%



 






Net cash


-0.59%



 









Fixed income statistics as of 06/30/17



Average effective maturity

0.86
yrs.


Average effective duration

0.14
yrs.


Average yield to maturity

1.55%



Average coupon

1.12%



Average price

$100.35






Quality rating as of 06/30/17



A-1+

6.60%



A-1

10.14%



A-2

30.21%



A-3

4.45%



AAA

1.60%



AA

14.69%



A

27.50%



BBB

5.30%



Not Rated

0.10%



Net cash

-0.59%









Country Allocation
 as of 06/30/17





United States

63.49%



Canada

8.98%



Netherlands

5.08%



Australia

5.08%



United Kingdom

4.35%



Sweden

3.04%



France

2.53%



Japan

2.36%



Luxembourg

1.47%



 Other

3.62%







Germany

1.45%



Denmark

0.86%



Spain

0.65%



Ireland

0.27%



Norway

0.26%



Switzerland

0.13%





0



Fund characteristics will vary over time.
Due to rounding, percentages may not equal 100%.


 Current performance may be lower or higher than the quoted past performance, which cannot guarantee future results. Share price, principal value, and return will vary, and you may have a gain or a loss when you sell your shares. To obtain the most recent month-end performance, visit putnam.com.
Performance assumes reinvestment of distributions and does not account for taxes. Class A, M, and R shares have no initial sales charge. Class A and M shares generally have no contingent deferred sales charge (CDSC). However, a CDSC may apply to redemptions of class A shares obtained by exchanging shares from another Putnam fund that were originally purchased without an initial sales charge. This CDSC applies if the shares are redeemed within nine months of the original purchase. A CDSC on class M shares may apply to redemptions of shares from certain rollover accounts. See the prospectus for details. Class B and C shares do not carry a CDSC. Class Y shares, available to investors through an asset-based fee program or for institutional clients, are sold without an initial sales charge and have no CDSC. Class R5/R6 shares, available to qualified employee-benefit plans only, are sold without an initial sales charge and have no CDSC.  Performance for Class R5/R6 shares before their inception are derived from the historical performance of class Y shares, which have not been adjusted for the lower expenses; had they, returns would have been higher. For a portion of the period the fund had expenses limitations, without which returns would be lower. 


Expenses






Expense ratio
Class A
Class B
Class C
Class M
Class R
Class R6
Class Y




Total expense ratio

0.55%


0.95%


0.95%


0.60%


0.95%


0.44%


0.45%



What you pay†

0.40%


0.80%


0.80%


0.45%


0.80%


0.29%


0.30%






† The fund's expense ratio is taken from the most recent prospectus and is subject to change. What you pay reflects Putnam Management's decision to contractually limit expenses through
11/30/17



Sales chargePutnam Short Duration Income Fund has no up-front sales charge.




Investment Breakpoint
Class A
Class B
Class C
Class M
Class R
Class R6
Class Y




$0-$49,999
 --

 --

 --

 --

 --

 --

 --



$50,000-$99,999
 --

 --

 --

 --

 --

 --

 --



$100,000-$249,999
 --

 --

 --

 --

 --

 --

 --



$250,000-$499,999
 --

 --

 --

 --

 --

 --

 --



$500,000-$999,999
 --

 --

 --

 --

 --

 --

 --



$1M-$4M
 --

 --

 --

 --

 --

 --

 --



$4M-$50M
 --

 --

 --

 --

 --

 --

 --



$50M+
 --

 --

 --

 --

 --

 --

 --







CDSC †Putnam Short Duration Income Fund has no redemption fees except under certain circumstances.




 

Class A


Class B


Class C


Class M


Class R


Class R6


Class Y





0 to 9 mts.

1.00%


5.00%


1.00%


0.15%

 --

 --

 --



9 to 12 mts.

0.00%


5.00%


1.00%


0.15%

 --

 --

 --



2 yrs.
 --


4.00%


0.00%

 --

 --

 --

 --



3 yrs.
 --


3.00%


0.00%

 --

 --

 --

 --



4 yrs.
 --


3.00%


0.00%

 --

 --

 --

 --



5 yrs.
 --


2.00%


0.00%

 --

 --

 --

 --



6 yrs.
 --


1.00%


0.00%

 --

 --

 --

 --



7+ yrs.
 --


0.00%


0.00%

 --

 --

 --

 --






† A deferred sales charge on class A, B and C shares may apply to certain redemptions of shares purchased by exchange from another Putnam fund. A deferred sales charge on class M shares may
apply to redemptions of shares from certain rollover accounts.






The BofA Merrill Lynch U.S. Treasury Bill Index is an unmanaged index that tracks the performance of U.S. dollar denominated U.S. Treasury Bills publicly issued in the U.S. domestic market. Qualifying securities must have a remaining term of at least one month to final maturity and a minimum amount outstanding of $1 billion. You cannot invest directly in an index.
 Consider these risks before investing: Putnam Short Duration Income Fund is not a money market fund. The effects of inflation may erode the value of your investment over time. Funds that invest in government securities are not guaranteed. Mortgage-backed investments, unlike traditional debt investments, are also subject to prepayment risk, which means that they may increase in value less than other bonds when interest rates decline and decline in value more than other bonds when interest rates rise. We may have to invest the proceeds from prepaid investments, including mortgage backed investments, in other investments with less attractive terms and yields. Bond prices may fall or fail to rise over time for several reasons, including general financial market conditions, changing market perceptions of the risk of default, changes in government intervention, and factors related to a specific issuer or industry. These factors may also lead to periods of high volatility and reduced liquidity in the bond markets. Bond investments are subject to interest-rate risk (the risk of bond prices falling if interest rates rise) and credit risk (the risk of an issuer defaulting on interest or principal payments). Interest-rate risk is greater for longer-term bonds, and credit risk is greater for below-investment-grade bonds. Credit risk is generally greater for debt not backed by the full faith and credit of the U.S. government. Risks associated with derivatives include increased investment exposure (which may be considered leverage) and, in the case of over-the-counter instruments, the potential inability to terminate or sell derivatives positions and the potential failure of the other party to the instrument to meet its obligations. Unlike bonds, funds that invest in bonds have fees and expenses. You can lose money by investing in the fund.
Credit qualities are shown as a percentage of net assets as of the date indicated above. A bond rated BBB or higher (A-3/SP-3 or higher, for short-term debt) is considered investment grade. This chart reflects the highest security rating provided by one or more of Standard & Poor's, Moody's, and Fitch. Ratings and portfolio credit quality will vary over time. Derivative instruments are only included to the extent of any unrealized gain or loss on such instruments and are shown in the cash and net other assets category. The fund itself has not been rated by an independent rating agency. The `Cash and net other assets` category may show a negative market value percentage as a result of the timing of trade date versus settlement date transactions.






















 



Putnam Short Duration Income Fund (PSDTX) - Putnam Investments



































Putnam Investments - Individual Investors


Login
About Putnam
Contact Us










 



Email
Facebook
Twitter
Google+
LinkedIn


Home
Mutual funds




Select another fund:
Absolute Return 100 Fund
Absolute Return 300 Fund
Absolute Return 500 Fund
Absolute Return 700 Fund
American Government Income Fund
AMT-Free Municipal Fund
California Tax Exempt Income Fund
Capital Opportunities Fund
Capital Spectrum Fund
Convertible Securities Fund
Diversified Income Trust
Dynamic Asset Allocation Balanced Fund
Dynamic Asset Allocation Conservative Fund
Dynamic Asset Allocation Growth Fund
Dynamic Risk Allocation Fund
Emerging Markets Equity Fund
Emerging Markets Income Fund
Equity Income Fund
Equity Spectrum Fund
Europe Equity Fund
Floating Rate Income Fund
George Putnam Balanced Fund
Global Consumer Fund
Global Equity Fund
Global Financials Fund
Global Health Care Fund
Global Income Trust
Global Industrials Fund
Global Natural Resources Fund
Global Sector Fund
Global Technology Fund
Global Telecommunications Fund
Global Utilities Fund
Government Money Market Fund
Growth Opportunities Fund
High Yield Fund
Income Fund
Intermediate-Term Municipal Income Fund
International Capital Opportunities Fund
International Equity Fund
International Growth Fund
International Value Fund
Investors Fund
Low Volatility Equity Fund
Massachusetts Tax Exempt Income Fund
Minnesota Tax Exempt Income Fund
Money Market Fund
Multi-Cap Core Fund
Multi-Cap Growth Fund
Multi-Cap Value Fund
New Jersey Tax Exempt Income Fund
New York Tax Exempt Income Fund
Ohio Tax Exempt Income Fund
Pennsylvania Tax Exempt Income Fund
Research Fund
Retirement Income Fund Lifestyle 1
RetirementReady 2020 Fund
RetirementReady 2025 Fund
RetirementReady 2030 Fund
RetirementReady 2035 Fund
RetirementReady 2040 Fund
RetirementReady 2045 Fund
RetirementReady 2050 Fund
RetirementReady 2055 Fund
RetirementReady 2060 Fund
Short Duration Income Fund
Short-Term Municipal Income Fund
Small Cap Growth Fund
Small Cap Value Fund
Tax Exempt Income Fund
Tax-Free High Yield Fund
U.S. Government Income Trust




Class A
Class B
Class C
Class M
Class R
Class R6
Class Y









Short Duration Income Fund (PSDTX)

 Seeking capital preservation and a higher rate of current income





Highlights
Performance
Holdings
Expenses


Summary




Fund price
Yesterday's close
52-week high
52-week low




Net asset value

$10.06

0.00%
(
$0.00
)

$10.06

(07/13/17)


$10.04

(10/25/16)





 Historical







On:





Please select a valid start date

to:





Please select a valid date
(Optional)

Get prices


 



Management team






(pictured left to right)
Michael V. Salm (industry since 1989)Joanne M. Driscoll, CFA (industry since 1992)Emily E. Shanks (industry since 1999)




Strategy and process

A broader opportunity set: The fund invests in a diversified portfolio composed of short duration, investment-grade money market and other fixed-income securities.
Active risk management: In today's complex bond market, the fund's experienced managers actively manage risk with the goal of superior risk-adjusted performance over time.
Higher income potential: Access to a wider range of income opportunities means the fund may offer higher income potential than other short-term investments.



 Current performance may be lower or higher than the quoted past performance, which cannot guarantee future results. Share price, principal value, and return will vary, and you may have a gain or a loss when you sell your shares. To obtain the most recent month-end performance, visit putnam.com.
Performance assumes reinvestment of distributions and does not account for taxes. Class A, M, and R shares have no initial sales charge. Class A and M shares generally have no contingent deferred sales charge (CDSC). However, a CDSC may apply to redemptions of class A shares obtained by exchanging shares from another Putnam fund that were originally purchased without an initial sales charge. This CDSC applies if the shares are redeemed within nine months of the original purchase. A CDSC on class M shares may apply to redemptions of shares from certain rollover accounts. See the prospectus for details. Class B and C shares do not carry a CDSC. Class Y shares, available to investors through an asset-based fee program or for institutional clients, are sold without an initial sales charge and have no CDSC. Class R5/R6 shares, available to qualified employee-benefit plans only, are sold without an initial sales charge and have no CDSC.  Performance for Class R5/R6 shares before their inception are derived from the historical performance of class Y shares, which have not been adjusted for the lower expenses; had they, returns would have been higher. For a portion of the period the fund had expenses limitations, without which returns would be lower. 



Objective
The fund seeks as high a rate of current income as we believe is consistent with preservation of capital and maintenance of liquidity.


Fund facts
as of 06/30/17





Fiscal year end
July


Asset Class
Taxable Income


Inception date

10/17/11



Total net assets

$6,575.30M



Dividend frequency
Monthly


View distribution rate
 


Number of issuers
207



Open to new investors



CUSIP

74676P755



Fund code

0078



Turnover (fiscal year end)

51%



Ticker

PSDTX







Literature


Prospectuses/SAI


Fact Sheet (A share) (PDF)


Fact Sheet (Y share) (PDF)


Monthly Fact Sheet (PDF)


Annual Fund Report (PDF)


Semiannual Fund Report (PDF)


Brochure (PDF)


Full holdings (PDF)




Related topics


Putnam's Tax Center


Perspectives


Quarterly commentary (PDF)







Performance

Total return (%) as of 06/30/17


Annual

Cumulative





Annualized performance
1 yr.
3 yrs.
5 yrs.
Life (inception: 10/17/11
)




Before sales charge

1.14%


0.65%


0.71%


0.69%



After sales charge

1.14%


0.65%


0.71%


0.69%



BofA Merrill Lynch U.S. Treasury Bill Index

0.46%

0.26%

0.20%
-- 







Cumulative performance
1 yr.
3 yrs.
5 yrs.
Life




Before sales charge

1.14%


1.97%


3.62%


4.00%



After sales charge

1.14%


1.97%


3.62%


4.00%







Class A shares do not carry an initial charge or, generally, a contingent deferred sales charge. Redemptions of shares that had been exchanged from another fund may be subject to a CDSC. See disclosure below.


Annual performance as of 06/30/17




 
 2012

 2013

 2014

 2015

 2016





Before sales charge

0.94%


0.59%


0.51%


0.27%


0.98%



BofA Merrill Lynch U.S. Treasury Bill Index

0.12%


0.09%


0.06%


0.09%


0.37%






 Current performance may be lower or higher than the quoted past performance, which cannot guarantee future results. Share price, principal value, and return will vary, and you may have a gain or a loss when you sell your shares. To obtain the most recent month-end performance, visit putnam.com.
Performance assumes reinvestment of distributions and does not account for taxes. Class A, M, and R shares have no initial sales charge. Class A and M shares generally have no contingent deferred sales charge (CDSC). However, a CDSC may apply to redemptions of class A shares obtained by exchanging shares from another Putnam fund that were originally purchased without an initial sales charge. This CDSC applies if the shares are redeemed within nine months of the original purchase. A CDSC on class M shares may apply to redemptions of shares from certain rollover accounts. See the prospectus for details. Class B and C shares do not carry a CDSC. Class Y shares, available to investors through an asset-based fee program or for institutional clients, are sold without an initial sales charge and have no CDSC. Class R5/R6 shares, available to qualified employee-benefit plans only, are sold without an initial sales charge and have no CDSC.  Performance for Class R5/R6 shares before their inception are derived from the historical performance of class Y shares, which have not been adjusted for the lower expenses; had they, returns would have been higher. For a portion of the period the fund had expenses limitations, without which returns would be lower. 



Performance snapshot




 
Before sales charge
After sales charge




1 mt.

0.10
%

0.10
%


as of 06/30/17


YTD

0.80
%

0.80
%


as of 07/26/17






Yield




Distribution rate before sales chargeas of 07/26/17

1.25%



Distribution rate after sales chargeas of 07/26/17

1.25%



30-day SEC yield with subsidyas of 06/30/17 (after sales charge)

1.07%



30-day SEC yield without subsidyas of 06/30/17 (after sales charge)

0.93%








Morningstar ratings as of 06/30/17




Ultrashort Bond
Rating
Number of funds in category




Overall



3


(134)



3 yrs.



3


(134)



5 yrs.



3


(101)






Distributions




Accrual days
30


Accrual start date
06/01/17


Accrual end date
06/30/17


Payable date
06/30/17


Income

$0.010218373



Extra taxable income

$0.0



Dividend frequency
Monthly






Volatility as of
06/30/17





Standard deviation (3 yrs.)

0.20%



Beta

1.01



R-squared

0.16







Risk-adjusted performance as of
06/30/17





Sharpe ratio (3 yrs.)

2.34



Information ratio (3 yrs.)

2.12








Lipper rankings are based on total return without sales charge
relative to all share classes of funds with similar objectives as
determined by Lipper. Past performance is not indicative of future
results.


The Morningstar RatingTM for funds, or "star rating", is calculated for managed products (including mutual funds, variable annuity and variable life subaccounts, exchange-traded funds, closed-end funds, and separate accounts) with at least a three-year history. Exchange-traded funds and open-ended mutual funds are considered a single population for comparative purposes. It is calculated based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation in a managed product's monthly excess performance, placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent performance. The top 10% of products in each product category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star. The Overall Morningstar Rating for a managed product is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with its three-, five-, and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating metrics. The weights are: 100% three-year rating for 36-59 months of total returns, 60% five-year rating/40% three-year rating for 60-119 months of total returns, and 50% 10-year rating/30% five-year rating/20% three-year rating for 120 or more months of total returns. While the 10-year overall star rating formula seems to give the most weight to the 10-year period, the most recent three-year period actually has the greatest impact because it is included in all three rating periods.


The up-market capture ratio is used to evaluate how well an investment manager performed relative to an index during periods when that index has risen. The ratio is
calculated by dividing the manager’s returns by the returns of the index during the up-market, and multiplying that factor by 100. The down-market capture ratio
is used to evaluate how well an investment manager performed relative to an index during periods when that index has dropped. The ratio is calculated by dividing the
manager’s returns by the returns of the index during the down-market and multiplying that factor by 100.



Holdings

Top 10 issuers as of 06/30/17




JPMorgan Chase

1.07%



 





Rabobank

1.06%



 





Citigroup

1.05%



 





Nordea Bank

1.05%



 





Berkshire Hathaway

1.04%



 





Australia & New Zealand Banking Group

1.04%



 





Bank of America

1.02%



 





Wells Fargo

1.02%



 





Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce

1.01%



 





Bank Of Montreal

1.01%



 





Top 10 issuers, percent of portfolio

10.37%



 








 | Prior top 10 issuers


Full portfolio holdings







Prior top 10 issuers



Top 10 issuers as of 06/30/17




JPMorgan Chase


Rabobank


Citigroup


Nordea Bank


Berkshire Hathaway


Australia & New Zealand Banking Group


Bank of America


Wells Fargo


Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce


Bank Of Montreal




Issuers represent
10.37%
of portfolio






Top 10 issuers as of 05/31/17




Rabobank


Nordea Bank


Australia & New Zealand Banking Group


Danske Bank


Citigroup


Royal Bank Of Canada


Wells Fargo


Barclays


PNC Bank


Canadian Imperial Bank Comm




Issuers represent
10.93%
of portfolio






Top 10 issuers as of 04/30/17




Canadian Imperial Bank Comm


Royal Bank Of Canada


Simon Property Group


Berkshire Hathaway


Bb&T Corporation


JPMorgan Chase


Wells Fargo


Citigroup


Commonwealth Bank


NRW Bank




Issuers represent
10.66%
of portfolio






Top 10 issuers as of 03/31/17




Simon Property Group


Royal Bank Of Canada


Bb&T Corporation


Nordea Bank


Citigroup


Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce


Wells Fargo


Westpac Banking


Bank of America


Australia New Zealand Banking Group




Issuers represent
10.56%
of portfolio






Portfolio composition as of 06/30/17





Investment-grade corporate bonds


45.79%



 






Commercial paper


43.36%



 






Certificates of deposit


5.04%



 






Asset-backed commercial paper


3.01%



 






Residential MBS (non-agency)


1.57%



 






Agency CMO


1.21%



 






Asset-backed securities (ABS)


0.60%



 






Agency pass-through


0.01%



 






Net cash


-0.59%



 









Fixed income statistics as of 06/30/17



Average effective maturity

0.86
yrs.


Average effective duration

0.14
yrs.


Average yield to maturity

1.55%



Average coupon

1.12%



Average price

$100.35






Quality rating as of 06/30/17



A-1+

6.60%



A-1

10.14%



A-2

30.21%



A-3

4.45%



AAA

1.60%



AA

14.69%



A

27.50%



BBB

5.30%



Not Rated

0.10%



Net cash

-0.59%









Country Allocation
 as of 06/30/17





United States

63.49%



Canada

8.98%



Netherlands

5.08%



Australia

5.08%



United Kingdom

4.35%



Sweden

3.04%



France

2.53%



Japan

2.36%



Luxembourg

1.47%



 Other

3.62%







Germany

1.45%



Denmark

0.86%



Spain

0.65%



Ireland

0.27%



Norway

0.26%



Switzerland

0.13%





0



Fund characteristics will vary over time.
Due to rounding, percentages may not equal 100%.


 Current performance may be lower or higher than the quoted past performance, which cannot guarantee future results. Share price, principal value, and return will vary, and you may have a gain or a loss when you sell your shares. To obtain the most recent month-end performance, visit putnam.com.
Performance assumes reinvestment of distributions and does not account for taxes. Class A, M, and R shares have no initial sales charge. Class A and M shares generally have no contingent deferred sales charge (CDSC). However, a CDSC may apply to redemptions of class A shares obtained by exchanging shares from another Putnam fund that were originally purchased without an initial sales charge. This CDSC applies if the shares are redeemed within nine months of the original purchase. A CDSC on class M shares may apply to redemptions of shares from certain rollover accounts. See the prospectus for details. Class B and C shares do not carry a CDSC. Class Y shares, available to investors through an asset-based fee program or for institutional clients, are sold without an initial sales charge and have no CDSC. Class R5/R6 shares, available to qualified employee-benefit plans only, are sold without an initial sales charge and have no CDSC.  Performance for Class R5/R6 shares before their inception are derived from the historical performance of class Y shares, which have not been adjusted for the lower expenses; had they, returns would have been higher. For a portion of the period the fund had expenses limitations, without which returns would be lower. 


Expenses






Expense ratio
Class A
Class B
Class C
Class M
Class R
Class R6
Class Y




Total expense ratio

0.55%


0.95%


0.95%


0.60%


0.95%


0.44%


0.45%



What you pay†

0.40%


0.80%


0.80%


0.45%


0.80%


0.29%


0.30%






† The fund's expense ratio is taken from the most recent prospectus and is subject to change. What you pay reflects Putnam Management's decision to contractually limit expenses through
11/30/17



Sales chargePutnam Short Duration Income Fund has no up-front sales charge.




Investment Breakpoint
Class A
Class B
Class C
Class M
Class R
Class R6
Class Y




$0-$49,999
 --

 --

 --

 --

 --

 --

 --



$50,000-$99,999
 --

 --

 --

 --

 --

 --

 --



$100,000-$249,999
 --

 --

 --

 --

 --

 --

 --



$250,000-$499,999
 --

 --

 --

 --

 --

 --

 --



$500,000-$999,999
 --

 --

 --

 --

 --

 --

 --



$1M-$4M
 --

 --

 --

 --

 --

 --

 --



$4M-$50M
 --

 --

 --

 --

 --

 --

 --



$50M+
 --

 --

 --

 --

 --

 --

 --







CDSC †Putnam Short Duration Income Fund has no redemption fees except under certain circumstances.




 

Class A


Class B


Class C


Class M


Class R


Class R6


Class Y





0 to 9 mts.

1.00%


5.00%


1.00%


0.15%

 --

 --

 --



9 to 12 mts.

0.00%


5.00%


1.00%


0.15%

 --

 --

 --



2 yrs.
 --


4.00%


0.00%

 --

 --

 --

 --



3 yrs.
 --


3.00%


0.00%

 --

 --

 --

 --



4 yrs.
 --


3.00%


0.00%

 --

 --

 --

 --



5 yrs.
 --


2.00%


0.00%

 --

 --

 --

 --



6 yrs.
 --


1.00%


0.00%

 --

 --

 --

 --



7+ yrs.
 --


0.00%


0.00%

 --

 --

 --

 --






† A deferred sales charge on class A, B and C shares may apply to certain redemptions of shares purchased by exchange from another Putnam fund. A deferred sales charge on class M shares may
apply to redemptions of shares from certain rollover accounts.






The BofA Merrill Lynch U.S. Treasury Bill Index is an unmanaged index that tracks the performance of U.S. dollar denominated U.S. Treasury Bills publicly issued in the U.S. domestic market. Qualifying securities must have a remaining term of at least one month to final maturity and a minimum amount outstanding of $1 billion. You cannot invest directly in an index.
 Consider these risks before investing: Putnam Short Duration Income Fund is not a money market fund. The effects of inflation may erode the value of your investment over time. Funds that invest in government securities are not guaranteed. Mortgage-backed investments, unlike traditional debt investments, are also subject to prepayment risk, which means that they may increase in value less than other bonds when interest rates decline and decline in value more than other bonds when interest rates rise. We may have to invest the proceeds from prepaid investments, including mortgage backed investments, in other investments with less attractive terms and yields. Bond prices may fall or fail to rise over time for several reasons, including general financial market conditions, changing market perceptions of the risk of default, changes in government intervention, and factors related to a specific issuer or industry. These factors may also lead to periods of high volatility and reduced liquidity in the bond markets. Bond investments are subject to interest-rate risk (the risk of bond prices falling if interest rates rise) and credit risk (the risk of an issuer defaulting on interest or principal payments). Interest-rate risk is greater for longer-term bonds, and credit risk is greater for below-investment-grade bonds. Credit risk is generally greater for debt not backed by the full faith and credit of the U.S. government. Risks associated with derivatives include increased investment exposure (which may be considered leverage) and, in the case of over-the-counter instruments, the potential inability to terminate or sell derivatives positions and the potential failure of the other party to the instrument to meet its obligations. Unlike bonds, funds that invest in bonds have fees and expenses. You can lose money by investing in the fund.
Credit qualities are shown as a percentage of net assets as of the date indicated above. A bond rated BBB or higher (A-3/SP-3 or higher, for short-term debt) is considered investment grade. This chart reflects the highest security rating provided by one or more of Standard & Poor's, Moody's, and Fitch. Ratings and portfolio credit quality will vary over time. Derivative instruments are only included to the extent of any unrealized gain or loss on such instruments and are shown in the cash and net other assets category. The fund itself has not been rated by an independent rating agency. The `Cash and net other assets` category may show a negative market value percentage as a result of the timing of trade date versus settlement date transactions.

























Putnam Short Duration Income Fund









Putnam Investments




Summary Prospectus
Statutory Prospectus
Statement of Additional Information
















 






















 













 




PENN SHORT DURATION HIGH YIELD FUND, L.P. - List of CEOs, founders and company directors

















directorpedia.net - List of CEOs, founders, board members and company directors











PENN SHORT DURATION HIGH YIELD FUND, L.P.
List of persons related to the company PENN SHORT DURATION HIGH YIELD FUND, L.P.. Find out list of CEOs, founders, board members, and company directors of PENN SHORT DURATION HIGH YIELD FUND, L.P..

CIK Number: 0001517412IRS Number: 450635462Company address: 1200 INTREPID AVENUE SUITE 400 PHILADELPHIA 19112Phone number: 215-302-1500



People related to PENN SHORT DURATION HIGH YIELD FUND, L.P.
NamePositionStreetCityCountryM. Noyes  ChristianNavy Yard Corporate Center Three Crescent Drive, Suite 400PhiladelphiaPAJ. Green  EricNavy Yard Corporate Center Three Crescent Drive, Suite 400PhiladelphiaPAJ. Green  Eric1200 Intrepid Avenue Suite 400PhiladelphiaPAMcBride  GeraldNavy Yard Corporate Center Three Crescent Drive, Suite 400PhiladelphiaPAMcBride  Gerald1200 Intrepid Avenue Suite 400PhiladelphiaPAPaulo Silva  Jorge1200 Intrepid Avenue Suite 400PhiladelphiaPAA. Hocker  Kimberley1200 Intrepid Avenue Suite 400PhiladelphiaPAA. Hocker  KimberlyNavy Yard Corporate Center Three Crescent Drive, Suite 400PhiladelphiaPAA. Hocker  Kirsten1200 Intrepid Avenue Suite 400PhiladelphiaPAA. Hocker  KristinNavy Yard Corporate Center Three Crescent Drive, Suite 400PhiladelphiaPAA. Hocker  MarciaNavy Yard Corporate Center Three Crescent Drive, Suite 400PhiladelphiaPAA. Hocker  Marcia1200 Intrepid Avenue Suite 400PhiladelphiaPAMoran  PeterNavy Yard Corporate Center Three Crescent Drive, Suite 400PhiladelphiaPAMoran  Peter1200 Intrepid Avenue Suite 400PhiladelphiaPAA. Hocker  RichardNavy Yard Corporate Center Three Crescent Drive, Suite 400PhiladelphiaPAA. Hocker  Richard1200 Intrepid Avenue Suite 400PhiladelphiaPAD. Schumacher  Scott1200 Intrepid Avenue Suite 400PhiladelphiaPAS. Schumacher, Sr.  ScottNavy Yard Corporate Center Three Crescent Drive, Suite 400PhiladelphiaPA




PENN SHORT DURATION HIGH YIELD FUND, L.P. on the Web
Related companiesPenn Asia Investors, LP, Penn Avenue Partnership LLC, Penn Capital Fixed Income Spectrum Fund, L.P., Penn Capital Liberty Fund, L.P., PENN Capital Pioneer Energy Fund, L.P., PENN CAPITAL STRUCTURE OPPORTUNITIES OFFSHORE FUND, LTD., Penn Circle LLC, PENN CONVERTIBLE FUND LP, PENN CORE HIGH YIELD BOND FUND II L P, PENN CORE HIGH YIELD BOND FUND LP, PENN CORE OPPORTUNISTIC HIGH YIELD BOND FUND LP, PENN DISTRESSED FUND L P, PENN DIVERSIFIED MICRO CAP EQUITY FUND LP, PENN FINANCIAL SERVICES FUND LP, Penn Haven LLC












 















Penn Capital Funds | Specialists in Capital Structure Investing





























Skip to main content








Toggle navigation

















 




Account Access
To open an account or access an existing account by phone please call
844-302-PENN (7366)
To access an existing account online please click
Access Online


Foreside Fund Services, LLC, Distributor
PENN Capital Funds Trust c/o U.S. Bancorp Fund Services, LLC
P.O. Box 701
Milwaukee, Wisconsin 53201-0701844-302-PENN (7366)


 


Welcome to Penn Capital Funds




 

Penn Capital Defensive Short Duration High Income FundPenn Capital Opportunistic High Yield FundPenn Capital Senior Floating Rate Income FundPenn Capital Small / Mid Cap Equity FundPenn Capital Small Cap Equity Fund

 


BEFORE INVESTING YOU SHOULD CAREFULLY CONSIDER THE FUND’S INVESTMENT OBJECTIVES, RISKS, CHARGES AND EXPENSES. THIS AND OTHER RELEVANT INFORMATION CAN BE FOUND IN THE PROSPECTUS AND STATEMENT OF ADDITIONAL INFORMATION, COPIES OF WHICH MAY BE OBTAINED BY CALLING 844-302-PENN (7366) OR BY VISITING WWW.PENNCAPITALFUNDS.COM.  PLEASE READ THE PROSPECTUS CAREFULLY BEFORE YOU INVEST.
Foreside Fund Services, LLC, Distributor.










×
Leaving Penn Capital


This hyperlink is being provided as a convenience and for informational purposes only.  It leads to a website published or operated by a third party not affiliated with, or in any way related to, Penn Capital.  By providing a hyperlink to an external website or webpage, Penn Capital shall not be deemed to endorse, recommend, approve, guarantee or introduce any third parties or the services/products they provide on their websites, or to have any form of co-operation with such third parties and websites unless otherwise stated by Penn Capital.  Penn Capital is not in any way responsible for the content of any externally linked website or webpage. Using or following this link is at your own risk and Penn Capital is not responsible for any damages or losses incurred or suffered by you arising out of, or in connection with, your use of the link. The link is not intended to create an offer to sell, or a solicitation of an offer to buy or hold, any securities.


Close
Continue














PENN Capital Opportunistic High Yield Fund Institutional Class (PHYNX) Fund Performance and Returns








































Welcome!















Company News
Company Site
Premium
Log In


 



















Membership
Home
Portfolio
Stocks
Bonds
Funds
ETFs
CEF
Markets
Tools
Real Life Finance
Discuss





Investing Ideas


Fund Analyst Picks
Picks by Category
Fund Pick Performance
Picks & Pans E-Newsletter
Fund Spy Column
Fund Spy Book
Bond Squad
Fund Video Reports
FundInvestor Newsletter
ETF Investing
Fund Family Experts



Fund Reports


All Fund Analyst Reports
Fund Stewardship Reports



Fund Ratings


Highest-Rated Value
Highest-Rated Growth
Highest-Rated Large-Cap
Highest-Rated Mid-Cap
Highest-Rated Small-Cap
Foreign Fund Standouts
Star Rating Performance
Rating Methodology



Fund Performance


Top 1-Month Performers
Top YTD Performers
Top 1-Year Performers
Top 3-Year Performers
Top 5-Year Performers
Fund Category Returns
Biggest Daily NAV Changes
Closed-End Funds
Exchange-Traded Funds
Quarterly Market Outlook



Fund Screeners


Basic Screeners
Fund Screener
Long-Term Winners
Solid Small-Growth Funds
Conservative Bond Funds

Premium Screeners
Premium Fund Screener
Index Funds
Hidden Gems
Lower-Risk Foreign Funds


Video Center
 
 

 












PENN Capital Opportunistic High Yield Fund Institutional Class
 PHYNX


Add to PortfolioGet E-mail AlertsPrint This PageData DefinitionData QuestionQuoteChartFund AnalysisPerformanceRatings & RiskManagementStewardshipPortfolioExpenseTaxPurchaseFilingsTotal ReturnsInvestor Returns










Collapsed View
Expanded View



Compare







Enter Tickers




Add








Add Benchmark


Morningstar Indices


U.S. Market TR



					Value
				



							U.S. Value TR
						



							Small Value TR
						



							Mid Value TR
						



							Large Value TR
						





					Core
				



							U.S. Core TR
						



							Small Core TR
						



							Mid Core TR
						



							Large Core TR
						





					Growth
				



							U.S. Growth TR
						



							Small Growth TR
						


Mid Growth TR


Large Growth TR





					U.S. Small Cap TR
				



					U.S. Mid Cap TR
				


U.S. Large Cap TR


Dividend Leaders TR


Wide Moat Focus 20 TR



					Information Sup. Sector TR
				


Manufacturing Sup. Sector TR


Service Sup. Sector TR





			US Indices
		



					DJ Industrial Avg. TR
				



					S&P 500 TR
				



					S&P MidCap 400 TR
				



					NASDAQ Composite TR
				



					Russell 2000 TR
				





			Canada
		



					S&P/TSX Composite TR
				



					S&P/TSX 60 PR
				



					S&P/TSX Venture Composite PR
				





			Europe
		


DJ Stoxx 50 TR EUR



					Euronext BEL 20 PR (BEL)
				



					Euronext Paris CAC 40 TR (FRA)
				



					FTSE 100 TR (GBR)
				



					FTSE 250 TR (GBR)
				



					FSE DAX TR (DEU)
				





			Asia
		



					Nikkei 225 PR (JPN)
				



					Shanghai SE Composite PR (CHN)
				



					CSI 300 CNY
				



					Hang Seng HSI PR HKD
				


S&P/ASX 200 TR





			South Africa
		



					FTSE/JSE All Share Capped TR ZAR
				



					FTSE/JSE Top 40 SWIX TR ZAR
				



					FTSE/JSE All Share SWIX TR ZAR
				



					FTSE/JSE Top 40 NR ZAR
				


FTSE/JSE All Africa Ex South Africa ZAR



					FTSE/JSE All Share TR ZAR
				



					FTSE/JSE SA Listed Property TR ZAR
				



					FTSE/JSE Small Cap TR ZAR
				


FTSE/JSE Financials&Indl TR ZAR


FTSE/JSE SA Industrials TR ZAR



					FTSE/JSE SA Resources TR ZAR
				





			Primary Prospectus Benchmark
		



					N/A
				





			Secondary Prospectus Benchmark
		



					N/A
				





			Analyst Assigned Benchmark
		



					BofAML US High Yield Master II TR USD
				



 

Add Morningstar Category

Allocation--15% to 30% Equity
Allocation--30% to 50% Equity
Allocation--50% to 70% Equity
Allocation--70% to 85% Equity
Allocation--85%+ Equity
Bank Loan
Bear Market
China Region
Commodities Agriculture
Commodities Broad Basket
Commodities Energy
Commodities Industrial Metals
Commodities Precious Metals
Communications
Consumer Cyclical
Consumer Defensive
Convertibles
Corporate Bond
Diversified Emerging Mkts
Diversified Pacific/Asia
Emerging Markets Bond
Emerging-Markets Local-Currency Bond
Energy Limited Partnership
Equity Energy
Equity Precious Metals
Europe Stock
Financial
Foreign Large Blend
Foreign Large Growth
Foreign Large Value
Foreign Small/Mid Blend
Foreign Small/Mid Growth
Foreign Small/Mid Value
Global Real Estate
Health
High Yield Bond
High Yield Muni
India Equity
Industrials
Inflation-Protected Bond
Infrastructure
Intermediate Government
Intermediate-Term Bond
Japan Stock
Large Blend
Large Growth
Large Value
Latin America Stock
Leveraged Net Long
Long Government
Long-Short Credit
Long-Short Equity
Long-Term Bond
Managed Futures
Market Neutral
Mid-Cap Blend
Mid-Cap Growth
Mid-Cap Value
Miscellaneous Region
Miscellaneous Sector
Money Market - Tax-Free
Money Market - Taxable
Multialternative
Multicurrency
Multisector Bond
Muni California Intermediate
Muni California Long
Muni Florida
Muni Massachusetts
Muni Minnesota
Muni National Interm
Muni National Long
Muni National Short
Muni New Jersey
Muni New York Intermediate
Muni New York Long
Muni Ohio
Muni Pennsylvania
Muni Single State Interm
Muni Single State Long
Muni Single State Short
Natural Resources
Nontraditional Bond
Option Writing
Pacific/Asia ex-Japan Stk
Preferred Stock
Real Estate
Short Government
Short-Term Bond
Single Currency
Small Blend
Small Growth
Small Value
Stable Value
Static Allocation--15% to 30% Equity
Static Allocation--30% to 50% Equity
Static Allocation--50% to 70% Equity
Static Allocation--70% to 85% Equity
Static Allocation--85%+ Equity
Static Intermediate Bond
Static Large Blend
Static Large Growth
Static Large Value
Static Mid-Cap Equity
Static Non US Equity
Static Short-Term Bond
Static Small-Cap Equity
Static US Government
Tactical Allocation
Target-Date 2000-2010
Target-Date 2015
Target-Date 2020
Target-Date 2025
Target-Date 2030
Target-Date 2035
Target-Date 2040
Target-Date 2045
Target-Date 2050
Target-Date 2055
Target-Date 2060+
Target-Date Retirement
Technology
Trading--Inverse Commodities
Trading--Inverse Debt
Trading--Inverse Equity
Trading--Leveraged Commodities
Trading--Leveraged Debt
Trading--Leveraged Equity
Trading--Miscellaneous
Ultrashort Bond
Utilities
Volatility
World Allocation
World Bond
World Large Stock
World Small/Mid Stock
 



Clear All

									Recent Securities & Benchmarks (max. active = 5)








Customize Interactive Chart
Growth of 10,000



 
 















							Trailing Total Returns
 PHYNX



							Daily

							Monthly

							Quarterly



















Quarterly & Monthly Total Returns
 PHYNX



							Quarterly

							Monthly










										S&P 500 index data: S&P 500 Copyright © 2017Currency is displayed in USD.
Italics indicate Extended Performance. Extended performance is an estimate based on the performance of the fund's oldest share class, adjusted for fees.
        			




							Trailing Investor Returns
 PHYNX



							Monthly

							Quarterly






						Currency is displayed in USD.


 

  We value your feedback. Let us know what you think.












 


Site Directory
Site Map
Our Products












 



 



 




Corrections
Help
Advertising Opportunities
Licensing Opportunities
Glossary
RSS
Mobile Portfolio
Affiliate
Careers 
 


International Sites:
        	Australia
Canada
China
France
Germany
Hong Kong
Italy
The Netherlands
Norway
Spain
U.K.
Switzerland

 




Stocks by:
            Name
|
Ticker
|
Star Rating
|
Market Cap
|
Stock Type
|
Sector
|
Industry



Mutual Funds by:
            Star Rating
|
Investment Style
|
Total Assets
|
Category
|
Top Holdings
|
Top Sectors
|
Symbol / Ticker
|
Name



ETFs by:
            Star Rating
|
Category
|
Total Assets
|
Symbol / Ticker
|
Name



Articles by:
            Title
|
Date
|
Author
|
Collection
|
Interest
|
Popularity



Investment Categories by:
            Topic
|
Sector
|
Key Indicators
|
User Interest
|
Market Cap
|
Industry



Premium Stocks by:
            Name
|
Ticker
|
Star Rating
|
Market Cap
|
Stock Type
|
Sector
|
Industry



Premium Mutual Funds by:
            Star Rating
|
Investment Style
|
Total Assets
|
Category
|
Top Holdings
|
Top Sectors
|
Symbol / Ticker
|
Name



Premium ETFs by:
            Star Rating
|
Category
|
Total Assets
|
Symbol / Ticker
|
Name



Popular Articles by:
            Title
|
Date
|
Author
|
Collection
|
Interest
|
Popularity



Popular Investment Categories by:
            Topic
|
Sector
|
Key Indicators
|
User Interest
|
Market Cap
|
Industry




Independent. Insightful. Trusted. Morningstar provides stock market analysis; equity, mutual fund, and ETF research, ratings, and picks; portfolio tools; and option, hedge fund, IRA, 401k, and 529 plan research. Our reliable data and analysis can help both experienced enthusiasts and newcomers.
        © Copyright  Morningstar, Inc. All rights reserved. Please read our Terms of Useand Privacy Policy.Dow Jones Industrial Average, S&P 500, Nasdaq, and Morningstar Index (Market Barometer) quotes are real-time. Russell 2000 quote is 10 minutes delayed.
 


 










 





















Investment Team | Penn Capital














Skip to main content








Toggle navigation












 





Search form
Search







People Investment Team Business Development and Client Service Marketing and Product Management Operations Team




Login Limited Partnership InvestorsLogin Separately Managed Investors
Request More Information
 


 

Home
People
Investment Team
 
Investment Team



Penn Capital's research process involves a well defined meeting structure to develop consensus on all ideas. Each investment style is directed by a style portfolio manager who drives the decision making of their respective portfolios.
All members of the portfolio team (Portfolio Managers and Analysts) are responsible for maintenance research and idea generation within their areas of expertise. Research responsibilities are divided by Sector. Portfolio Managers' and Analysts' conduct a Complete Capital Structure Analysis® on the companies they follow, identify the best relative value within the capital structure (debt or equity), and bring their ideas to the team for consideration. The best of those ideas are reviewed by the style portfolio manager, who evaluates how to apply those that closely align with core business strategies.
Richard Hocker, Founder, Chief Investment Officer & Chief Executive Officer
Mr. Hocker founded Penn Capital in 1987 and serves as Chief Investment Officer & Chief Executive Officer, guiding overall portfolio strategy.  His investing and institutional non-investment grade corporate lending experience spans over forty years. While serving as a Partner for Delaware Investment Advisors (DIA) from 1977 to 1987, he was responsible for building the investment side of DIA’s fixed income operation.  During this period, Mr. Hocker developed and managed one of the nation’s first high yield mutual funds, the Delchester High Yield Bond Fund. He also served as the first high yield bond manager for a number of institutional clients including General Motors, State of Vermont Teachers Retirement Association, and Colorado Fire and Police.  Prior to DIA, Mr. Hocker trained as a corporate lender and supported key senior lenders at Provident National Bank, which is now PNC, a top 20 US Banking institution.  He later rose to serve as head of the investment division.  Mr. Hocker also founded and served as CEO of Covenant Bank, a NJ based regional bank which grew to 16 branches and $500mm in deposits before being acquired by Wachovia Corporation in 1997.
He and his wife, Marcia Hocker, are the founders of the Ethel Mae Hocker Foundation. The Ethel Mae Hocker Foundation provides educational opportunities to less fortunate, deserving Greater Philadelphia-area elementary and high school students. Mr. Hocker received both his BS in accounting and MBA in finance from the Kogod School of Business at American University.
Eric Green, CFA, Senior Managing Partner, Director of Research, Senior Portfolio Manager
Mr. Green began his career at Penn Capital in July 1997. Prior to joining Penn Capital, he gained experience with the Federal National Mortgage Association, the Royal Bank of Scotland, and the United States Securities and Exchange Commission where he served as a financial analyst in the Division of Investment Management. As Director of Research, Mr. Green is responsible for guiding the firm’s day to day research process. He also serves as the Portfolio Manager for Penn Capital’s Small Cap and Mid Cap equity strategies and chairs Penn Capital’s equity strategy committee. Mr. Green is also a member of the Board of Directors and the Executive Committee of the ADL, Mid-Atlantic Region. He received a BSBA, Cum Laude, from American University and received an MBA from the Yale School of Management.
Scott Schumacher, Senior Managing Partner, Senior Portfolio Manager
Mr. Schumacher began his career with Penn Capital in 1987. He is responsible for global oversight of all Equity and High Yield trading. Mr. Schumacher is a member of the firm’s Credit Strategy Committee and the firm’s Executive Committee which drives overall strategy and management of the firm. He received a BS in Accounting from Rutgers University.
J. Paulo Silva, CFA, Managing Partner, Senior Portfolio Manager
Mr. Silva began his career with Penn Capital in 2002 as a research analyst focused on technology and industrial companies. In addition, Mr. Silva has focused on a number of distressed debt situations, successfully completing a reorganization through serving on the official committee of creditors. Today, he serves as the Portfolio Manager for Penn Capital’s Micro Cap equity strategy. As a member of the Equity Strategy Committee, Mr. Silva works closely with the equity portfolio management team to contribute ideas specifically in the micro to mid-capitalization range. He is also a member of the firm’s Executive Committee which drives overall strategy and management of the firm. Beyond Penn Capital, Mr. Silva serves on the Investment Committee of the Valley Forge Military Academy. He received a BS in Civil Engineering, Summa Cum Laude, from Tufts University and an MBA from the Yale School of Management.
Peter Duffy, CFA, Partner, Senior Portfolio Manager
Mr. Duffy began his career with Penn Capital in 2006. Prior to joining Penn Capital, Mr. Duffy was a Director for Deutsche Asset Management’s top-decile $5 billion global high yield debt team, and his investment experience included both leveraged loans and emerging markets debt. Previously, he worked on mergers & acquisitions at GE Capital and as a management consultant at Arthur Andersen LLP. Mr. Duffy serves as the Portfolio Manager for Penn Capital’s Defensive High Yield and Short Duration strategies and chairs the firm’s Credit Strategy Committee. He received a BS in Finance, Summa Cum Laude, from Villanova University and an MBA from The Wharton School of the University of Pennsylvania.
Martin Smith, Partner, Senior Portfolio Manager
Mr. Smith began his career with Penn Capital in July 1999. He began his investment career in small cap equity research with Cantone Research, Inc., an independent equity research firm.  Prior to joining Penn Capital, Mr. Smith served as a high yield analyst with Merrill Lynch Asset Management.  At Penn Capital, he serves as the Portfolio Manager for Penn Capitals Opportunistic High Yield Fixed Income strategy.  Mr. Smith received his BBA in Finance from Pace University and an MBA from Rutgers University.
Joseph Maguire, CFA, Partner, Senior Portfolio Manager
Mr. Maguire began his career with Penn Capital in January 2005.  Prior to joining Penn Capital, he served as a senior audit associate for PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP, and conducted private equity research for AMS Inc.  During graduate school, Mr. Maguire interned with Penn Capital’s investment team.  He currently serves as a Co-Portfolio Manager for Penn Capital’s Convertible strategy and is the Portfolio Manager for Penn Capital’s SMID equity strategy.  Mr. Maguire received a BBA in Accounting from The College of William & Mary and a MBA from the Kenan-Flagler Business School at the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill.
David Jackson, CFA, Partner, Portfolio Manager
Mr. Jackson began his career with Penn Capital in February 2008. Prior to joining Penn Capital Mr. Jackson was an Associate Director with the Financial Institutions Group at Fitch Ratings in New York City, where he assisted with rating coverage of the specialty finance sector.  Prior to Fitch, he worked for the Federal Reserve Bank of Philadelphia on the bank supervision and regulation team. Mr. Jackson currently serves as a Portfolio Manager for Penn Capital’s Distressed strategy.  He received a BS in Finance from Rutgers University School of Business.
Steven Civera, CFA, Partner, Portfolio Manager
Mr. Civera began his career with Penn Capital in 2010. Most recently, he was a Research Analyst for AlphaOne Capital Partners where he covered Technology and Renewable Energy. Prior to AlphaOne, Mr. Civera worked for the Center for Financial Research and Analysis, a forensic accounting research firm. Previously, he worked as an Analyst for Global Capital Management. Mr. Civera currently serves as a Co-Portfolio Manager for the firm’s Convertible strategy. He received a BSBA in Accounting from Bucknell University, an MBA from Loyola College in Maryland.
Paul Welch, CFA, Partner, Senior Research Analyst
Mr. Welch began his career with Penn Capital in 2007. Prior to joining Penn Capital, Mr. Welch served as a research analyst for Ariel Capital Management. Previously, he served as a private equity fund analyst at Hamilton Lane and as a consultant at Public Financial Management. Mr. Welch received a BS in Finance from The Wharton School of the University of Pennsylvania and a MBA from the Graduate School of Business at the University of Chicago.
Jason Detzi, Partner, Senior Research Analyst
Mr. Detzi began his career at Penn Capital in 2006. Prior to joining Penn Capital, Mr. Detzi was an independent floor trader and managing partner of a proprietary trading firm, trading equity and index options on both the CBOE and American Stock Exchange. Previously, Mr. Detzi was a market maker for The Timber Hill Group LLC, a subsidiary of The Interactive Brokers Group, trading equity derivatives, index options, and futures. He received a BS in Finance from Rutgers University.
Christopher Paciello, CFA, Senior Research Analyst
Mr. Paciello began his career with Penn Capital in 2012. He has over 13 years' experience working in the financial markets with a focus on high yield and distressed securities. Most recently, Mr. Paciello was a Research Analyst at Standish Asset Management focused on high yield and distressed securities within the cable media, telecommunications, paper and packaging, and healthcare sectors. Prior to Standish, Mr. Paciello worked for Gartmore Global Investments as a Research Analyst focused on high yield and distressed securities. Previously, he worked for W.R. Huff Asset Management, an asset manager specializing in high yield securities, as a trader and an analyst focused on high yield and equity securities. Mr. Paciello received a BS from Babson College and an MBA from Villanova University.
Howard Bryerman, CFA, Senior Research Analyst
Mr. Bryerman began his career with Penn Capital in 2013. Prior to joining Penn Capital, Mr. Bryerman had 20 years’ experience as an investment professional specializing in high yield bonds, senior floating rate loans and distressed securities. Most recently he was a Managing Director at Penn Mutual Insurance where he managed the firm’s high yield bond investment portfolio. Prior to joining Penn Mutual Insurance, he was a Director and Senior Analyst for Wells Fargo Asset Management’s (Evergreen Investments) $3.5 billion high yield funds and for Deutsche Asset Management’s $5 billion global high yield funds. Previously, he was a Senior Analyst for Bank of New York Capital Markets and a Senior Manager in Grant Thornton’s Bankruptcy and Reorganization practice. Mr. Bryerman received a BS degree in Accounting from the University of Connecticut, a MBA in Finance from New York University’s Stern Graduate School of Business, and is a Chartered Financial Analyst.
Richard Simons, CFA, Partner, Senior Research Analyst
Mr. Simons began his career with Penn Capital in 2013. Prior to joining Penn Capital, Mr. Simons served as a portfolio manager and analyst for Turner Investments focusing on the healthcare sector. Previously, Mr. Simons served as an analyst at Tryphon Capital Advisers covering healthcare. He received a BS in Biophysics from The State University of New York at Geneseo and a Masters of Biotechnology from the University of Pennsylvania.
Chad Bolen, CFA, Senior Research Analyst
Mr. Bolen began his career with Penn Capital in 2013. He has nearly 18 years’ experience working in the financial markets with the past 12 years focused on equity research. Most recently, Mr. Bolen was a Senior Equity Research Associate at Raymond James Financial in St. Petersburg, FL covering the Consumer sector. Prior to Raymond James, Mr. Bolen worked for Morgan Stanley in Clearwater, FL as a Financial Advisor. He received a BA in Organizational Behavior and Management from Brown University and has been a CFA charter holder since 2009.
Suhail Chandy, CFA, Senior Research Analyst
Mr. Chandy began his career with Penn Capital in 2013. Most recently, Mr. Chandy was a Vice President at Adelante Capital Management, where he was a member of the investment committee. Prior to Adelante, he served as the Senior Analyst covering Telecom Infrastructure at Wedbush Securities. Previously, he served in various capacities in equity research at Jefferies and at Cowen and Company. His industry experience includes roles in corporate finance, supply chain management, pricing, investment analysis, and software engineering in India, Japan, Singapore and the U.S. Mr. Chandy received a B. Tech from Sri Venkateswara University, a PGDM from IIM and an MBA from Yale University.
Randall Braunfeld, Senior Research Analyst
Mr. Braunfeld began his career with Penn Capital in 2015. Prior to joining Penn Capital, Mr. Braunfeld was a portfolio manager of a High Yield BB rated Bond Portfolio for First Niagara Bank. Previously, he worked at Lehman Brothers within its high yield loan portfolio group from 2004 - 2011. After Lehman filed for bankruptcy, he remained at the firm to focus on maximizing recovery values of the loan portfolio. Mr. Braunfeld received a BA from the University of Pennsylvania and has a MA in International Economics and Finance from Brandeis International Business School.
Bradley D. Tesoriero, CFA, Senior Research Analyst
Mr. Tesoriero began his career with Penn Capital in 2015. Prior to joining Penn Capital, Mr. Tesoriero was a Research Associate at CRT Capital focusing on distressed debt, equity and high yield research for the Media and Telecommunications sectors. Previously he held positions at Bank of America Merrill Lynch and Janney Montgomery Scott. Mr. Tesoriero received a BA from Cornell University, an MBA from The University of Richmond, Robins School of Business, and a JD, Cum Laude, from the University of Richmond, TC Williams School of Law.
Stacey Kerelska, Research Analyst
Ms. Kerelska began her career with Penn Capital in 2017. Her primary areas of sector coverage are Metals & Mining, Chemicals, Airlines, Shipping, and Building Materials. Prior to joining Penn Capital, Ms. Kerelska served as an Associate Director at UBS AG focusing on the Aerospace & Defense, Airlines & Aircraft Leasing. Prior to UBS AG, she was a Senior Research Associate at Macquarie Group focusing on Metals & Mining, and held positions at Enso Capital Management (NY), Investcorp International (NY) and Nobel Advisors Ltd. in her native Bulgaria. Ms. Kerelska received a BA Economics and a BS in Business Administration from the University of Maine and an MBA in Statistics and Finance from The Wharton School of the University of Pennsylvania. 
 










×
Leaving Penn Capital


This hyperlink is being provided as a convenience and for informational purposes only.  It leads to a website published or operated by a third party not affiliated with, or in any way related to, Penn Capital.  By providing a hyperlink to an external website or webpage, Penn Capital shall not be deemed to endorse, recommend, approve, guarantee or introduce any third parties or the services/products they provide on their websites, or to have any form of co-operation with such third parties and websites unless otherwise stated by Penn Capital.  Penn Capital is not in any way responsible for the content of any externally linked website or webpage. Using or following this link is at your own risk and Penn Capital is not responsible for any damages or losses incurred or suffered by you arising out of, or in connection with, your use of the link. The link is not intended to create an offer to sell, or a solicitation of an offer to buy or hold, any securities.


Close
Continue











  ASDJIDM Quote - Allianz Short Duration High Yield Fund - Bloomberg Markets                     



     Error: Could not add to watchlist. X   + Watchlist  Allianz Short Duration High Yield Fund   ASDJIDM:KY          11,309.81JPY   35.98   0.32%     As of 10:06 PM EDT 7/26/2017     Fund Type   Open-End Fund    52Wk Range   10,035.45 - 11,848.06    1 Yr Return   7.55%    YTD Return   -3.27%                   


                Before it's here, it's on the Bloomberg Terminal.
            

                Learn More
            

         Previous Close   11,273.83    52Wk Range   10,035.45 - 11,848.06    1 Yr Return   6.74%    YTD Return   -3.27%    Fund Type   Open-End Fund    Objective   High Yield Bond    Asset Class Focus   Fixed Income    Geographic Focus   Global    NAV (on 07/26/2017)   11,309.81    Total Assets (m USD) (on 07/26/2017)   261.801    Inception Date   09/10/2013    Last Dividend (on -)   -    Dividend Indicated Gross Yield   -    Fund Managers   -    Front Load Fee   -    Back Load Fee   -    Redemption Fee   -    12b-1 Fee   -    Current Mgmt Fee   0.40%    Expense Ratio   -                     Profile   Allianz Short Duration High Yield Fund is an open-end fund incorporated in the Cayman Islands. The Fund seeks a high level of current income by investing in high-yield corporate bonds, U.S. treasuries, other debt securities and sub-participations in bank loans.    Address  36 C Bermuda House, 3d Floordr. Roy's DriveGeorgetown,Cayman Islands   Phone  -   Website   www.allianzglobalinvestors.com              


Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft





















JPMorgan High Yield Fund - A - J.P. Morgan Asset Management






For the best experience on this page, please enable JavaScript in your browser.
Need to know how to enable it? Go here.









CLOSE



My Collections


My ProfileContact Us



Skip to main content













Input search bar



JPMorgan High Yield Fund(OHYAX)A CIR2R5R6  Compare Funds 

Hypothetical Tool 




OverviewKey PointsPerformanceCommentaryFees & MinimumsPortfolioManagementDocuments 



	As of April 3, 2017, this fund's Select share class has been renamed to I. Please see the prospectus for more details.
 








	JPMORGAN HIGH YIELD FUND

Income potential with high yield.

Driven by macro insights and bottom-up fundamental credit research, the High Yield Fund aims to deliver greater income and return potential than core bond holdings, with lower risk than stocks.
Commentary  











Overview widget loading ...







Key Points

Expertise


		Experienced management team has worked together through multiple market cycles over 28 years, including three recessions.

Portfolio


		Combines bottom-up analysis with top-down insight to actively manage credit profile against market risk.

Success


		Consistently delivered lower volatility vs. its benchmark over the long term.

		Top-quartile performance 89% of the time vs. Morningstar High Yield Category over rolling 10-year periods.1





	ROLLING 10-YEAR PERCENTILE RETURN RANKING


 



1For I Shares; High-yield bond category; Bloomberg Barclays U.S. Corporate High Yield-2% Issuer Capped Index. Rolling 10-year periods since fund inception (11/13/1998), as of 3/31/17. Ranked as follows: 1-yr. (332/697), 3-yrs. (229/596), 5-yrs. (191/471) and 10-yrs. (78/318).

Chart source: Morningstar; as of 3/31/17. Shown for illustrative purposes only; calculated using monthly returns since 12/1/08 – 3/31/17. Past performance is no guarantee of future results.





Performance
Performance widget loading ...



Commentary

As of June 30, 2017 

	Quarter in review


		The JPMorgan High Yield Fund (I Class Shares) underperformed the benchmark, the Bloomberg Barclays U.S. Corporate High Yield - 2% Issuer Capped Index, for the quarter ended June 30, 2017.

		The Fund’s security selection within energy has hurt performance. We have consciously chosen to be overweight in a select few higher-volatility names that have traded off amid the recent moves in oil. We see these names as capable of surviving in a lower-for-longer oil environment despite their sensitivity to short-term oil price moves.

		BB-rated credit outperformed, reversing the trend of higher quality underperforming the market seen in 2016 and the first quarter. Our underweight positioning in higher-quality credit hurt performance.

		The Fund’s security selection in the industrial other, avoiding an issuer that went bankrupt, was positive for performance.

		Also adding to performance were market-beating returns in several pharmaceutical names we had viewed as undervalued.


	Looking ahead


		High-yield bonds have been on a remarkable run over the past 16 months, providing investors more than 2.5 times coupon returns over the bull market, driven by the global search for yield, stable economic and credit fundamentals, and increasingly positive views on commodities sectors.

		Volatility in individual sectors (energy and retail) will likely present opportunities to position opportunistically, and we see high yield as an extended sector that can continue to provide diversification and yield to a variety of portfolios.






Fees and Minimums
Fees widget loading ...


Portfolio
Portfolio widget loading ...							
							


Management
Fund Managers 












 William J.  Morgan Portfolio Manager







 James P.  Shanahan JrPortfolio Manager

Load More 



Documents 
Fund Literature

 

Fact Sheet: High Yield (A)




Fund Story: High Yield Fund


Presentation: High Yield Fund






Load More 


 
Supplemental Information

 

Leveraged Credit Mutual Fund Commentary 6/30/2017




Uncertified Portfolio Holdings - High Yield Fund


Product Guide

Building stronger fixed income portfolios



Supplemental Data Sheet - High Yield Fund




Quarterly Certified Holdings - JPMorgan High Yield Fund




Sales Charge / Dealer Concession Schedule




2016 JPMorgan Funds Capital Gains Distribution




Additional Information







Load More 



 
Regulatory Documents

 

Summary Prospectus




Prospectus




Annual Report




Semi Annual Report




Statement of Additional Information







Load More 





Disclaimer1Please refer to the prospectus for additional information about cut-off times. Total return assumes reinvestment of income. The Fund's adviser and/or its affiliates have contractually agreed to waive fees and/or reimburse expenses to the extent Total Annual Fund Operating Expenses (excluding acquired fund fees and expenses, dividend and interest expenses related to short sales, interest, taxes, expenses related to litigation and potential litigation and extraordinary expenses) exceed 1.00% for A Shares, 1.50% for C Shares, 0.75% for I Shares, 1.35% for R2 Shares, 0.70% for R5 Shares and 0.60% for R6 Shares of the average daily net assets. The Fund may invest in one or more money market funds advised by the adviser or its affiliates (affiliated money market funds). The Fund's adviser has contractually agreed to waive fees and/or reimburse expenses in an amount sufficient to offset the fees and expenses of the affiliated money market funds incurred by the Fund because of the Fund's investment in such money market funds. This waiver is in effect through 10/31/2018 for A Shares, 10/31/2018 for C Shares, 10/31/2018 for I Shares, 10/31/2018 for R2 Shares, 10/31/2018 for R5 Shares and 10/31/2018 for R6 Shares, at which time the adviser and/or its affiliates will determine whether to renew or revise it. The difference between net and gross fees includes all applicable fee waivers and expense reimbursements. The quoted performance of the Fund includes performance of a predecessor fund/share class prior to the Fund's commencement of operations. Please refer to the current prospectus for further information.  Mutual funds have fees that reduce their performance: indexes do not. You cannot invest directly in an index. The Bloomberg Barclays U.S. Corporate High Yield - 2% Issuer Capped Index is comprised of fixed rate, non-investment grade debt securities that are dollar denominated and non-convertible. The index limits the maximum exposure to any one issuer to 2%. The performance of the Lipper High Yield Bond Index includes expenses associated with a mutual fund, such as investment management fees. These expenses are not identical to the expenses charged by the Fund. Total return figures (for the fund and any index quoted) assume payment of fees and reinvestment of dividends (after the highest applicable foreign withholding tax) and distributions. Without fee waivers, fund returns would have been lower. Due to rounding, some values may not total 100%. Â©2017, American Bankers Association, CUSIP Database provided by the Standard & Poor's CUSIP Service Bureau, a division of The McGraw-Hill Companies, Inc. All rights reserved.The Morningstar RatingTM for funds, or "star rating", is calculated for managed products (including mutual funds, variable annuity and variable life subaccounts, exchange-traded funds, closed-end funds, and separate accounts) with at least a three-year history. Exchange traded funds and open-ended mutual funds are considered a single population for comparative purposes. It is calculated based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation in a managed product's monthly excess performance, placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent performance. The top 10% of products in each product category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star. The Overall Morningstar Rating for a managed product is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with its three-, five-, and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating metrics. The weights are: 100% three-year rating for 36-59 months of total returns, 60% five-year rating/40% three-year rating for 60-119 months of total returns, and 50% 10- year rating/30% five-year rating/20% three-year rating for 120 or more months of total returns. While the 10-year overall star rating formula seems to give the most weight to the 10-year period, the most recent three-year period actually has the greatest impact because it is included in all three rating periods.Rankings do not take sales loads into account.The following risks could cause the fund to lose money or perform more poorly than other investments. For more complete risk information, see the prospectus. Investments in bonds and other debt securities will change in value based on changes in interest rates. If rates rise, the value of these investments generally drops. Securities rated below investment grade are considered "high-yield," "non-investment grade," "below investment-grade," or "junk bonds." They generally are rated in the fifth or lower rating categories of Standard & Poor's and Moody's Investors Service. Although they can provide higher yields than higher rated securities, they can carry greater risk. Investments in derivatives may be riskier than other types of investments. They may be more sensitive to changes in economic or market conditions than other types of investments. Many derivatives create leverage, which could lead to greater volatility and losses that significantly exceed the original investment.Total return assumes reinvestment of income. The top 10 holdings listed reflect only the Fund's long-term investments. Short-term investments are excluded. Holdings are subject to change. The holdings listed should not be considered recommendations to purchase or sell a particular security. Each individual security is calculated as a percentage of the aggregate market value of the securities held in the Fund and does not include the use of derivative positions, where applicable. The rate of return anticipated on a bond if it is held until the maturity date.  Duration: Measures price sensitivity of fixed income securities to interest rate changes. Average Life: The length of time the principal of a debt issue is expected to be outstanding.
















Fixed Income - J.P. Morgan Asset Management






For the best experience on this page, please enable JavaScript in your browser.
Need to know how to enable it? Go here.









CLOSE



My Collections


My ProfileContact Us



Skip to main content













Input search bar




				Fixed Income
			




Build stronger fixed income portfolios

	We have built and innovated our fixed income capabilities with just one aim: build stronger portfolios to solve our clients’ needs. Today we are one of the top fixed income managers in the world.
Download the framework


Diverse perspectives, integrated solutions 

Research Driven
Access the power of a globally integrated team of investment professionals and our proprietary research, encompassing fundamental, quantitative and technical analysis.


Actionable Insights
Benefit from actionable insights designed to help you invest with conviction, from our regular macro and market views, to our fixed income portfolio construction tools.
 

Outcome Oriented
Choose from a wide variety of outcome-oriented solutions designed to address all your fixed income needs.


Demonstrated Results
Tap into the proven success of one of the world’s largest fixed income managers, with broad experience gained across regions and market cycles.



Featured Fixed Income Funds


 


“Rather than try to outguess the market, investors should seek to craft an all-weather bond portfolio, one that delivers the benefits of fixed income in a variety of scenarios.”
PRISCILLA HANCOCK, GLOBAL FIXED INCOME STRATEGIST 






BUILDING STRONGER FIXED INCOME PORTFOLIOS


Download the framework >






Fixed income funds
                         


View All Taxable Fixed Income Funds   
View All Tax Exempt Fixed Income Funds  




Other Asset Classes
                         


Equity Funds  
Multi-Asset Solutions  
Alternatives Funds  
Money Market Funds  






Investments in bonds and other debt securities will change in value based on changes in interest rates. If rates rise, the value of these investments generally drops.
 
Diversification does not guarantee investment returns and does not eliminate the risk of loss. Diversification among investment options and asset classes may help to reduce overall volatility.


















Products - J.P. Morgan Asset Management






For the best experience on this page, please enable JavaScript in your browser.
Need to know how to enable it? Go here.









CLOSE



My Collections


My ProfileContact Us



Skip to main content













Input search bar




				Products
			
Email ThisPrint


Investment Strategies

Providing clients with strategies and expertise that span the full spectrum of asset classes
                         


	As a global leader in asset management with assets under management of $1.7 trillion*, J.P. Morgan Asset Management provides more than 220 investment strategies spanning all major asset classes, investment styles and geographic regions.

	Investing with J.P. Morgan:


		a large global organization made up of small local teams

		a research-driven information advantage

		an unrelenting focus on risk management


* As of December 2015









Featured Funds
                         


Equity  
Fixed Income   
Multi-Asset Solutions   
Alternatives  
SmartRetirement Target Date Funds   
Exchange Traded Funds  
Money Market Funds  






		 





Product Spotlight


U.S. Equity


International & Global Equity


Fixed Income


Multi-Asset Solutions


Alternatives


ETFs


Money Market



U.S. Equity




U.S. Equity


International & Global Equity


Fixed Income


Multi-Asset Solutions


Alternatives


ETFs


Money Market























Insights

					Market Insights

					Portfolio Insights

					Retirement Insights
















Guide to the Markets - J.P. Morgan Asset Management






For the best experience on this page, please enable JavaScript in your browser.
Need to know how to enable it? Go here.









CLOSE



My Collections


My ProfileContact Us



Skip to main content













Input search bar




				Guide to the Markets
			



Guide to the Markets
                         


	The Guide illustrates a comprehensive array of market and economic histories, trends and statistics through clear, compelling charts and graphs you can share with your clients.


LAUNCH THE VIEWER


Download the 3Q 2017 Guide to the Markets






Economic & Market Update
Watch Dr. David Kelly’s quarterly presentation using slides from the Guide to the Markets.Continue reading  


On the Bench
Need more Guide to the Markets? Access an additional collection of Guide to the Markets slides, updated on a quarterly basis.Continue reading  


Investing Principles
The Principles for successful long-term investing presentation uses select slides from the Guide to the Markets to explain seven key investment principles that financial professionals can use with their clients. Continue reading  


 Introducing the Guide to the Markets for the third quarter of 2017July 3, 2017Dr. David Kelly, Chief Global Strategist, J.P. Morgan Funds, previews this quarter's themes and invites you to subscribe to the Guide to the Markets. 


 

Quarterly Perspectives





                            Often referred to as the 'guide to the Guide', Quarterly Perspectives provides insightful stories and quarterly themes using slides from the Guide to the Markets. 
                            
View Quarterly Perspectives



Portfolio Discussions





                            Focusing on different asset classes or regions, Portfolio Discussions help to frame investment conversations using slides from Guide to the Markets. 
                            

View Portfolio Discussions





Insights

					Market Insights

					Portfolio Insights

					Retirement Insights


The J. P. Morgan Insights app 

A new way for financial advisors to access and customize J.P. Morgan intellectual capital
                         

                            Get the Insights app:
                            


           
              



Learn more about the Insights App











Past performance is no guarantee of future results. Diversification does not guarantee investment returns and does not eliminate the risk of loss.
Bonds are subject to interest rate risks. Bond prices generally fall when interest rates rise.
The price of equity securities may rise or fall because of changes in the broad market or changes in a company's financial condition, sometimes rapidly or unpredictably. Equity securities are subject to "stock market risk" meaning that stock prices in general may decline over short or extended periods of time.
International investing involves a greater degree of risk and increased volatility. Changes in currency exchange rates and differences in accounting and taxation policies outside the U.S. can raise or lower returns. Also, some overseas markets may not be as politically and economically stable as the United States and other nations. Investments in emerging markets can be more volatile.
Real estate investments may be subject to a higher degree of market risk because of concentration in a specific industry, sector or geographical sector. Real estate investments may be subject to risks including, but not limited to, declines in the value of real estate, risks related to general and economic conditions, changes in the value of the underlying property owned by the trust and defaults by borrower.
Investments in commodities may have greater volatility than investments in traditional securities, particularly if the instruments involve leverage. The value of commodity-linked derivative instruments may be affected by changes in overall market movements, commodity index volatility, changes in interest rates, or factors affecting a particular industry or commodity, such as drought, floods, weather, livestock disease, embargoes, tariffs and international economic, political and regulatory developments. Use of leveraged commodity-linked derivatives creates an opportunity for increased return but, at the same time, creates the possibility for greater loss. 
Derivatives may be riskier than other types of investments because they may be more sensitive to changes in economic or market conditions than other types of investments and could result in losses that significantly exceed the original investment. The use of derivatives may not be successful, resulting in investment losses, and the cost of such strategies may reduce investment returns.
There is no guarantee that the use of long and short positions will succeed in limiting an investor's exposure to domestic stock market movements, capitalization, sector swings or other risk factors. Investing using long and short selling strategies may have higher portfolio turnover rates. Short selling involves certain risks, including additional costs associated with covering short positions and a possibility of unlimited loss on certain short sale positions.
JPMorgan Chase & Co. and its affiliates do not provide tax advice. Accordingly, any discussion of U.S. tax matters contained herein (including any attachments) is not intended or written to be used, and cannot be used, in connection with the promotion, marketing or recommendation by anyone unaffiliated with JPMorgan Chase & Co. of any of the matters addressed herein or for the purpose of avoiding U.S. tax-related penalties. 






WisdomTree Rising Rates ETFs









































































The low interest rates of the past several years may be on the cusp of a directional shift. As many prepare for a rising-rate environment, WisdomTree's ETFs may help investors reduce exposure to interest rate risk while preserving coverage and income potential: WisdomTree Barclays Interest Rate Hedged U.S. Aggregate Bond Fund (AGZD), WisdomTree Barclays Negative Duration U.S. Aggregate Bond Fund (AGND), WisdomTree Interest Rate Hedged High Yield Bond Fund (HYZD). WisdomTree Negative Duration High Yield Bond Fund (HYND), WisdomTree Bloomberg Floating Rate Treasury Fund (USFR).


















































Highlighted fields are required to register.


Account Type:






                                                    Individual Investor
                                                    
                                                    Financial Professional 
















Email:






Company Name:



First Name:



Last Name:



Password:



Confirm Password:



Country:

United States
                                                    
                                                    


State:

Select State:
                                                    
                                                    Alabama
                                                    
                                                    Alaska
                                                    
                                                    Arizona
                                                    
                                                    Arkansas
                                                    
                                                    California
                                                    
                                                    Colorado
                                                    
                                                    Connecticut
                                                    
                                                    Delaware
                                                    
                                                    District of Columbia
                                                    
                                                    Florida
                                                    
                                                    Georgia
                                                    
                                                    Hawaii
                                                    
                                                    Idaho
                                                    
                                                    Illinois
                                                    
                                                    Indiana
                                                    
                                                    Iowa
                                                    
                                                    Kansas
                                                    
                                                    Kentucky
                                                    
                                                    Louisiana
                                                    
                                                    Maine
                                                    
                                                    Maryland
                                                    
                                                    Massachusetts
                                                    
                                                    Michigan
                                                    
                                                    Minnesota
                                                    
                                                    Mississippi
                                                    
                                                    Missouri
                                                    
                                                    Montana
                                                    
                                                    Nebraska
                                                    
                                                    Nevada
                                                    
                                                    New Hampshire
                                                    
                                                    New Jersey
                                                    
                                                    New Mexico
                                                    
                                                    New York
                                                    
                                                    North Carolina
                                                    
                                                    North Dakota
                                                    
                                                    Ohio
                                                    
                                                    Oklahoma
                                                    
                                                    Oregon
                                                    
                                                    Pennsylvania
                                                    
                                                    Rhode Island
                                                    
                                                    South Carolina
                                                    
                                                    South Dakota
                                                    
                                                    Tennessee
                                                    
                                                    Texas
                                                    
                                                    Utah
                                                    
                                                    Vermont
                                                    
                                                    Virginia
                                                    
                                                    Washington
                                                    
                                                    West Virginia
                                                    
                                                    Wisconsin
                                                    
                                                    Wyoming
                                                    
                                                    Other
                                                    
                                                    



By submitting below you certify that you have read and agree to our privacy policy.














                                                    Already Registered? Access the Case for
                                                    AGZD,
                                                    
                                                    AGND,
                                                    HYND and
                                                    HYZD



































                                    You cannot invest directly in an Index.

This information must be preceded or accompanied by a prospectus, click here to view or download prospectus. We advise you to consider the fund's objectives, risks, charges and expenses carefully before investing. The prospectus contains this and other important information about the fund. Please read the prospectus carefully before you invest.

                                    There are risks associated with investing, including possible loss of principal. Fixed income investments are subject to interest rate risk; their value will normally decline as interest rates rise. The Fund seeks to mitigate interest rate risk by taking short positions in U.S. Treasuries, but there is no guarantee this will be achieved. Derivative investments can be volatile and these investments may be less liquid than other securities, and more sensitive to the effects of varied economic conditions.

                                    Fixed income investments are also subject to credit risk, the risk that the issuer of a bond will fail to pay interest and principal in a timely manner, or that negative perceptions of the issuer's ability to make such payments will cause the price of that bond to decline. The Funds may engage in “short sale” transactions of U.S. Treasuries where losses may be exaggerated, potentially losing more money than the actual cost of the investment and the third party to the short sale may fail to honor its contract terms, causing a loss to the Funds. While the Funds attempt to limit credit and counterparty exposure, the value of an investment in the Funds may change quickly and without warning in response to issuer or counterparty defaults and changes in the credit ratings of the Funds’ portfolio investments. Investing in mortgage- and asset-backed securities involves interest rate, credit, valuation, extension and liquidity risks and the risk that payments on the underlying assets are delayed, prepaid, subordinated or defaulted on. 

                                    Securities with floating rates can be less sensitive to interest rate changes than securities with fixed interest rates, but may decline in value. The issuance of floating rate notes by the U.S. Treasury is new and the amount of supply will be limited.  Fixed income securities will normally decline in value as interest rates rise.  The value of an investment in the Fund may change quickly and without warning in response to issuer or counterparty defaults and changes in the credit ratings of the Fund’s portfolio investments. Due to the investment strategy of certain Funds’ they may make higher capital gain distributions than other ETFs. Please read the Funds’ prospectus for specific details regarding the Funds’ risk profile.






WisdomTree Funds are distributed by Foreside Fund Services, LLC, in the U.S. only. Foreside Fund Services is not affiliated with the other entities mentioned.

 





































Blog | WisdomTree



























                Menu 
                









WisdomTree ETFs                                                    







 



                                            All ETFs
                




 



                                            Equity ETFs
                




 



                                            Fixed Income ETFs
                




 



                                            Alternative ETFs
                




 



                                            Currency ETFs
                




 



                                            All Indexes
                














Strategies                                                    







 



                                            Smart Beta
                




 



                                            Rising Rates Solutions
                




 



                                            Currency Hedging
                




 



                                            Quality Dividend Growth
                




 



                                            Fixed Income Solutions
                




 



                                            Emerging Markets
                














Resource Library                                                    







 



                                            WisdomTree Resources
                




 



                                            Prospectus & Regulatory
                




 



                                            Fact Sheets & Reports
                














Investor Community                                                    







 



                                            Financial Advisors
                




 



                                            Institutional Accounts
                














Blog                                                    







 



                                            All Blogs
                




 



                                            ETF Education
                




 



                                            Emerging Markets
                




 



                                            Interest Rate Strategies
                
















                                    About
                                












                                            Who we are
                                        









                                            Contact Us
                                        









                                            Press Room
                                        









                                            Careers
                                        














                                                    Investor Relations
                                                













                                                    Contact Us
                                                













                                                International Sites 
                                            












Canada                                                    









Switzerland                                                    









Germany                                                    









Finland                                                    









France                                                    









United Kingdom                                                    









Ireland                                                    









Italy                                                    









Japan                                                    









Luxembourg                                                    









Netherlands                                                    









Norway                                                    









Sweden                                                    









United States















                                                        Sign In / Register
                                                
























 BACK 
                


















About




Who we are


Contact Us


Press Room


Careers





Investor Relations 

Contact Us 




USA






CAN





CHE





DEU





FIN





FRA





GBR





IRL





ITA





JPN





LUX





NLD





NOR





SWE










Get access to exclusive content, industry insights, and more:
SIGN IN/REGISTER

















                                            WisdomTree ETFs
                                        







                            All ETFs
                        



                            Equity ETFs
                        



                            Fixed Income ETFs
                        



                            Alternative ETFs
                        



                            Currency ETFs
                        



                            All Indexes
                        







                                    Domestic Dividends
                                



                                    Domestic Earnings
                                



                                    Multifactor
                                



                                    Developed World ex-U.S.
                                



                                    Global/Global ex-U.S.
                                



                                    Emerging/Frontier Markets
                                



                                    Currency Hedged Equity
                                





                                    Strategic Core
                                



                                    Fundamental
                                



                                    International
                                



                                    Interest Rate Strategies
                                




DYLS
WisdomTree Dynamic Long/Short U.S. Equity Fund


DYB
WisdomTree Dynamic Bearish U.S. Equity Fund


WDTI
WisdomTree Managed Futures Strategy 


PUTW
WisdomTree CBOE S&P 500 PutWrite Strategy Fund


RRF
Global Real Return


GCC
WisdomTree Continuous Commodity Index Fund





                                    Domestic
                                



                                    Emerging Markets
                                






DTD
WisdomTree U.S. Total Dividend Fund


DLN
WisdomTree U.S. LargeCap Dividend Fund


DON
WisdomTree U.S. MidCap Dividend Fund


DES
WisdomTree U.S. SmallCap Dividend Fund


DHS
WisdomTree U.S. High Dividend Fund


DTN
WisdomTree U.S. Dividend ex-Financials Fund


DGRW
WisdomTree U.S. Quality Dividend Growth Fund


DGRS
WisdomTree U.S. SmallCap Quality Dividend Growth Fund




EXT
WisdomTree U.S. Total Earnings Fund


EPS
WisdomTree U.S. Earnings 500 Fund


EZM
WisdomTree U.S. MidCap Earnings Fund


EES
WisdomTree U.S. SmallCap Earnings Fund


EZY
WisdomTree U.S. LargeCap Value Fund


WUSA
WisdomTree U.S. Domestic Economy Fund


WEXP
WisdomTree U.S. Export and Multinational Fund




USMF
WisdomTree U.S. Multifactor Fund




DWM
WisdomTree International Equity Fund


DOL
WisdomTree International LargeCap Dividend Fund


DIM
WisdomTree International MidCap Dividend  Fund


DLS
WisdomTree International SmallCap Dividend Fund


DTH
WisdomTree International High Dividend Fund


DOO
WisdomTree International Dividend ex-Financials Fund


IQDG
WisdomTree International Quality Dividend Growth Fund


EUDG
WisdomTree Europe Quality Dividend Growth Fund


EDOM
WisdomTree Europe Domestic Economy Fund


DFE
WisdomTree Europe SmallCap Dividend Fund


DFJ
WisdomTree Japan SmallCap Dividend Fund


AUSE
WisdomTree Australia Dividend Fund




DEW
WisdomTree Global High Dividend Fund


DNL
WisdomTree Global ex‐U.S. Quality Dividend Growth Fund


GSD
WisdomTree Global SmallCap Dividend Fund


DRW
WisdomTree Global ex-U.S. Real Estate Fund


AXJL
WisdomTree Asia Pacific ex-Japan Fund


XMX
WisdomTree Global ex-Mexico Equity Fund




DVEM
WisdomTree Emerging Markets Dividend Fund


DEM
WisdomTree Emerging Markets High Dividend Fund


DGS
WisdomTree Emerging Markets SmallCap Dividend Fund


DGRE
WisdomTree Emerging Markets Quality Dividend Growth Fund


EMCG
WisdomTree Emerging Markets Consumer Growth Fund


EMSD
WisdomTree Strong Dollar Emerging Markets Equity Fund


EPI
WisdomTree India Earnings Fund


XSOE
WisdomTree Emerging Markets ex-State-Owned Enterprises Fund


CXSE
WisdomTree China ex-State-Owned Enterprises Fund


GULF
WisdomTree Middle East Dividend Fund




HEDJ
WisdomTree Europe Hedged Equity Fund


EUSC
WisdomTree Europe Hedged SmallCap Equity Fund


DXGE
WisdomTree Germany Hedged Equity Fund


DXUS
WisdomTree Global ex-U.S. Hedged Dividend Fund


IHDG
WisdomTree International Hedged Quality Dividend Growth Fund


HGSD
WisdomTree Global Hedged SmallCap Dividend Fund


DXPS
WisdomTree United Kingdom Hedged Equity Fund


HDRW
WisdomTree Global ex-U.S. Hedged Real Estate Fund


DXJ
WisdomTree Japan Hedged Equity Fund


JHDG
WisdomTree Japan Hedged Quality Dividend Growth Fund


DXJS
WisdomTree Japan Hedged SmallCap Equity Fund


DXJF
WisdomTree Japan Hedged Financials Fund


DXJR
WisdomTree Japan Hedged Real Estate Fund


DXJC
WisdomTree Japan Hedged Capital Goods Fund


DXJH
WisdomTree Japan Hedged Health Care Fund


DDWM
WisdomTree Dynamic Currency Hedged International Equity Fund


DHDG
WisdomTree Dynamic Currency Hedged International Quality Dividend Growth Fund


DDLS
WisdomTree Dynamic Currency Hedged International SmallCap Equity Fund


DDEZ
WisdomTree Dynamic Currency Hedged Europe Equity Fund


DDJP
WisdomTree Dynamic Currency Hedged Japan Equity Fund




CRDT
WisdomTree Strategic Corporate Bond Fund


UBND
WisdomTree Western Asset Unconstrained Bond Fund


AGGY
WisdomTree Barclays Yield Enhanced U.S. Aggregate Bond Fund


SHAG
WisdomTree Barclays Yield Enhanced U.S. Short-Term Aggregate Bond Fund




WFIG
WisdomTree Fundamental U.S. Corporate Bond Fund


SFIG
WisdomTree Fundamental U.S. Short-Term Corporate Bond Fund


WFHY
WisdomTree Fundamental U.S. High Yield Corporate Bond Fund


SFHY
WisdomTree Fundamental U.S. Short-Term High Yield Corporate Bond Fund




EMCB
WisdomTree Emerging Markets Corporate Bond Fund


ELD
WisdomTree Emerging Markets Local Debt Fund


ALD
WisdomTree Asia Local Debt Fund




AGZD
WisdomTree Barclays Interest Rate Hedged U.S. Aggregate Bond Fund


AGND
WisdomTree Barclays Negative Duration U.S. Aggregate Bond Fund


HYZD
WisdomTree Interest Rate Hedged High Yield Bond Fund


HYND
WisdomTree Negative Duration High Yield Bond Fund


USFR
WisdomTree Bloomberg Floating Rate Treasury Fund




USDU
WisdomTree Bloomberg U.S. Dollar Bullish Fund




CYB
WisdomTree Chinese Yuan Strategy Fund


BZF
WisdomTree Brazilian Real Strategy Fund


CEW
WisdomTree Emerging Currency Strategy Fund












                                            STRATEGIES
                                        



Smart Beta
Rising Rates Solutions
Currency Hedging
Quality Dividend Growth
Fixed Income Solutions
Emerging Markets






                                            RESOURCE LIBRARY
                                        



WisdomTree Resources
Prospectus & Regulatory
Fact Sheets & Reports






                                            INVESTOR COMMUNITY
                                        



Financial Advisors
Institutional Accounts






                                            BLOG
                                        



All Blogs
ETF Education
Emerging Markets
Interest Rate Strategies














My WisdomTree - Sign in
 










Remember me


SIGN IN


Forgot your password?








Not Registered? Register Now.
Individual investors who register can access daily blog posts, latest videos, podcasts and snapshots, and stay current with industry insights. On top of that, Financial Professionals get additional access to thoughtful research, smart analytics and unique economic commentary from Jeremy Siegel.
1. My Profile >2. Additional Information




 


Account Type


Individual Investor



 Financial Professional


































Select Country
Afghanistan
Åland Islands
Albania
Algeria
American Samoa
Andorra
Angola
Anguilla
Antarctica
Antigua and Barbuda
Argentina
Armenia
Aruba
Australia
Austria
Azerbaijan
Bahamas
Bahrain
Bangladesh
Barbados
Belarus
Belgium
Belize
Benin
Bermuda
Bhutan
Bolivia
Bosnia and Herzegovina
Botswana
Bouvet Island
Brazil
British Indian Ocean Territory
Brunei Darussalam
Bulgaria
Burkina Faso
Burundi
Cambodia
Cameroon
Canada
Cape Verde
Cayman Islands
Central African Republic
Chad
Chile
China
Christmas Island
Cocos (Keeling) Islands
Colombia
Comoros
Congo
Congo, The Democratic Republic of the
Cook Islands
Costa Rica
Côte d'Ivoire
Croatia
Cuba
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Denmark
Djibouti
Dominica
Dominican Republic
Ecuador
Egypt
El Salvador
Equatorial Guinea
Eritrea
Estonia
Ethiopia
Falkland Islands (Malvinas)
Faroe Islands
Fiji
Finland
France
French Guiana
French Polynesia
French Southern Territories
Gabon
Gambia
Georgia
Germany
Ghana
Gibraltar
Greece
Greenland
Grenada
Guadeloupe
Guam
Guatemala
Guernsey
Guinea
Guinea-Bissau
Guyana
Haiti
Heard Island and McDonald Islands
Holy See (Vatican City State)
Honduras
Hong Kong
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Iran, Islamic Republic of
Iraq
Ireland
Isle of Man
Israel
Italy
Jamaica
Japan
Jersey
Jordan
Kazakhstan
Kenya
Kiribati
Kuwait
Kyrgyzstan
Laos People's Democratic Republic
Latvia
Lebanon
Lesotho
Liberia
Libyan Arab Jamahiriya
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Macau
Madagascar
Malawi
Malaysia
Maldives
Mali
Malta
Marshall Islands
Martinique
Mauritania
Mauritius
Mayotte
Mexico
Micronesia, Federated States of
Moldova
Monaco
Mongolia
Montenegro
Montserrat
Morocco
Mozambique
Myanmar
Namibia
Nauru
Nepal
Netherlands
Netherlands Antilles
New Caledonia
New Zealand
Nicaragua
Niger
Nigeria
Niue
Norfolk Island
Korea, Democratic People's Republic of
Northern Mariana Islands
Norway
Oman
Pakistan
Palau
Palestinian Territory, Occupied
Panama
Papua New Guinea
Paraguay
Peru
Philippines
Pitcairn Islands
Poland
Portugal
Puerto Rico
Qatar
Réunion
Romania
Russian Federation
Rwanda
Saint Barthélemy
Saint Helena
Saint Kitts and Nevis
Saint Lucia
Saint Martin
Saint Pierre and Miquelon
Saint Vincent and the Grenadines
Samoa
San Marino
Sao Tome and Principe
Saudi Arabia
Senegal
Serbia
Seychelles
Sierra Leone
Singapore
Slovakia
Slovenia
Solomon Islands
Somalia
South Africa
Korea, Republic of
Spain
Sri Lanka
Sudan
Suriname
Svalbard and Jan Mayen
Swaziland
Sweden
Switzerland
Syrian Arab Republic
Taiwan, Province of China
Tajikistan
Tanzania, United Republic of
Thailand
Timor-Leste
Togo
Tokelau
Tonga
Trinidad and Tobago
Tunisia
Turkey
Turkmenistan
Turks and Caicos Islands
Tuvalu
Uganda
Ukraine
United Arab Emirates
United Kingdom
United States
United States Minor Outlying Islands
Uruguay
Uzbekistan
Vanuatu
Venezuela
Vietnam
Virgin Islands, British
Virgin Islands, U.S.
Wallis and Futuna
Western Sahara
Yemen
Zambia
Zimbabwe




State
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming
Other





By submitting below you certify that you have read and agree to our privacy policy.









NEXT STEP










Home


Blog

 
THE WisdomTree BLOG
 






                                    POSTS
                                









                                    CONTRIBUTORS
                                









                                    ARCHIVE
                                














Kevin Flanagan 
									/ Fixed Income, U.S. Treasuries, Interest Rate Strategies, Income Strategies
 05/10/2017
								

Fixed Income Strategy: Staying on Course


Kevin Flanagan 



									When examining the appropriate course for fixed income strategies thus far in 2017, we appear to be staying on course. The overall premise for fixed income investing has essentially been playing out according to our base case: blending a strategic core approach with a complementary solution for the potential of higher rates later in the year.
								

SEE MORE







Bradley Krom 
									/ Interest Rate Strategies
 03/23/2017
								

Playing Better Defense with Rate-Hedged High-Yield Bonds


Bradley Krom 



With global economic activity accelerating, a commonsense trade has been to be over-weight high-yield debt as the outlook for risky borrowers continues to improve. While we have long advocated for this shift in portfolios, we believe there may be a more intuitive way for investors to play defense via interest rate-hedged high-yield bonds.


SEE MORE







Luciano Siracusano III 
											,
										Christopher Carrano 
									/ Equity, Small Caps, Mid-Caps, Earnings, Japan, Currency Hedged Equity, Interest Rate Strategies
 03/16/2017
								

The Fed Moves: What It May Mean for Equities


Luciano Siracusano III,										Christopher Carrano 



									From the presidential election through March 9, the U.S. dollar rallied 4.3%, according to the Bloomberg Dollar Spot Index. Given the recent rate hike, and that many market participants believe there are additional rate hikes on the horizon, what are the equity asset classes that may benefit from rising rates and a rising dollar?
								

SEE MORE







Kevin Flanagan 
									/ Market News, U.S. Treasuries, Fixed Income, Interest Rate Strategies
 03/15/2017
								

Fed Watch: Spring Forward


Kevin Flanagan 



									Much like our clocks this past weekend, the Federal Reserve decided to “spring forward” with its monetary policy decisions. What was the reasoning behind this latest rate hike, and where does that leave potential policy decisions going forward?
								

SEE MORE







Kevin Flanagan 
									/ Fixed Income, Floating Rate Treasury, Interest Rate Strategies
 03/01/2017
								

In Like a Lion?


Kevin Flanagan 



The fixed income arena seems to be facing an interesting dilemma as the calendar turns to March. Will the money and bond markets have to weather the storm from potentially higher rates, or will the storm clouds part as monetary policy developments here in the U.S. give way to the upcoming elections in the Netherlands and France?


SEE MORE


























Jeremy J  Siegel
Senior Investment Strategy Advisor



                        Jeremy J. Siegel, WisdomTree’s Senior Investment Strategy Advisor, is the Russell E. Palmer Professor of Finance at The Wharton School of the University of Pennsylvania. Professor Siegel has written and lectured extensively about the economy and financial markets and is a regular contributor to the financial news media. In 1994, he received the highest teaching rating in a ranking of business school professors conducted by BusinessWeek magazine. His book Stocks for the Long Run was named by The Washington Post as one of the 10 best investment books of all time. His latest book, The Future for Investors, is a bestseller.
                    

Read All Articles






Luciano Siracusano III
Chief Investment Strategist



                        Luciano Siracusano is WisdomTree’s Chief Investment Strategist. He is the co-creator, with CEO Jonathan Steinberg, of WisdomTree’s patented Indexing methodology. Mr. Siracusano led WisdomTree’s sales organization from October 2008 until June of 2015, while also serving as the firm’s Chief Investment Strategist. Luciano stepped down as WisdomTree’s Head of Sales in 2015 to focus full time on his duties as Chief Investment Strategist. From 2001 until October 2008, Luciano was WisdomTree’s Director of Research and was responsible for the creation and development of WisdomTree’s proprietary stock indexes. Luciano is a regular guest on CNBC and FOX Business, and speaks and writes frequently on ETFs, indexing and global financial markets. A former equity analyst at Value Line, Luciano began his career as a speechwriter for former New York Governor Mario Cuomo and HUD Secretary Henry Cisneros. He graduated from Columbia University with a B.A. in Political Science in 1987.
                    

Read All Articles






Jonathan Steinberg
CEO of WisdomTree



                        Prior to establishing WisdomTree, Jonathan founded, and served as Chairman and CEO of Individual Investor Group, Inc. From 1998 to 2004, he held the role of Editor-in-Chief of Individual Investor and Ticker magazines. Before his entrepreneurial accomplishments, Jonathan was an Analyst in the Mergers & Acquisitions division at Bear Stearns & Co. He attended The Wharton School at the University of Pennsylvania and is the author of Midas Investing, published by Random House in 1996.
                    

Read All Articles






Jesper Koll
WisdomTree's Head of Japan



                        Jesper Koll was appointed WisdomTree's Head of Japan on July 1, 2015. Over the past two decades Jesper has been consistently ranked as one of the top Japan strategists/economists, working as Chief Strategist and Head of Research for major U.S. investment banks J.P. Morgan and Merrill Lynch. His analysis and insights have earned him a position on several Japanese government advisory committees and Jesper is also one of the few non-Japanese members of the Keizai Doyukai, the Japan Association of Corporate Executives. He has written two books in Japanese, Towards a New Japanese Golden Age and The End of Heisei Deflation. After arriving in Japan in 1986 Jesper initially worked as an aide to a Member of Parliament. Jesper has a Masters degree from the School of Advanced and International Studies at Johns Hopkins University and was a research fellow at both Tokyo University and Kyoto University. He is a graduate of the Lester B. Pearson College of the Pacific.
                    

Read All Articles






Jeremy Schwartz
Director of Research



                        Jeremy is responsible for the WisdomTree equity index construction process and oversees research across the WisdomTree family. Prior to joining WisdomTree, Jeremy was Professor Jeremy Siegel's head research assistant and helped with the research and writing of Stocks for the Long Run and The Future for Investors. He is also co-author of the Financial Analysts Journal paper "What Happened to the Original Stocks in the S&P 500?" Jeremy is a graduate of The Wharton School of the University of Pennsylvania and currently stays involved with Wharton by hosting the Wharton Business Radio program “Behind the Markets” on SiriusXM 111. Jeremy is also a member of the CFA Society of Philadelphia.
                    

Read All Articles






Christopher Gannatti
Associate Director of Research



                        Christopher Gannatti began at WisdomTree as a Research Analyst in December 2010, working directly with Jeremy Schwartz, CFA®, Director of Research. He is involved in creating and communicating WisdomTree’s thoughts on the markets, as well as analyzing existing strategies and developing new approaches. Christopher came to WisdomTree from Lord Abbett, where he worked for four and a half years as a Regional Consultant. He received his MBA in Quantitative Finance, Accounting, and Economics from NYU’s Stern School of Business in 2010, and he received his bachelor’s degree from Colgate University in Economics in 2006. Christopher is a holder of the Chartered Financial Analyst designation.
                    

Read All Articles






Kevin Flanagan
Senior Fixed Income Strategist



                        As part of WisdomTree’s Investment Strategy group, Kevin serves as Senior Fixed Income Strategist. In this role, he contributes to the asset allocation team, writes fixed income-related content and travels with the sales team, conducting client-facing meetings and providing expertise on WisdomTree’s existing and future bond ETFs. In addition, Kevin works closely with the fixed income team. Prior to joining WisdomTree, Kevin spent 30 years at Morgan Stanley, where he was most recently a Managing Director. He was responsible for tactical and strategic recommendations and created asset allocation models for fixed income securities. He was a contributor to the Morgan Stanley Wealth Management Global Investment Committee, primary author of Morgan Stanley Wealth Management’s monthly and weekly fixed income publications, and collaborated with the firm’s Research and Consulting Group Divisions to build ETF and fund manager asset allocation models. Kevin has an MBA from Pace University’s Lubin Graduate School of Business, and a B.S in Finance from Fairfield University.
                    

Read All Articles






Bradley Krom
Fixed Income & Currency



                        Bradley Krom joined WisdomTree as a member of the Fixed Income and Currency team in December 2010. He is involved in creating and communicating WisdomTree’s thoughts on currency and fixed income markets, as well as analyzing existing and new fund strategies. Prior to joining WisdomTree, Bradley served as a senior trader on a proprietary trading desk at TransMarket Group. Bradley is a graduate of the Wharton School, University of Pennsylvania.
                    

Read All Articles






Tripp Zimmerman
Associate Director of Research



                        Tripp Zimmerman began at WisdomTree as a Research Analyst in February 2013. Now, as an Associate Director of Research, he leads the Firm’s data analytics group, responsible for index creation, maintenance and reconstitution. Tripp travels domestically and internationally to speak about WisdomTree index capabilities and meets with clients across various sales channels. He is also involved in creating and communicating WisdomTree’s thoughts on the markets. Prior to joining WisdomTree, Tripp worked in various investment-related roles for TD Ameritrade, Wells Fargo Advisors, TIAA-CREF and Evergreen Investments. Tripp graduated from The University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill with dual degrees in Economics and Philosophy. Tripp is a holder of the Chartered Financial Analyst designation.
                    

Read All Articles






Rick Harper
Head of Fixed Income & Currency



                        Rick Harper serves as the Head of Fixed Income and Currency for WisdomTree Asset Management, where he oversees the firm’s suite of fixed income and currency exchange-traded funds.  Rick has over 22 years investment experience in strategy and portfolio management positions at prominent investment firms. Prior to joining WisdomTree in 2007, Rick held senior level strategist roles with RBC Dain Rauscher, Bank One Capital Markets, ETF Advisors, and Nuveen Investments. At ETF Advisors, he was the portfolio manager and developer of some of the first fixed income exchange-traded funds. His research has been featured in leading periodicals including the Journal of Portfolio Management and the Journal of Indexes. He graduated from Emory University and earned his MBA at Indiana University.
                    

Read All Articles






Ambar Bajaj
Fixed Income & Currency



                        Ambar Bajaj joined WisdomTree as a member of the Fixed Income and Currency team in September 2011. He is involved in creating and communicating WisdomTree’s thoughts on currency and fixed income markets, as well as analyzing existing and new fund strategies. Prior to joining WisdomTree, Ambar traded interest rate derivatives and US Treasuries for a proprietary trading firm. Ambar graduated from the University of Rochester with dual degrees in Economics and Mathematics.
                    

Read All Articles






Gaurav Sinha
Asset Allocation Strategist



                        Gaurav Sinha is currently working as Asset Allocation Strategist at WisdomTree since November 2014. He is leading the Portfolio Analytics and Solutions team and builds specialized investment solutions along with customized analytics for our clients. He is also deeply involved in advancing WisdomTree’s product suite, and has particular expertise on India. Gaurav came to WisdomTree after stints at World Bank, Morgan Stanley and recently with Windhaven Investment Management. He received his Masters in Financial Engineering from Columbia University in 2009 and holds a bachelors Engineering degree from the prestigious Indian Institute Of Technology (IIT).
                    

Read All Articles






Anita Rausch
Head of Capital Markets



                        Anita Rausch is Head of the Capital Markets team. The Capital Markets group is involved in all aspects of WisdomTree ETFs including product development, seeding and bringing new products to market, and working with the client base on trading strategies and best execution strategies. Anita is responsible for the relationships with the trading community and works with them to support the liquidity of the WisdomTree ETFs. Prior to joining WisdomTree, Anita was an Executive Director on the JP Morgan ETF trading desk where she facilitated trades for a wide subset of clients across all ETFs. Anita started her career at Morgan Stanley and became an Executive Director on their ETF trading desk, in charge of the International ETF product. Anita is also a major contributor to both of David Abner’s books, The ETF Handbook (Wiley, 2010) and The Visual Guide to ETFs (Bloomberg, 2013).
                    

Read All Articles






Michael Barrer
Senior Associate of Capital Markets



                        Michael Barrer is a member of the Capital Markets team based in New York. The Capital Markets group is involved in all aspects of WisdomTree ETFs, including product development, seeding and bringing new products to market and working with the client base on trading strategies and best execution strategies. Michael also supports the trading community on providing liquidity and works closely with Hedge Funds on trading and investing in WisdomTree ETFs. Michael began his career in finance as an equity and ETF proprietary trader, followed by two years at Merrill Lynch in an investment-related role. Since joining WisdomTree in 2013, Michael spent a year and a half as an integral member of the sales team and later joined the Capital Markets group to concentrate on his passion for ETF markets and trading. Michael graduated in 2004 from Syracuse University with a focus on business and technology.
                    

Read All Articles






Paige Corbin
Capital Markets Associate



                        Paige Corbin is a member of the Capital Markets team based in New York. The Capital Markets group is involved in all aspects of WisdomTree ETFs, including product development, seeding and bringing new products to market and working with the investor base on trading and best execution strategies. Paige also supports the trading community on providing liquidity and works closely with Hedge Funds and RIAs on trading and investing in WisdomTree ETFs. Paige began her career in finance at Bloomberg LP and subsequently at Bloomberg Tradebook working with clients on electronic trading solutions, developing an expertise in ETF trading. Paige graduated in 2009 from the University of Virginia.
                    

Read All Articles






Zach Hascoe
Capital Markets



                        Zach Hascoe is currently a member of the WisdomTree Corporate Strategy team based in New York.  Prior to this, Zach was the Director of Capital Markets for WisdomTree Europe Ltd based in London. He was responsible for building and growing the capital markets infrastructure for the WisdomTree Europe product set among the various market making and trading counterparties across Europe. In addition, Zach was responsible for managing the capital markets relationships with the stock exchanges, authorized participants (APs), market making firms and investment bank institutional sales and trading businesses.  Zach began at WisdomTree in New York in August 2010 and has been involved in all aspects of the WisdomTree ETFs including product development, helping to seed and bring new products to market, as well as trading strategies and best execution strategies for the client base. He is a frequent contributor to the WisdomTree blog on topics related to the capital markets, liquidity, structure and best execution. Zach received a B.A. from Bucknell University in Political Science and was Captain of the Bucknell Tennis Team. 
                    

Read All Articles






David Abner
Head of Europe



                        David Abner is WisdomTree's Head of Europe. Prior to joining WisdomTree in 2008, David spent two years as a Managing Director and the head of ETF Trading Americas at BNP Paribas. David started his career at Bear Stearns & Co. in 1992. David holds an MS in Management and a BA in Economics from Stony Brook University on Long Island. He is the author of The ETF Handbook (Wiley, 2010) and The Visual Guide to ETFs (Bloomberg, summer 2012).
                    

Read All Articles






Christopher Carrano
Investment Analyst



                        Christopher Carrano is an investment analyst at WisdomTree. He works under Luciano Siracusano, WisdomTree’s Chief Investment Strategist, assisting with market and editorial research. Christopher first joined WisdomTree in April of 2014, and later rejoined the company in September of 2015 after spending time abroad. Prior to WisdomTree, Christopher was an investment consulting intern at Mercer where he monitored and analyzed the investments, and investment managers, of retirement plans and endowments. He graduated from Columbia University with a B.A. in Economics in 2014.
                    

Read All Articles






Joseph Tenaglia
Asset Allocation Strategist



                        Joseph Tenaglia joined WisdomTree as an Asset Allocation Strategist in July 2016. He is responsible for building model portfolios and creating custom solutions for WisdomTree’s clients. Within the research team, Joseph maintains a particular focus on emerging markets. Prior to joining WisdomTree, Joseph worked at Emerging Global Advisors as an Emerging Markets Portfolio Specialist, where he sat on the firm’s Investment Strategy team, oversaw capital markets, and maintained relationships with client home office research and due diligence teams. He started his career at BNY Mellon as a Regional Consultant and also worked as an analyst on the national accounts team.  Joseph graduated in 2009 from Boston College. Joseph is a holder of the Chartered Financial Analyst designation.
                    

Read All Articles






Jeff Weniger, CFA
Asset Allocation Strategist



                        Jeff Weniger, CFA serves as Asset Allocation Strategist at WisdomTree. Jeff has a background in fundamental, economic and behavioral analysis for strategic and tactical asset allocation. Prior to joining WisdomTree, he was Director, Senior Strategist with BMO from 2006 to 2017, serving on the Asset Allocation Committee and co-managing the firm’s ETF model portfolios. Jeff has a B.S. in Finance from the University of Florida and an MBA from Notre Dame. He is a CFA charter holder and an active member of the CFA Society of Chicago and the CFA Institute since 2006. He has appeared in various financial publications such as Barron’s and the Wall Street Journal and makes regular appearances on Canada’s Business News Network (BNN) and Wharton Business Radio.
 


Read All Articles






Matt Wagner
Research Analyst 



                        Matt Wagner joined WisdomTree in May 2017 as a Research Analyst. He works under Christopher Gannatti, Associate Director of Research, where he is responsible for research on WisdomTree’s products and views on the market. He started his career at Morgan Stanley, working as an analyst in Treasury Capital Markets from 2015 to 2017 where he focused on unsecured funding planning, execution and risk management. Matt graduated from Boston College in 2015 with a B.A. in International Studies with a concentration in Economics.  
                    

Read All Articles





Josh Russell
Quantitative Equity Strategist





Read All Articles













Jeremy J  Siegel 
									/ Interest Rate Strategies, Market News
 12/18/2015
								

Jeremy Siegel on the Fed Rate Hike and What It Means for 2016


Jeremy J  Siegel 



On Wednesday afternoon the Federal Reserve raised rates by 25 basis points, effectively raising its target band for the Federal Funds Rate to 25−50 bps. A widely anticipated move, it is an important and positive development for risk markets such as equities in that it removes a level of uncertainty.


SEE MORE







Bradley Krom 
									/ Interest Rate Strategies, Market News
 12/17/2015
								

The Impact of Fed Tightening on U.S. Investment Grade Credit


Bradley Krom 



After nearly two and a half years of debate, the Federal Reserve finally lifted the Federal Funds Rate target by 25 basis points on December 16, 2015. While investors continue to grapple with what impact this might have for markets and the economy, we thought it could be instructive to understand what impact a tightening cycle has historically had on the cost of credit for investment-grade corporations.


SEE MORE







Jeremy Schwartz 
									/ Conversations with Professor Siegel, Interest Rate Strategies, Market News, U.S. Dollar
 12/16/2015
								

The Fed to Perpetuate a Strong Dollar


Jeremy Schwartz 



Last week, Professor Siegel and I chat with Marc Chandler, Head of Global Markets Strategy at Brown Brothers Harriman, about his views on divergent central bank policy actions, implications for the U.S. dollar, euro and yen, as well as his thoughts regarding emerging markets.
 


SEE MORE







Luciano Siracusano III 
									/ Interest Rate Strategies, Market News
 12/15/2015
								

What Happens When Interest Rates Rise?


Luciano Siracusano III 



With December 16 marking the last opportunity for the Federal Reserve (Fed) to raise interest rates in 2015, market participants now put the odds of a Fed rate hike in December at nearly 80%—up from the 32% probability given to a rate hike just three months ago in September.


SEE MORE







Bradley Krom 
									/ Fixed Income, Currency & Alternative, Income Strategies, Interest Rate Strategies
 10/19/2015
								

What Drives Returns (and Volatility) of the Barclays U.S. Aggregate Index?


Bradley Krom 



Over the last couple of months, volatility across asset classes has ticked up markedly. Interestingly, although interest rates have declined from their highs of the year, rates haven’t fallen that much compared to the downdraft in global equity prices. Brad Krom explains why this has resulted in the returns of the Barclays U.S. Aggregate Index (Agg) remaining approximately unchanged year-to-date.  


SEE MORE
























 
CATEGORIES



All Articles


ETF Education


Emerging Markets


Earnings


Currency Hedged Equity


Interest Rate Strategies


Japan


Europe


BTM Podcast Series


 
POPULAR



Why the Timing Is Ripe for Emerging Market Equities


Macron vs. the Coalition of the Unwilling: It’s HEDJ Time


What Makes ETFs Tax Efficient?



RELATED LINKS
 
Glossary
 
                    FOLLOW US
                


email@wisdomtree.com





Twitter


YouTube


LinkedIn





REGISTER TO RECEIVE BLOG ALERTS
Already registered? Please log in to sign up for blogs.


 





Individual Investor





 Financial Professional
































Select Country
Afghanistan
Åland Islands
Albania
Algeria
American Samoa
Andorra
Angola
Anguilla
Antarctica
Antigua and Barbuda
Argentina
Armenia
Aruba
Australia
Austria
Azerbaijan
Bahamas
Bahrain
Bangladesh
Barbados
Belarus
Belgium
Belize
Benin
Bermuda
Bhutan
Bolivia
Bosnia and Herzegovina
Botswana
Bouvet Island
Brazil
British Indian Ocean Territory
Brunei Darussalam
Bulgaria
Burkina Faso
Burundi
Cambodia
Cameroon
Canada
Cape Verde
Cayman Islands
Central African Republic
Chad
Chile
China
Christmas Island
Cocos (Keeling) Islands
Colombia
Comoros
Congo
Congo, The Democratic Republic of the
Cook Islands
Costa Rica
Côte d'Ivoire
Croatia
Cuba
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Denmark
Djibouti
Dominica
Dominican Republic
Ecuador
Egypt
El Salvador
Equatorial Guinea
Eritrea
Estonia
Ethiopia
Falkland Islands (Malvinas)
Faroe Islands
Fiji
Finland
France
French Guiana
French Polynesia
French Southern Territories
Gabon
Gambia
Georgia
Germany
Ghana
Gibraltar
Greece
Greenland
Grenada
Guadeloupe
Guam
Guatemala
Guernsey
Guinea
Guinea-Bissau
Guyana
Haiti
Heard Island and McDonald Islands
Holy See (Vatican City State)
Honduras
Hong Kong
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Iran, Islamic Republic of
Iraq
Ireland
Isle of Man
Israel
Italy
Jamaica
Japan
Jersey
Jordan
Kazakhstan
Kenya
Kiribati
Kuwait
Kyrgyzstan
Laos People's Democratic Republic
Latvia
Lebanon
Lesotho
Liberia
Libyan Arab Jamahiriya
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Macau
Madagascar
Malawi
Malaysia
Maldives
Mali
Malta
Marshall Islands
Martinique
Mauritania
Mauritius
Mayotte
Mexico
Micronesia, Federated States of
Moldova
Monaco
Mongolia
Montenegro
Montserrat
Morocco
Mozambique
Myanmar
Namibia
Nauru
Nepal
Netherlands
Netherlands Antilles
New Caledonia
New Zealand
Nicaragua
Niger
Nigeria
Niue
Norfolk Island
Korea, Democratic People's Republic of
Northern Mariana Islands
Norway
Oman
Pakistan
Palau
Palestinian Territory, Occupied
Panama
Papua New Guinea
Paraguay
Peru
Philippines
Pitcairn Islands
Poland
Portugal
Puerto Rico
Qatar
Réunion
Romania
Russian Federation
Rwanda
Saint Barthélemy
Saint Helena
Saint Kitts and Nevis
Saint Lucia
Saint Martin
Saint Pierre and Miquelon
Saint Vincent and the Grenadines
Samoa
San Marino
Sao Tome and Principe
Saudi Arabia
Senegal
Serbia
Seychelles
Sierra Leone
Singapore
Slovakia
Slovenia
Solomon Islands
Somalia
South Africa
Korea, Republic of
Spain
Sri Lanka
Sudan
Suriname
Svalbard and Jan Mayen
Swaziland
Sweden
Switzerland
Syrian Arab Republic
Taiwan, Province of China
Tajikistan
Tanzania, United Republic of
Thailand
Timor-Leste
Togo
Tokelau
Tonga
Trinidad and Tobago
Tunisia
Turkey
Turkmenistan
Turks and Caicos Islands
Tuvalu
Uganda
Ukraine
United Arab Emirates
United Kingdom
United States
United States Minor Outlying Islands
Uruguay
Uzbekistan
Vanuatu
Venezuela
Vietnam
Virgin Islands, British
Virgin Islands, U.S.
Wallis and Futuna
Western Sahara
Yemen
Zambia
Zimbabwe




State
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming
Other













NEXT STEP

 












RESTRICTED MATERIAL
This material is intended for Financial Professionals only. Financial Professionals who register with WisdomTree get exclusive access to our timely research and market insights.
LOGIN
Register












You are now leaving the WisdomTree Website


                     Hyperlinks on this website are provided as a convenience and we disclaim any responsibility for information, services or products found on the websites linked hereto.
                
Click here to continue











Rising Interest Rates & ETF Solutions | WisdomTree



























                Menu 
                









WisdomTree ETFs                                                    







 



                                            All ETFs
                




 



                                            Equity ETFs
                




 



                                            Fixed Income ETFs
                




 



                                            Alternative ETFs
                




 



                                            Currency ETFs
                




 



                                            All Indexes
                














Strategies                                                    







 



                                            Smart Beta
                




 



                                            Rising Rates Solutions
                




 



                                            Currency Hedging
                




 



                                            Quality Dividend Growth
                




 



                                            Fixed Income Solutions
                




 



                                            Emerging Markets
                














Resource Library                                                    







 



                                            WisdomTree Resources
                




 



                                            Prospectus & Regulatory
                




 



                                            Fact Sheets & Reports
                














Investor Community                                                    







 



                                            Financial Advisors
                




 



                                            Institutional Accounts
                














Blog                                                    







 



                                            All Blogs
                




 



                                            ETF Education
                




 



                                            Emerging Markets
                




 



                                            Interest Rate Strategies
                
















                                    About
                                












                                            Who we are
                                        









                                            Contact Us
                                        









                                            Press Room
                                        









                                            Careers
                                        














                                                    Investor Relations
                                                













                                                    Contact Us
                                                













                                                International Sites 
                                            












Canada                                                    









Switzerland                                                    









Germany                                                    









Finland                                                    









France                                                    









United Kingdom                                                    









Ireland                                                    









Italy                                                    









Japan                                                    









Luxembourg                                                    









Netherlands                                                    









Norway                                                    









Sweden                                                    









United States















                                                        Sign In / Register
                                                
























 BACK 
                


















About




Who we are


Contact Us


Press Room


Careers





Investor Relations 

Contact Us 




USA






CAN





CHE





DEU





FIN





FRA





GBR





IRL





ITA





JPN





LUX





NLD





NOR





SWE










Get access to exclusive content, industry insights, and more:
SIGN IN/REGISTER

















                                            WisdomTree ETFs
                                        







                            All ETFs
                        



                            Equity ETFs
                        



                            Fixed Income ETFs
                        



                            Alternative ETFs
                        



                            Currency ETFs
                        



                            All Indexes
                        







                                    Domestic Dividends
                                



                                    Domestic Earnings
                                



                                    Multifactor
                                



                                    Developed World ex-U.S.
                                



                                    Global/Global ex-U.S.
                                



                                    Emerging/Frontier Markets
                                



                                    Currency Hedged Equity
                                





                                    Strategic Core
                                



                                    Fundamental
                                



                                    International
                                



                                    Interest Rate Strategies
                                




DYLS
WisdomTree Dynamic Long/Short U.S. Equity Fund


DYB
WisdomTree Dynamic Bearish U.S. Equity Fund


WDTI
WisdomTree Managed Futures Strategy 


PUTW
WisdomTree CBOE S&P 500 PutWrite Strategy Fund


RRF
Global Real Return


GCC
WisdomTree Continuous Commodity Index Fund





                                    Domestic
                                



                                    Emerging Markets
                                






DTD
WisdomTree U.S. Total Dividend Fund


DLN
WisdomTree U.S. LargeCap Dividend Fund


DON
WisdomTree U.S. MidCap Dividend Fund


DES
WisdomTree U.S. SmallCap Dividend Fund


DHS
WisdomTree U.S. High Dividend Fund


DTN
WisdomTree U.S. Dividend ex-Financials Fund


DGRW
WisdomTree U.S. Quality Dividend Growth Fund


DGRS
WisdomTree U.S. SmallCap Quality Dividend Growth Fund




EXT
WisdomTree U.S. Total Earnings Fund


EPS
WisdomTree U.S. Earnings 500 Fund


EZM
WisdomTree U.S. MidCap Earnings Fund


EES
WisdomTree U.S. SmallCap Earnings Fund


EZY
WisdomTree U.S. LargeCap Value Fund


WUSA
WisdomTree U.S. Domestic Economy Fund


WEXP
WisdomTree U.S. Export and Multinational Fund




USMF
WisdomTree U.S. Multifactor Fund




DWM
WisdomTree International Equity Fund


DOL
WisdomTree International LargeCap Dividend Fund


DIM
WisdomTree International MidCap Dividend  Fund


DLS
WisdomTree International SmallCap Dividend Fund


DTH
WisdomTree International High Dividend Fund


DOO
WisdomTree International Dividend ex-Financials Fund


IQDG
WisdomTree International Quality Dividend Growth Fund


EUDG
WisdomTree Europe Quality Dividend Growth Fund


EDOM
WisdomTree Europe Domestic Economy Fund


DFE
WisdomTree Europe SmallCap Dividend Fund


DFJ
WisdomTree Japan SmallCap Dividend Fund


AUSE
WisdomTree Australia Dividend Fund




DEW
WisdomTree Global High Dividend Fund


DNL
WisdomTree Global ex‐U.S. Quality Dividend Growth Fund


GSD
WisdomTree Global SmallCap Dividend Fund


DRW
WisdomTree Global ex-U.S. Real Estate Fund


AXJL
WisdomTree Asia Pacific ex-Japan Fund


XMX
WisdomTree Global ex-Mexico Equity Fund




DVEM
WisdomTree Emerging Markets Dividend Fund


DEM
WisdomTree Emerging Markets High Dividend Fund


DGS
WisdomTree Emerging Markets SmallCap Dividend Fund


DGRE
WisdomTree Emerging Markets Quality Dividend Growth Fund


EMCG
WisdomTree Emerging Markets Consumer Growth Fund


EMSD
WisdomTree Strong Dollar Emerging Markets Equity Fund


EPI
WisdomTree India Earnings Fund


XSOE
WisdomTree Emerging Markets ex-State-Owned Enterprises Fund


CXSE
WisdomTree China ex-State-Owned Enterprises Fund


GULF
WisdomTree Middle East Dividend Fund




HEDJ
WisdomTree Europe Hedged Equity Fund


EUSC
WisdomTree Europe Hedged SmallCap Equity Fund


DXGE
WisdomTree Germany Hedged Equity Fund


DXUS
WisdomTree Global ex-U.S. Hedged Dividend Fund


IHDG
WisdomTree International Hedged Quality Dividend Growth Fund


HGSD
WisdomTree Global Hedged SmallCap Dividend Fund


DXPS
WisdomTree United Kingdom Hedged Equity Fund


HDRW
WisdomTree Global ex-U.S. Hedged Real Estate Fund


DXJ
WisdomTree Japan Hedged Equity Fund


JHDG
WisdomTree Japan Hedged Quality Dividend Growth Fund


DXJS
WisdomTree Japan Hedged SmallCap Equity Fund


DXJF
WisdomTree Japan Hedged Financials Fund


DXJR
WisdomTree Japan Hedged Real Estate Fund


DXJC
WisdomTree Japan Hedged Capital Goods Fund


DXJH
WisdomTree Japan Hedged Health Care Fund


DDWM
WisdomTree Dynamic Currency Hedged International Equity Fund


DHDG
WisdomTree Dynamic Currency Hedged International Quality Dividend Growth Fund


DDLS
WisdomTree Dynamic Currency Hedged International SmallCap Equity Fund


DDEZ
WisdomTree Dynamic Currency Hedged Europe Equity Fund


DDJP
WisdomTree Dynamic Currency Hedged Japan Equity Fund




CRDT
WisdomTree Strategic Corporate Bond Fund


UBND
WisdomTree Western Asset Unconstrained Bond Fund


AGGY
WisdomTree Barclays Yield Enhanced U.S. Aggregate Bond Fund


SHAG
WisdomTree Barclays Yield Enhanced U.S. Short-Term Aggregate Bond Fund




WFIG
WisdomTree Fundamental U.S. Corporate Bond Fund


SFIG
WisdomTree Fundamental U.S. Short-Term Corporate Bond Fund


WFHY
WisdomTree Fundamental U.S. High Yield Corporate Bond Fund


SFHY
WisdomTree Fundamental U.S. Short-Term High Yield Corporate Bond Fund




EMCB
WisdomTree Emerging Markets Corporate Bond Fund


ELD
WisdomTree Emerging Markets Local Debt Fund


ALD
WisdomTree Asia Local Debt Fund




AGZD
WisdomTree Barclays Interest Rate Hedged U.S. Aggregate Bond Fund


AGND
WisdomTree Barclays Negative Duration U.S. Aggregate Bond Fund


HYZD
WisdomTree Interest Rate Hedged High Yield Bond Fund


HYND
WisdomTree Negative Duration High Yield Bond Fund


USFR
WisdomTree Bloomberg Floating Rate Treasury Fund




USDU
WisdomTree Bloomberg U.S. Dollar Bullish Fund




CYB
WisdomTree Chinese Yuan Strategy Fund


BZF
WisdomTree Brazilian Real Strategy Fund


CEW
WisdomTree Emerging Currency Strategy Fund












                                            STRATEGIES
                                        



Smart Beta
Rising Rates Solutions
Currency Hedging
Quality Dividend Growth
Fixed Income Solutions
Emerging Markets






                                            RESOURCE LIBRARY
                                        



WisdomTree Resources
Prospectus & Regulatory
Fact Sheets & Reports






                                            INVESTOR COMMUNITY
                                        



Financial Advisors
Institutional Accounts






                                            BLOG
                                        



All Blogs
ETF Education
Emerging Markets
Interest Rate Strategies














My WisdomTree - Sign in
 










Remember me


SIGN IN


Forgot your password?








Not Registered? Register Now.
Individual investors who register can access daily blog posts, latest videos, podcasts and snapshots, and stay current with industry insights. On top of that, Financial Professionals get additional access to thoughtful research, smart analytics and unique economic commentary from Jeremy Siegel.
1. My Profile >2. Additional Information




 


Account Type


Individual Investor



 Financial Professional


































Select Country
Afghanistan
Åland Islands
Albania
Algeria
American Samoa
Andorra
Angola
Anguilla
Antarctica
Antigua and Barbuda
Argentina
Armenia
Aruba
Australia
Austria
Azerbaijan
Bahamas
Bahrain
Bangladesh
Barbados
Belarus
Belgium
Belize
Benin
Bermuda
Bhutan
Bolivia
Bosnia and Herzegovina
Botswana
Bouvet Island
Brazil
British Indian Ocean Territory
Brunei Darussalam
Bulgaria
Burkina Faso
Burundi
Cambodia
Cameroon
Canada
Cape Verde
Cayman Islands
Central African Republic
Chad
Chile
China
Christmas Island
Cocos (Keeling) Islands
Colombia
Comoros
Congo
Congo, The Democratic Republic of the
Cook Islands
Costa Rica
Côte d'Ivoire
Croatia
Cuba
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Denmark
Djibouti
Dominica
Dominican Republic
Ecuador
Egypt
El Salvador
Equatorial Guinea
Eritrea
Estonia
Ethiopia
Falkland Islands (Malvinas)
Faroe Islands
Fiji
Finland
France
French Guiana
French Polynesia
French Southern Territories
Gabon
Gambia
Georgia
Germany
Ghana
Gibraltar
Greece
Greenland
Grenada
Guadeloupe
Guam
Guatemala
Guernsey
Guinea
Guinea-Bissau
Guyana
Haiti
Heard Island and McDonald Islands
Holy See (Vatican City State)
Honduras
Hong Kong
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Iran, Islamic Republic of
Iraq
Ireland
Isle of Man
Israel
Italy
Jamaica
Japan
Jersey
Jordan
Kazakhstan
Kenya
Kiribati
Kuwait
Kyrgyzstan
Laos People's Democratic Republic
Latvia
Lebanon
Lesotho
Liberia
Libyan Arab Jamahiriya
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Macau
Madagascar
Malawi
Malaysia
Maldives
Mali
Malta
Marshall Islands
Martinique
Mauritania
Mauritius
Mayotte
Mexico
Micronesia, Federated States of
Moldova
Monaco
Mongolia
Montenegro
Montserrat
Morocco
Mozambique
Myanmar
Namibia
Nauru
Nepal
Netherlands
Netherlands Antilles
New Caledonia
New Zealand
Nicaragua
Niger
Nigeria
Niue
Norfolk Island
Korea, Democratic People's Republic of
Northern Mariana Islands
Norway
Oman
Pakistan
Palau
Palestinian Territory, Occupied
Panama
Papua New Guinea
Paraguay
Peru
Philippines
Pitcairn Islands
Poland
Portugal
Puerto Rico
Qatar
Réunion
Romania
Russian Federation
Rwanda
Saint Barthélemy
Saint Helena
Saint Kitts and Nevis
Saint Lucia
Saint Martin
Saint Pierre and Miquelon
Saint Vincent and the Grenadines
Samoa
San Marino
Sao Tome and Principe
Saudi Arabia
Senegal
Serbia
Seychelles
Sierra Leone
Singapore
Slovakia
Slovenia
Solomon Islands
Somalia
South Africa
Korea, Republic of
Spain
Sri Lanka
Sudan
Suriname
Svalbard and Jan Mayen
Swaziland
Sweden
Switzerland
Syrian Arab Republic
Taiwan, Province of China
Tajikistan
Tanzania, United Republic of
Thailand
Timor-Leste
Togo
Tokelau
Tonga
Trinidad and Tobago
Tunisia
Turkey
Turkmenistan
Turks and Caicos Islands
Tuvalu
Uganda
Ukraine
United Arab Emirates
United Kingdom
United States
United States Minor Outlying Islands
Uruguay
Uzbekistan
Vanuatu
Venezuela
Vietnam
Virgin Islands, British
Virgin Islands, U.S.
Wallis and Futuna
Western Sahara
Yemen
Zambia
Zimbabwe




State
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming
Other





By submitting below you certify that you have read and agree to our privacy policy.









NEXT STEP










Home


Strategies


Rising Rates ETFs

 
RISING RATES ETFs


RELATED LINKS

Prepare Your Portfolio for Rising Rates


 






                                    RISING RATES
                                









                                    AGZD
                                









                                    AGND
                                









                                    HYZD
                                









                                    HYND
                                









                                    USFR
                                








How can you use ETFs to navigate interest rate changes at the Fed?
 
Bonds and interest rates have an inverse relationship, so when interest rates rise, bond prices (and total returns) fall. WisdomTree partnered with Bloomberg, Barclays, and BofA Merrill Lynch to create a family of five unique bond ETFs that can help investors navigate rising interest rates, while maintaining exposure to familiar strategies (and potentially supplementing income). 
 
AGZD


AGGREGATE BOND EXPOSURE WITH ZERO DURATION

The WisdomTree Barclays Interest Rate Hedged U.S. Aggregate Bond Fund (AGZD) can help investors maintain traditional bond exposures while decreasing their overall sensitivity to rising interest rates.


 
AGND


AGGREGATE BOND EXPOSURE WITH NEGATIVE DURATION

The WisdomTree Barclays Negative Duration U.S. Aggregate Bond Fund (AGND) can help investors maintain traditional bond exposures while decreasing their overall sensitivity to rising interest rates.


 
HYZD


HIGH YIELD WITH ZERO DURATION

The WisdomTree Interest Rate Hedged High Yield Bond Fund (HYZD) can help investors reduce the interest rate risk of their overall portfolio while supplementing income levels.


 
HYND


HIGH YIELD WITH NEGATIVE DURATION

The WisdomTree Negative Duration High Yield Bond Fund (HYND) can help investors reduce the interest rate risk of their overall portfolio while supplementing income levels.


 
USFR


U.S. TREASURY FLOATING RATE

The WisdomTree Bloomberg Floating Rate Treasury Fund (USFR) seeks to track the price and yield performance of the Bloomberg U.S. Treasury Floating Rate Bond Index.




AGGREGATE BOND EXPOSURE WITH ZERO DURATION

 
Many investors view the Barclays U.S. Aggregate Index (Agg), as a broad approximation of the U.S. investment-grade1 bond market—and mirror it for much of their core bond portfolios. In the current environment, however, investors may face increasing volatility and low levels of income from this subset of the fixed income markets.



The WisdomTree Barclays Interest Rate Hedged U.S. Aggregate Bond Fund (AGZD) can help investors maintain traditional bond exposures while decreasing their overall sensitivity to rising interest rates.

 

AGZD essentially combines a long position in cash bonds representative of the Agg with a short position in Treasury Bonds and/or Treasury futures to target the zero interest rate exposure. Investors can use the portfolio as a stand-alone tool for combatting rising interest rates or combine it with other interest rate-sensitive assets in their portfolio to target their desired level of risk.



As shown in the hypothetical allocation below, by allocating a portion of their overall portfolio to AGZD, investors can reduce their overall exposure to interest rate risk2.




Learn more about Zero Duration Bond Funds 

Get the facts about AGZD 


 

1Bonds with ratings of BBB-/Baa or higher are considered investment grade.

2Interest rate risk: The risk that an investment's value will decline due to an increase in interest rates.


AGGREGATE BOND EXPOSURE WITH NEGATIVE DURATION
 
Many investors view the Barclays U.S. Aggregate Index (Agg), as a broad approximation of the U.S. investment-grade1 bond market—and mirror it for much of their core bond portfolios. In the current environment, however, investors may face increasing volatility and low levels of income from this subset of the fixed income markets.



The WisdomTree Barclays Negative Duration U.S. Aggregate Bond Fund (AGND) can help investors maintain traditional bond exposures while decreasing their overall sensitivity to rising interest rates.

 
AGND essentially combines a long position in cash bonds representative of the Agg with a short position in Treasury Bonds and/or Treasury futures to target the negative interest rate exposure. Investors can use the portfolio as a stand-alone tool for combatting rising interest rates or combine it with other interest rate-sensitive assets in their portfolio to target their desired level of risk.



As shown in the hypothetical allocation below, by allocating a portion of their overall portfolio to AGND, investors can reduce their overall exposure to interest rate risk2.




Learn more about Negative Duration Bond Funds

Get the facts about AGND 


 

1Bonds with ratings of BBB-/Baa or higher are considered investment grade.

2Interest rate risk: The risk that an investment's value will decline due to an increase in interest rates.


HIGH YIELD WITH ZERO DURATIONHigh yield bonds continue to be one of the most popular segments of the fixed income market. But as concerns about credit risk trend lower, fear of interest rate risk is on the rise.



The WisdomTree Interest Rate Hedged High Yield Bond Fund (HYZD) can help investors reduce the interest rate risk of their overall portfolio while supplementing income levels.
 

HYZD essentially combines a long position in cash bonds from the BofA Merrill Lynch 0-5 Year US High Yield Constrained Index with a short position in Treasury bonds and/or Treasury futures to target the zero duration exposure. When incorporated into a core fixed income portfolio, HYZD could provide many benefits in a rising rate environment.




As shown in the hypothetical allocation below on the right, by allocating a portion of their overall portfolio to HYZD, investors can reduce their overall exposure to interest rate risk1.





Learn more about Zero Duration Bond Funds

Get the facts about HYZD


 
1Interest rate risk: The risk that an investment's value will decline due to an increase in interest rates.


HIGH YIELD WITH NEGATIVE DURATION

High yield bonds continue to be one of the most popular segments of the fixed income market1. But as concerns about credit risk trend lower, fear of interest rate risk is on the rise.



The WisdomTree Negative Duration High Yield Bond Fund (HYND) can help investors reduce the interest rate risk of their overall portfolio while supplementing income levels.




HYND essentially combines a long position in cash bonds from the BofA Merrill Lynch 0-5 Year US High Yield Constrained Index with a short position in Treasury bonds and/or Treasury futures to target the negative interest rate exposure. When incorporated into a core fixed income portfolio, HYND could provide many benefits in a rising rate environment.



As shown in the hypothetical allocation below, by allocating a portion of their overall portfolio to HYND, investors can reduce their overall exposure to interest rate risk2.
 




Learn more about Negative Duration Bond Funds

Get the facts about HYND


 

1Sources: Bloomberg, BofA Merrill Lynch, as of 12/31/13.

2Interest rate risk: The risk that an investment's value will decline due to an increase in interest rates.


U.S. TREASURY FLOATING RATE


In response to the growing demand from investors looking to reduce interest rate risk, the United States Treasury is issuing floating rate notes (FRNs)1 for the first time in its history. We believe this new class of issuance is an attractive option for investors looking to limit their exposure to credit risk2, while maintaining the potential to benefit from increases in interest rates.



The WisdomTree Bloomberg Floating Rate Treasury Fund (USFR) seeks to track the price and yield performance of the Bloomberg U.S. Treasury Floating Rate Bond Index.

Floating rate notes help bridge an important gap between short-maturity Treasury bills3 and longer-maturity, fixed rate Treasury bonds4 providing:

 
1


Potential to benefit from rising interest rates and higher yields


 
2


Income payments backed by the full faith and credit of the U.S. government





Learn more about Floating Rate Treasuries

Get the facts about USFR




1Floating rate notes: A debt instrument whose coupon payments are tied to a short-term borrowing rate such as a US Treasury Bill Rate or the London Interbank Offered Rate (LIBOR).

2Credit risk: The risk that a borrower will not meet their contractual obligations in conjunction with an investment.

3Treasury bill: A short-term debt obligation backed by the U.S. government with a maturity of less than one year.

4Treasury bonds: A debt obligation backed by the U.S. government with a maturity of more than ten years.













RESTRICTED MATERIAL
This material is intended for Financial Professionals only. Financial Professionals who register with WisdomTree get exclusive access to our timely research and market insights.
LOGIN
Register












You are now leaving the WisdomTree Website


                     Hyperlinks on this website are provided as a convenience and we disclaim any responsibility for information, services or products found on the websites linked hereto.
                
Click here to continue











Page Not Found | WisdomTree



























                Menu 
                









WisdomTree ETFs                                                    







 



                                            All ETFs
                




 



                                            Equity ETFs
                




 



                                            Fixed Income ETFs
                




 



                                            Alternative ETFs
                




 



                                            Currency ETFs
                




 



                                            All Indexes
                














Strategies                                                    







 



                                            Smart Beta
                




 



                                            Rising Rates Solutions
                




 



                                            Currency Hedging
                




 



                                            Quality Dividend Growth
                




 



                                            Fixed Income Solutions
                




 



                                            Emerging Markets
                














Resource Library                                                    







 



                                            WisdomTree Resources
                




 



                                            Prospectus & Regulatory
                




 



                                            Fact Sheets & Reports
                














Investor Community                                                    







 



                                            Financial Advisors
                




 



                                            Institutional Accounts
                














Blog                                                    







 



                                            All Blogs
                




 



                                            ETF Education
                




 



                                            Emerging Markets
                




 



                                            Interest Rate Strategies
                
















                                    About
                                












                                            Who we are
                                        









                                            Contact Us
                                        









                                            Press Room
                                        









                                            Careers
                                        














                                                    Investor Relations
                                                













                                                    Contact Us
                                                













                                                International Sites 
                                            












Canada                                                    









Switzerland                                                    









Germany                                                    









Finland                                                    









France                                                    









United Kingdom                                                    









Ireland                                                    









Italy                                                    









Japan                                                    









Luxembourg                                                    









Netherlands                                                    









Norway                                                    









Sweden                                                    









United States















                                                        Sign In / Register
                                                
























 BACK 
                


















About




Who we are


Contact Us


Press Room


Careers





Investor Relations 

Contact Us 




USA






CAN





CHE





DEU





FIN





FRA





GBR





IRL





ITA





JPN





LUX





NLD





NOR





SWE










Get access to exclusive content, industry insights, and more:
SIGN IN/REGISTER

















                                            WisdomTree ETFs
                                        







                            All ETFs
                        



                            Equity ETFs
                        



                            Fixed Income ETFs
                        



                            Alternative ETFs
                        



                            Currency ETFs
                        



                            All Indexes
                        







                                    Domestic Dividends
                                



                                    Domestic Earnings
                                



                                    Multifactor
                                



                                    Developed World ex-U.S.
                                



                                    Global/Global ex-U.S.
                                



                                    Emerging/Frontier Markets
                                



                                    Currency Hedged Equity
                                





                                    Strategic Core
                                



                                    Fundamental
                                



                                    International
                                



                                    Interest Rate Strategies
                                




DYLS
WisdomTree Dynamic Long/Short U.S. Equity Fund


DYB
WisdomTree Dynamic Bearish U.S. Equity Fund


WDTI
WisdomTree Managed Futures Strategy 


PUTW
WisdomTree CBOE S&P 500 PutWrite Strategy Fund


RRF
Global Real Return


GCC
WisdomTree Continuous Commodity Index Fund





                                    Domestic
                                



                                    Emerging Markets
                                






DTD
WisdomTree U.S. Total Dividend Fund


DLN
WisdomTree U.S. LargeCap Dividend Fund


DON
WisdomTree U.S. MidCap Dividend Fund


DES
WisdomTree U.S. SmallCap Dividend Fund


DHS
WisdomTree U.S. High Dividend Fund


DTN
WisdomTree U.S. Dividend ex-Financials Fund


DGRW
WisdomTree U.S. Quality Dividend Growth Fund


DGRS
WisdomTree U.S. SmallCap Quality Dividend Growth Fund




EXT
WisdomTree U.S. Total Earnings Fund


EPS
WisdomTree U.S. Earnings 500 Fund


EZM
WisdomTree U.S. MidCap Earnings Fund


EES
WisdomTree U.S. SmallCap Earnings Fund


EZY
WisdomTree U.S. LargeCap Value Fund


WUSA
WisdomTree U.S. Domestic Economy Fund


WEXP
WisdomTree U.S. Export and Multinational Fund




USMF
WisdomTree U.S. Multifactor Fund




DWM
WisdomTree International Equity Fund


DOL
WisdomTree International LargeCap Dividend Fund


DIM
WisdomTree International MidCap Dividend  Fund


DLS
WisdomTree International SmallCap Dividend Fund


DTH
WisdomTree International High Dividend Fund


DOO
WisdomTree International Dividend ex-Financials Fund


IQDG
WisdomTree International Quality Dividend Growth Fund


EUDG
WisdomTree Europe Quality Dividend Growth Fund


EDOM
WisdomTree Europe Domestic Economy Fund


DFE
WisdomTree Europe SmallCap Dividend Fund


DFJ
WisdomTree Japan SmallCap Dividend Fund


AUSE
WisdomTree Australia Dividend Fund




DEW
WisdomTree Global High Dividend Fund


DNL
WisdomTree Global ex‐U.S. Quality Dividend Growth Fund


GSD
WisdomTree Global SmallCap Dividend Fund


DRW
WisdomTree Global ex-U.S. Real Estate Fund


AXJL
WisdomTree Asia Pacific ex-Japan Fund


XMX
WisdomTree Global ex-Mexico Equity Fund




DVEM
WisdomTree Emerging Markets Dividend Fund


DEM
WisdomTree Emerging Markets High Dividend Fund


DGS
WisdomTree Emerging Markets SmallCap Dividend Fund


DGRE
WisdomTree Emerging Markets Quality Dividend Growth Fund


EMCG
WisdomTree Emerging Markets Consumer Growth Fund


EMSD
WisdomTree Strong Dollar Emerging Markets Equity Fund


EPI
WisdomTree India Earnings Fund


XSOE
WisdomTree Emerging Markets ex-State-Owned Enterprises Fund


CXSE
WisdomTree China ex-State-Owned Enterprises Fund


GULF
WisdomTree Middle East Dividend Fund




HEDJ
WisdomTree Europe Hedged Equity Fund


EUSC
WisdomTree Europe Hedged SmallCap Equity Fund


DXGE
WisdomTree Germany Hedged Equity Fund


DXUS
WisdomTree Global ex-U.S. Hedged Dividend Fund


IHDG
WisdomTree International Hedged Quality Dividend Growth Fund


HGSD
WisdomTree Global Hedged SmallCap Dividend Fund


DXPS
WisdomTree United Kingdom Hedged Equity Fund


HDRW
WisdomTree Global ex-U.S. Hedged Real Estate Fund


DXJ
WisdomTree Japan Hedged Equity Fund


JHDG
WisdomTree Japan Hedged Quality Dividend Growth Fund


DXJS
WisdomTree Japan Hedged SmallCap Equity Fund


DXJF
WisdomTree Japan Hedged Financials Fund


DXJR
WisdomTree Japan Hedged Real Estate Fund


DXJC
WisdomTree Japan Hedged Capital Goods Fund


DXJH
WisdomTree Japan Hedged Health Care Fund


DDWM
WisdomTree Dynamic Currency Hedged International Equity Fund


DHDG
WisdomTree Dynamic Currency Hedged International Quality Dividend Growth Fund


DDLS
WisdomTree Dynamic Currency Hedged International SmallCap Equity Fund


DDEZ
WisdomTree Dynamic Currency Hedged Europe Equity Fund


DDJP
WisdomTree Dynamic Currency Hedged Japan Equity Fund




CRDT
WisdomTree Strategic Corporate Bond Fund


UBND
WisdomTree Western Asset Unconstrained Bond Fund


AGGY
WisdomTree Barclays Yield Enhanced U.S. Aggregate Bond Fund


SHAG
WisdomTree Barclays Yield Enhanced U.S. Short-Term Aggregate Bond Fund




WFIG
WisdomTree Fundamental U.S. Corporate Bond Fund


SFIG
WisdomTree Fundamental U.S. Short-Term Corporate Bond Fund


WFHY
WisdomTree Fundamental U.S. High Yield Corporate Bond Fund


SFHY
WisdomTree Fundamental U.S. Short-Term High Yield Corporate Bond Fund




EMCB
WisdomTree Emerging Markets Corporate Bond Fund


ELD
WisdomTree Emerging Markets Local Debt Fund


ALD
WisdomTree Asia Local Debt Fund




AGZD
WisdomTree Barclays Interest Rate Hedged U.S. Aggregate Bond Fund


AGND
WisdomTree Barclays Negative Duration U.S. Aggregate Bond Fund


HYZD
WisdomTree Interest Rate Hedged High Yield Bond Fund


HYND
WisdomTree Negative Duration High Yield Bond Fund


USFR
WisdomTree Bloomberg Floating Rate Treasury Fund




USDU
WisdomTree Bloomberg U.S. Dollar Bullish Fund




CYB
WisdomTree Chinese Yuan Strategy Fund


BZF
WisdomTree Brazilian Real Strategy Fund


CEW
WisdomTree Emerging Currency Strategy Fund












                                            STRATEGIES
                                        



Smart Beta
Rising Rates Solutions
Currency Hedging
Quality Dividend Growth
Fixed Income Solutions
Emerging Markets






                                            RESOURCE LIBRARY
                                        



WisdomTree Resources
Prospectus & Regulatory
Fact Sheets & Reports






                                            INVESTOR COMMUNITY
                                        



Financial Advisors
Institutional Accounts






                                            BLOG
                                        



All Blogs
ETF Education
Emerging Markets
Interest Rate Strategies














My WisdomTree - Sign in
 










Remember me


SIGN IN


Forgot your password?








Not Registered? Register Now.
Individual investors who register can access daily blog posts, latest videos, podcasts and snapshots, and stay current with industry insights. On top of that, Financial Professionals get additional access to thoughtful research, smart analytics and unique economic commentary from Jeremy Siegel.
1. My Profile >2. Additional Information




 


Account Type


Individual Investor



 Financial Professional


































Select Country
Afghanistan
Åland Islands
Albania
Algeria
American Samoa
Andorra
Angola
Anguilla
Antarctica
Antigua and Barbuda
Argentina
Armenia
Aruba
Australia
Austria
Azerbaijan
Bahamas
Bahrain
Bangladesh
Barbados
Belarus
Belgium
Belize
Benin
Bermuda
Bhutan
Bolivia
Bosnia and Herzegovina
Botswana
Bouvet Island
Brazil
British Indian Ocean Territory
Brunei Darussalam
Bulgaria
Burkina Faso
Burundi
Cambodia
Cameroon
Canada
Cape Verde
Cayman Islands
Central African Republic
Chad
Chile
China
Christmas Island
Cocos (Keeling) Islands
Colombia
Comoros
Congo
Congo, The Democratic Republic of the
Cook Islands
Costa Rica
Côte d'Ivoire
Croatia
Cuba
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Denmark
Djibouti
Dominica
Dominican Republic
Ecuador
Egypt
El Salvador
Equatorial Guinea
Eritrea
Estonia
Ethiopia
Falkland Islands (Malvinas)
Faroe Islands
Fiji
Finland
France
French Guiana
French Polynesia
French Southern Territories
Gabon
Gambia
Georgia
Germany
Ghana
Gibraltar
Greece
Greenland
Grenada
Guadeloupe
Guam
Guatemala
Guernsey
Guinea
Guinea-Bissau
Guyana
Haiti
Heard Island and McDonald Islands
Holy See (Vatican City State)
Honduras
Hong Kong
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Iran, Islamic Republic of
Iraq
Ireland
Isle of Man
Israel
Italy
Jamaica
Japan
Jersey
Jordan
Kazakhstan
Kenya
Kiribati
Kuwait
Kyrgyzstan
Laos People's Democratic Republic
Latvia
Lebanon
Lesotho
Liberia
Libyan Arab Jamahiriya
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Macau
Madagascar
Malawi
Malaysia
Maldives
Mali
Malta
Marshall Islands
Martinique
Mauritania
Mauritius
Mayotte
Mexico
Micronesia, Federated States of
Moldova
Monaco
Mongolia
Montenegro
Montserrat
Morocco
Mozambique
Myanmar
Namibia
Nauru
Nepal
Netherlands
Netherlands Antilles
New Caledonia
New Zealand
Nicaragua
Niger
Nigeria
Niue
Norfolk Island
Korea, Democratic People's Republic of
Northern Mariana Islands
Norway
Oman
Pakistan
Palau
Palestinian Territory, Occupied
Panama
Papua New Guinea
Paraguay
Peru
Philippines
Pitcairn Islands
Poland
Portugal
Puerto Rico
Qatar
Réunion
Romania
Russian Federation
Rwanda
Saint Barthélemy
Saint Helena
Saint Kitts and Nevis
Saint Lucia
Saint Martin
Saint Pierre and Miquelon
Saint Vincent and the Grenadines
Samoa
San Marino
Sao Tome and Principe
Saudi Arabia
Senegal
Serbia
Seychelles
Sierra Leone
Singapore
Slovakia
Slovenia
Solomon Islands
Somalia
South Africa
Korea, Republic of
Spain
Sri Lanka
Sudan
Suriname
Svalbard and Jan Mayen
Swaziland
Sweden
Switzerland
Syrian Arab Republic
Taiwan, Province of China
Tajikistan
Tanzania, United Republic of
Thailand
Timor-Leste
Togo
Tokelau
Tonga
Trinidad and Tobago
Tunisia
Turkey
Turkmenistan
Turks and Caicos Islands
Tuvalu
Uganda
Ukraine
United Arab Emirates
United Kingdom
United States
United States Minor Outlying Islands
Uruguay
Uzbekistan
Vanuatu
Venezuela
Vietnam
Virgin Islands, British
Virgin Islands, U.S.
Wallis and Futuna
Western Sahara
Yemen
Zambia
Zimbabwe




State
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming
Other





By submitting below you certify that you have read and agree to our privacy policy.









NEXT STEP








404 Error
 
We’re sorry the page you are looking for could not be found.
Please see one of the following instead:
 

Home
WisdomTree Resources
WisdomTree ETFs











RESTRICTED MATERIAL
This material is intended for Financial Professionals only. Financial Professionals who register with WisdomTree get exclusive access to our timely research and market insights.
LOGIN
Register












You are now leaving the WisdomTree Website


                     Hyperlinks on this website are provided as a convenience and we disclaim any responsibility for information, services or products found on the websites linked hereto.
                
Click here to continue











	Income Investing | CEF | Nuveen



















































Nuveen









Individual Investor
Financial Advisor
Institutional Investor









Products





Products
Mutual Funds
Closed-End Funds
Separately Managed Accounts
Exchange-Traded Funds
Commodity Exchange-Traded Products
Unit Trusts
Products for Non-U.S. Investors
Other
Alternatives
Multi-Asset Solutions




Performance
Mutual Funds
Separately Managed Accounts
Pricing
Mutual Funds
Closed-End Funds
Unit Trusts







Insights





Market Commentary
Weekly Investment Commentary
Weekly Fixed Income Update
Product Commentary
Video Library
Conference Calls & Webinars




Investment Ideas
Adapt to Municipal Market Changes
Manage Key Income Risks
Reinvent Retirement Income Investing







Literature





Literature Center
Mutual Funds

									Forms & Applications
Prospectuses
									& Reports

									Fact Sheets & Commentary
Closed-End Funds
Fact
									Sheets & Reports










Resources





Client Resources

									Mutual Funds
Closed-End Funds

									Tax Information
Mutual Funds Education
Overview
Advisor Resources
Wealth Management Services

									Account Access
Tools and Calculators
Bond Investing Ladder Tool




Alternatives Education
Alternatives Education Center
Closed-End Funds Education
Closed-End Fund Strategies
Understanding Closed-End Funds
Multi-Asset Resources
Explore Multi-Asset Investing







Retirement





Retirement Solutions
About Us
Investment Solutions




Practice Management
Resources
401(k)ollege
Plan Profit (k)alculator
Contact Us


































Closed the Income Gap®
with Nuveen Closed-End Funds



Closed-End Funds Offer Attractive Income Potential
In the search for increased income opportunities, closed-end funds can be a smart choice. Designed and built for income, closed-end funds seek to provide regular, stable cash flow over time and can serve as a compelling tool for optimizing an income portfolio.
Consider closed-end funds if you’re seeking to:1


1


Enhance Income and Cash Flow
Because of their unique closed structure and ability to use leverage,2 closed-end funds offer potentially higher distributions3 than traditional income investments.4


2


Manage Interest Rate Risk 
Floating rate, shorter duration or equity closed-end funds may help reduce a portfolio’s interest rate sensitivity.


3


Protect Purchasing Power
Closed-end funds that invest in real assets and dividend-paying stocks, which typically increase their payments with rising inflation, may help buffer the effects of rising inflation.


4


Maximize After-Tax Efficiency
Nuveen offers a wide array of national, state specific and AMT-free municipal closed-end funds that may help reduce your tax liability on investment income.5


5


Improve Diversification
With strategies that provide access to specialized asset classes, including alternatives, Nuveen closed-end funds may enhance portfolio diversification.





Additional Resources



How Do CEFs Compare? 


Additional Advisor Resources










What is a Closed-End Fund?
Anne KritzmireClosed-End Fund & Structured Products










Consider Nuveen closed-end funds if you’re seeking1



Fund Name
Ticker
Leveraged?
Primary Investment Focus 
Enhance Income
Manage Interest Rate Risk
Protect Purchasing Power
Maximize After-Tax Efficiency
Improve Diversification 




Tax-Exempt Municipal Debt


Nuveen Quality Municipal Income Fund
NAD
•
Investment Grade Municipal Bonds
•


•



Nuveen AMT-Free Municipal Credit Income Fund
NVG
•
AMT-Free, Hybrid Investment Grade/High Yield Municipal Bonds
•


•



Nuveen Municipal Value Fund, Inc.
NUV

Investment Grade Municipal Bonds
•


•



Nuveen Municipal High Income Opportunity Fund
NMZ
•
High Yield Municipal Bonds
•


•





Taxable Debt


Nuveen Credit Strategies Income Fund
JQC
•
Senior Loans
•
•
•

•


Nuveen Mortgage Opportunity Term Fund
JLS
•
Mortgage-Backed Securities
•
•


•


Nuveen Preferred Securities Income Fund
JPS
•
Preferred Securities
•






Nuveen Global High Income Fund
JGH
•
Global High Yield Securities
•
•


•




Equity


Nuveen Real Asset Income and Growth Fund
JRI
•
Real Assets
•
•
•

•


Nuveen Tax-Advantaged Total Return Strategy Fund
JTA
•
Equity-Global
•
•
•

•


Nuveen S&P 500 Buy-Write Income Fund
BXMX

Equity-Option
•
•

•
•








There is no guarantee that any of the funds will achieve their stated objectives. For detailed information on the specific risks associated with each fund, please view the fund overview by clicking on the fund name above.
1 Goal classifications represent common investor concerns when evaluating portfolio needs, are provided for informational purposes only, and are not intended to be relied upon as investment advice or recommendations.
2 Leverage typically magnifies the total return of a fund’s portfolio, whether that return is positive or negative, and creates an opportunity for increased common share net income as well as higher volatility of net asset value, market price, and distributions. There is no assurance that a fund’s leveraging strategy will be successful.
3 Potential distribution sources include net investment income, realized gains and return of capital.  
4 Different types of asset investments have different types of risks, which may provide higher returns but also greater volatility. In general, equity securities tend to be more volatile that fixed income securities. The value of, and income generated by, debt securities will decrease or increase based on changes in market interest rates. As interest rates risk, bond prices fall. In general, below investment grade (high-yield) debt securities tend to be more volatile than investment grade securities. Preferred securities are subordinated to bonds and other debt instruments in a company's capital structure, and therefore are subject to greater credit risk. The interest and principal payments of U.S. Treasury securities are guaranteed.
5 Income may be subject to state and local income taxes and the alternative minimum tax. Capital gains, if any, will be subject to capital gains tax.














Investment Affiliates

Nuveen Asset Management
TIAA Investments
Symphony Asset Management
NWQ
Santa Barbara Asset Management
Winslow Capital


AGR Partners
Churchill Asset Management
GreenWood Resources
Gresham Investment Management
TH Real Estate
Westchester Agriculture Asset Management





Media Center
About Nuveen
Contact Us
Careers
Non-U.S. Investors
FINRA BrokerCheck




Follow Us:









There are risks inherent in any investment, including the possible loss of principal. There can be no assurance that fund objectives will be achieved. Closed-end funds frequently trade at a discount to their net asset value.
Past performance is no guarantee of future results.
NOT FDIC INSUREDMAY LOSE VALUENO BANK GUARANTEE









See our privacy policy, terms of use and our business continuity plan summary. The content of this site, including but not limited to the text and images herein and their arrangement are Copyright by Nuveen Investments. Securities offered through Nuveen Securities, LLC, a subsidiary of Nuveen, 333 W. Wacker Drive, Chicago, IL  60606.  Nuveen provides innovative investment strategies and portfolio management services through its independent investment affiliates: Nuveen Asset Management, TIAA Investments, Symphony Asset Management, NWQ Investment Management Company, Santa Barbara Asset Management, Winslow Capital Management, AGR Partners, Churchill Asset Management, GreenWood Resources Capital Management, Gresham Investment Management, TH Real Estate, and Westchester Agriculture Asset Management. 
Investor line: 1-800-257-8787. Advisor line: 1-800-752-8700.
The material contained on this website is not intended to be a recommendation or investment advice, does not constitute a solicitation to buy or sell securities, and is not provided in a fiduciary capacity. The information provided does not take into account the specific objectives or circumstances of any particular investor, or suggest any specific course of action. Investment decisions should be made based on an investor’s objectives and circumstances and in consultation with his or her advisors.
The information on this web site is intended for U.S. residents only.  If you are a non-U.S. resident, please visit www.nuveenglobal.com. The information provided does not constitute a solicitation of an offer to buy, or an offer to sell securities in any jurisdiction to any person to whom it is not lawful to make such an offer.
21247-INV-Y-03/17



















Login
Register
Client Accounts
Your Contacts







Not registered?
Register for access to investment team commentary, detailed portfolio information, and other advisor resources.  For instant access, register now.








Your Contacts
Our goal is to deliver lasting value to our clients. For assistance, please call or email our advisor service team or contact your personal Nuveen Service Team.
Log in to nuveen.com to access your personal Nuveen Service Team.



Financial Advisors
800-752-8700Email


Registered Investment Advisors
800-558-4487





Account Access
For more information on Mutual Fund Vision, FAN Mail, or accessing client accounts, please visit our advisor account access page.


Advisor Access

Vision
FAN Mail



Investor Access

Mutual Funds
Closed-End Funds




















	CEF Types & Strategies | Nuveen














































Nuveen









Individual Investor
Financial Advisor
Institutional Investor









Products





Products
Mutual Funds
Closed-End Funds
Separately Managed Accounts
Exchange-Traded Funds
Commodity Exchange-Traded Products
Unit Trusts
Products for Non-U.S. Investors
Other
Alternatives
Multi-Asset Solutions




Performance
Mutual Funds
Separately Managed Accounts
Pricing
Mutual Funds
Closed-End Funds
Unit Trusts







Insights





Market Commentary
Weekly Investment Commentary
Weekly Fixed Income Update
Product Commentary
Video Library
Conference Calls & Webinars




Investment Ideas
Adapt to Municipal Market Changes
Manage Key Income Risks
Reinvent Retirement Income Investing







Literature





Literature Center
Mutual Funds

									Forms & Applications
Prospectuses
									& Reports

									Fact Sheets & Commentary
Closed-End Funds
Fact
									Sheets & Reports










Resources





Client Resources

									Mutual Funds
Closed-End Funds

									Tax Information
Mutual Funds Education
Overview
Advisor Resources
Wealth Management Services

									Account Access
Tools and Calculators
Bond Investing Ladder Tool




Alternatives Education
Alternatives Education Center
Closed-End Funds Education
Closed-End Fund Strategies
Understanding Closed-End Funds
Multi-Asset Resources
Explore Multi-Asset Investing







Retirement





Retirement Solutions
About Us
Investment Solutions




Practice Management
Resources
401(k)ollege
Plan Profit (k)alculator
Contact Us













Strategies


MF
CEF
SMA
ETF
COM
UIT



CEF




Overview
Taxable Income
Tax-Exempt Income
Multi-Strategy
Equity









CEF Types & Strategies

Find out more about the types of closed-end funds we offer and their investment
			strategies using the chart below.





Multi-Strategy



				 

Global Debt

Equity Option



Preferred Securities

MBS

Global Equity



Floating Rate

MLPs

Domestic Equity



Municipal Debt

REITs

				 





Chart Definitions
Income-oriented closed-end funds make payouts largely from interest	and dividends.
Income and capital appreciation funds seek regular cash	flow made up of interest and dividends, with the remainder from capital appreciation or, if necessary, return of capital.
Capital appreciation and income closed-end funds seek cash flow mainly from capital appreciation.
Single-asset-class funds invest primarily in one asset class, which can be used as components in a well-diversified income portfolio.
Pre-packaged combinations are funds featuring multiple asset types, which are designed to work together to diversify fund cash flow risks.






















Investment Affiliates

Nuveen Asset Management
TIAA Investments
Symphony Asset Management
NWQ
Santa Barbara Asset Management
Winslow Capital


AGR Partners
Churchill Asset Management
GreenWood Resources
Gresham Investment Management
TH Real Estate
Westchester Agriculture Asset Management





Media Center
About Nuveen
Contact Us
Careers
Non-U.S. Investors
FINRA BrokerCheck




Follow Us:









There are risks inherent in any investment, including the possible loss of principal. There can be no assurance that fund objectives will be achieved. Closed-end funds frequently trade at a discount to their net asset value.
Past performance is no guarantee of future results.
NOT FDIC INSUREDMAY LOSE VALUENO BANK GUARANTEE







See our privacy policy, terms of use and our business continuity plan summary. The content of this site, including but not limited to the text and images herein and their arrangement are Copyright by Nuveen Investments. Securities offered through Nuveen Securities, LLC, a subsidiary of Nuveen, 333 W. Wacker Drive, Chicago, IL  60606.  Nuveen provides innovative investment strategies and portfolio management services through its independent investment affiliates: Nuveen Asset Management, TIAA Investments, Symphony Asset Management, NWQ Investment Management Company, Santa Barbara Asset Management, Winslow Capital Management, AGR Partners, Churchill Asset Management, GreenWood Resources Capital Management, Gresham Investment Management, TH Real Estate, and Westchester Agriculture Asset Management. 
Investor line: 1-800-257-8787. Advisor line: 1-800-752-8700.
The material contained on this website is not intended to be a recommendation or investment advice, does not constitute a solicitation to buy or sell securities, and is not provided in a fiduciary capacity. The information provided does not take into account the specific objectives or circumstances of any particular investor, or suggest any specific course of action. Investment decisions should be made based on an investor’s objectives and circumstances and in consultation with his or her advisors.
The information on this web site is intended for U.S. residents only.  If you are a non-U.S. resident, please visit www.nuveenglobal.com. The information provided does not constitute a solicitation of an offer to buy, or an offer to sell securities in any jurisdiction to any person to whom it is not lawful to make such an offer.




















Login
Register
Client Accounts
Your Contacts







Not registered?
Register for access to investment team commentary, detailed portfolio information, and other advisor resources.  For instant access, register now.








Your Contacts
Our goal is to deliver lasting value to our clients. For assistance, please call or email our advisor service team or contact your personal Nuveen Service Team.
Log in to nuveen.com to access your personal Nuveen Service Team.



Financial Advisors
800-752-8700Email


Registered Investment Advisors
800-558-4487





Account Access
For more information on Mutual Fund Vision, FAN Mail, or accessing client accounts, please visit our advisor account access page.


Advisor Access

Vision
FAN Mail



Investor Access

Mutual Funds
Closed-End Funds





















	Income Investing | CEF | Nuveen



















































Nuveen









Individual Investor
Financial Advisor
Institutional Investor









Products





Products
Mutual Funds
Closed-End Funds
Separately Managed Accounts
Exchange-Traded Funds
Commodity Exchange-Traded Products
Unit Trusts
Products for Non-U.S. Investors
Other
Alternatives
Multi-Asset Solutions




Performance
Mutual Funds
Separately Managed Accounts
Pricing
Mutual Funds
Closed-End Funds
Unit Trusts







Insights





Market Commentary
Weekly Investment Commentary
Weekly Fixed Income Update
Product Commentary
Video Library
Conference Calls & Webinars




Investment Ideas
Adapt to Municipal Market Changes
Manage Key Income Risks
Reinvent Retirement Income Investing







Literature





Literature Center
Mutual Funds

									Forms & Applications
Prospectuses
									& Reports

									Fact Sheets & Commentary
Closed-End Funds
Fact
									Sheets & Reports










Resources





Client Resources

									Mutual Funds
Closed-End Funds

									Tax Information
Mutual Funds Education
Overview
Advisor Resources
Wealth Management Services

									Account Access
Tools and Calculators
Bond Investing Ladder Tool




Alternatives Education
Alternatives Education Center
Closed-End Funds Education
Closed-End Fund Strategies
Understanding Closed-End Funds
Multi-Asset Resources
Explore Multi-Asset Investing







Retirement





Retirement Solutions
About Us
Investment Solutions




Practice Management
Resources
401(k)ollege
Plan Profit (k)alculator
Contact Us


































Closed the Income Gap®
with Nuveen Closed-End Funds



Closed-End Funds Offer Attractive Income Potential
In the search for increased income opportunities, closed-end funds can be a smart choice. Designed and built for income, closed-end funds seek to provide regular, stable cash flow over time and can serve as a compelling tool for optimizing an income portfolio.
Consider closed-end funds if you’re seeking to:1


1


Enhance Income and Cash Flow
Because of their unique closed structure and ability to use leverage,2 closed-end funds offer potentially higher distributions3 than traditional income investments.4


2


Manage Interest Rate Risk 
Floating rate, shorter duration or equity closed-end funds may help reduce a portfolio’s interest rate sensitivity.


3


Protect Purchasing Power
Closed-end funds that invest in real assets and dividend-paying stocks, which typically increase their payments with rising inflation, may help buffer the effects of rising inflation.


4


Maximize After-Tax Efficiency
Nuveen offers a wide array of national, state specific and AMT-free municipal closed-end funds that may help reduce your tax liability on investment income.5


5


Improve Diversification
With strategies that provide access to specialized asset classes, including alternatives, Nuveen closed-end funds may enhance portfolio diversification.





Additional Resources



How Do CEFs Compare? 


Additional Advisor Resources










What is a Closed-End Fund?
Anne KritzmireClosed-End Fund & Structured Products










Consider Nuveen closed-end funds if you’re seeking1



Fund Name
Ticker
Leveraged?
Primary Investment Focus 
Enhance Income
Manage Interest Rate Risk
Protect Purchasing Power
Maximize After-Tax Efficiency
Improve Diversification 




Tax-Exempt Municipal Debt


Nuveen Quality Municipal Income Fund
NAD
•
Investment Grade Municipal Bonds
•


•



Nuveen AMT-Free Municipal Credit Income Fund
NVG
•
AMT-Free, Hybrid Investment Grade/High Yield Municipal Bonds
•


•



Nuveen Municipal Value Fund, Inc.
NUV

Investment Grade Municipal Bonds
•


•



Nuveen Municipal High Income Opportunity Fund
NMZ
•
High Yield Municipal Bonds
•


•





Taxable Debt


Nuveen Credit Strategies Income Fund
JQC
•
Senior Loans
•
•
•

•


Nuveen Mortgage Opportunity Term Fund
JLS
•
Mortgage-Backed Securities
•
•


•


Nuveen Preferred Securities Income Fund
JPS
•
Preferred Securities
•






Nuveen Global High Income Fund
JGH
•
Global High Yield Securities
•
•


•




Equity


Nuveen Real Asset Income and Growth Fund
JRI
•
Real Assets
•
•
•

•


Nuveen Tax-Advantaged Total Return Strategy Fund
JTA
•
Equity-Global
•
•
•

•


Nuveen S&P 500 Buy-Write Income Fund
BXMX

Equity-Option
•
•

•
•








There is no guarantee that any of the funds will achieve their stated objectives. For detailed information on the specific risks associated with each fund, please view the fund overview by clicking on the fund name above.
1 Goal classifications represent common investor concerns when evaluating portfolio needs, are provided for informational purposes only, and are not intended to be relied upon as investment advice or recommendations.
2 Leverage typically magnifies the total return of a fund’s portfolio, whether that return is positive or negative, and creates an opportunity for increased common share net income as well as higher volatility of net asset value, market price, and distributions. There is no assurance that a fund’s leveraging strategy will be successful.
3 Potential distribution sources include net investment income, realized gains and return of capital.  
4 Different types of asset investments have different types of risks, which may provide higher returns but also greater volatility. In general, equity securities tend to be more volatile that fixed income securities. The value of, and income generated by, debt securities will decrease or increase based on changes in market interest rates. As interest rates risk, bond prices fall. In general, below investment grade (high-yield) debt securities tend to be more volatile than investment grade securities. Preferred securities are subordinated to bonds and other debt instruments in a company's capital structure, and therefore are subject to greater credit risk. The interest and principal payments of U.S. Treasury securities are guaranteed.
5 Income may be subject to state and local income taxes and the alternative minimum tax. Capital gains, if any, will be subject to capital gains tax.














Investment Affiliates

Nuveen Asset Management
TIAA Investments
Symphony Asset Management
NWQ
Santa Barbara Asset Management
Winslow Capital


AGR Partners
Churchill Asset Management
GreenWood Resources
Gresham Investment Management
TH Real Estate
Westchester Agriculture Asset Management





Media Center
About Nuveen
Contact Us
Careers
Non-U.S. Investors
FINRA BrokerCheck




Follow Us:









There are risks inherent in any investment, including the possible loss of principal. There can be no assurance that fund objectives will be achieved. Closed-end funds frequently trade at a discount to their net asset value.
Past performance is no guarantee of future results.
NOT FDIC INSUREDMAY LOSE VALUENO BANK GUARANTEE









See our privacy policy, terms of use and our business continuity plan summary. The content of this site, including but not limited to the text and images herein and their arrangement are Copyright by Nuveen Investments. Securities offered through Nuveen Securities, LLC, a subsidiary of Nuveen, 333 W. Wacker Drive, Chicago, IL  60606.  Nuveen provides innovative investment strategies and portfolio management services through its independent investment affiliates: Nuveen Asset Management, TIAA Investments, Symphony Asset Management, NWQ Investment Management Company, Santa Barbara Asset Management, Winslow Capital Management, AGR Partners, Churchill Asset Management, GreenWood Resources Capital Management, Gresham Investment Management, TH Real Estate, and Westchester Agriculture Asset Management. 
Investor line: 1-800-257-8787. Advisor line: 1-800-752-8700.
The material contained on this website is not intended to be a recommendation or investment advice, does not constitute a solicitation to buy or sell securities, and is not provided in a fiduciary capacity. The information provided does not take into account the specific objectives or circumstances of any particular investor, or suggest any specific course of action. Investment decisions should be made based on an investor’s objectives and circumstances and in consultation with his or her advisors.
The information on this web site is intended for U.S. residents only.  If you are a non-U.S. resident, please visit www.nuveenglobal.com. The information provided does not constitute a solicitation of an offer to buy, or an offer to sell securities in any jurisdiction to any person to whom it is not lawful to make such an offer.
21247-INV-Y-03/17



















Login
Register
Client Accounts
Your Contacts







Not registered?
Register for access to investment team commentary, detailed portfolio information, and other advisor resources.  For instant access, register now.








Your Contacts
Our goal is to deliver lasting value to our clients. For assistance, please call or email our advisor service team or contact your personal Nuveen Service Team.
Log in to nuveen.com to access your personal Nuveen Service Team.



Financial Advisors
800-752-8700Email


Registered Investment Advisors
800-558-4487





Account Access
For more information on Mutual Fund Vision, FAN Mail, or accessing client accounts, please visit our advisor account access page.


Advisor Access

Vision
FAN Mail



Investor Access

Mutual Funds
Closed-End Funds





















Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft













American Private Money Group Trust Deed Investments Trust Deed Opportunities High Yield Trust Deeds







































	Search Engine Marketing (SEM) - Bing Ads







































































































Skip to content











Sign upSign in


 


















You run your business. We'll help find your customers.
Bing Ads can help build your business and drive your success. Spend $25 and get $100 in advertising credit.†

†Offer details




Get $100 in search advertising when you spend $25 in Bing Ads.







Coupon code class

First name:

Last name:

Email:

Your website URL

Business phone



*Required
Microsoft may contact you to provide updates and special offers about Bing Ads. You can unsubscribe at any time. To learn more you can read the privacy statement.
Type the code from the image:

Enter security code:







             























×
Get $100 in search advertising when you spend $25 in Bing Ads.


†Offer Details: Offer expires December 31, 2017.  Valid only for new Bing Ads customers who are first party recipients of the offer email. A new Bing Ads customer is one that has not advertised on Bing Ads before. Enter promotional coupon code and spend $25 (applies to threshold and prepaid accounts) to receive $100 in Bing Ads credits. Limit one promotion code per new Bing Ads customer. Promotional code must be redeemed within thirty (30) days of Bing Ads new customer account creation. Ad campaign costs accrued before receiving a credit, as well as costs accrued after all credits are used, will be charged to the payment method associated with the Bing Ads account. If customer payment fails, the coupon amount will not be applied.  Ads will continue to run and accrue costs after any promotional credit has been used up. Any portion of the credit not used within ninety (90) days of credit redemption will expire and can't be carried over even if the Bing Ads Customer switches their payment method. Offer valid only to residents of the United States. In order for the offer to be valid, a form of payment must be entered into your account prior to redemption of the promotional code and prior to your account going live to take advantage of the credit. This offer may not be combined with any other offer, promotional code coupon or discount, separated, redeemed for cash, transferred, sold, or bartered. Microsoft, in its sole discretion, can close your account for any suspected coupon abuse. Refund of the $25 is not permitted.  See Bing Ads Terms and Conditions for more details at sign-up. Other terms and conditions may apply.  Microsoft reserves the right to cancel, change, or suspend this offer at any time without notice.









See how Bing Ads works



Customers search


Customers see your ad


Customers contact you


Watch how Bing Ads works  
 








×
How Bing Ads works

















Help more customers find you
See how Bing can attract customers your Google AdWords campaigns can't.

Reach 137 million searchers on the Bing Network.1
Tap into 32.9% of the search marketplace.2
Get in front of searchers who spend 16 percent more than the average internet searcher.2











Powerful network. Powerful benefits.



Reach across devicesConnect with customers looking for your business anytime, anywhere, on any device.


Go global or localReach people in the Bing Network everywhere or focus on cities, counties and areas within a certain distance from your business.


Easy to importIf you're already using another product like Google Adwords, it's easy to pull that campaign into Bing Ads.








You control your costs

 Free sign-upJoin Bing Ads for free and control your account at every step.


 Only pay for clicksPay just when customers click on your ad. No click, no charge.


 No minimum feeStart advertising with a budget that works best for your business.









 



The advantage we gain in cost per click gives us a great return on investment — more than 35 percent better than Google AdWords.
Scott Redgate, search engine marketing manager — CJ Pony Parts
By using Bing Ads features like Image Extensions and Sitelink Extensions, this auto parts retailer races to convert customers and beat its competition.

 Read about driving more conversions







 



We might not get as much of the volume as with Google AdWords, but the volume of the traffic that we get converts really well at a lower cost.
Scott Schult, Executive Vice President of Marketing — Myrtle Beach Area Convention and Visitors Bureau
The Myrtle Beach Area Convention and Visitors Bureau uses Bing Ads to drive site traffic and tourism at lower cost.

 Read about getting better ROI








Better results for less cost. That's as simple as I can make it. If I look at the quality of the traffic we get for the dollars we spend on Bing Ads, our ROI is fantastic.
Alex Littlewood, CEO   Motoroso
Motoroso, a market network for auto enthusiasts, gets better results for less cost and reaches a high-value audience with Bing Ads.

 Read about attracting quality traffic



 









Import your AdWords campaigns

Save time by importing your Google AdWords campaigns into Bing Ads to get ads live quickly.


Sign in with your Microsoft account (or create one) to get started on Bing Ads.


From within the Bing Ads interface, select the Import from Google AdWords option.


Enter your Google AdWords credentials and select the campaign you want to import.










Preview your ad

Get found online with search engine marketing. Make the most of your marketing dollars and drive customers to your business.
See how Bing Ads can work for you




















Get started today
Give us a few details about your business to create a Bing Ads account and get it up and running.


  
Sign up
Get started with Bing Ads 
Signing up is always free.













FAQ


Is Bing Ads right for me?

Is Bing Ads right for my business?
All types of businesses find value and success with Bing Ads. Whether you're focused on local calls and foot traffic, or want to drive traffic to your website from across the country or around the world. Bing Ads has solutions for you.
I already appear in search results for free. Why should I pay for advertising?
Your current customers may search for your business by name, aiming it easy to find you in search results. But customers you've yet to reach are more likely searching for general terms that wouldn't necessarily bring up your business in search results. Advertising next to relevant Bing search results puts your business front and center with interested customers you otherwise might not reach.
What is the difference between SEO and SEM? Which one is right for me?
Search engine optimization (SEO) is adjusting your website to improve your natural ranking in search results. You cannot pay to improve your website ranking on Bing or Yahoo, thus we often refer to these results and unpaid or "organic" search results.

	Clicks from SEO are free. But SEO also requires technical expertise and involves some factors over which you have only limited control.

	Search engine marketing (SEM) is paid advertising that appears next to or above unpaid (or "organic") search results. These paid ads are purchased through Bing Ads.

	You pay for SEM clicks. But SEM gives you more control over when your website appears on results pages and you decide how much you want to pay. And you can measure which ads are working and quickly improve your results.

	You don't have to choose between SEO and SEM. You can do both!
If my time is limited, should I still try Bing ads?
Yes! Call a Bing Ads specialist at 877-635-3561*and we’ll set up your first campaign for you for free. We’ll give you tips on getting the most out of your ads and set you up for success. We’re here to help.




About Bing Ads

Where does my ad appear?
Your ads could appear on the top or to the right of Bing, Yahoo, and MSN search results. And you can choose to target your ads to different geographic regions, times or days of the week, and even demographics.
What determines my ad position?
Bing Ads is a pay-per-click (PPC) advertising system. You bid based on how much you are willing to pay per each click on your ad. Because webpages have a limited number of places to show ads, we auction those spaces. You are bidding against other advertisers to get your ads into the space you want. So if you bid on the keyword "shoe", you will have to beat the bids of the other advertisers who are also bidding on "shoe." You determine how much you are willing to bid.
	Your ad position is based on several things, including:
	
How closely your ad and website fit with the terms that are searched (relevance).
How your bid compares to other bids in the Bing Ads auction.
How strongly your ad has performed in the past and how often it has been clicked (click-through rate).

	The stronger you are in these areas, the better your chances of winning the top ad position.




How to use Bing Ads

How can I use Bing Ads to drive more people to my website?
Here are some tips to get better results:
	
Review your budget and bid strategy. If your ad keeps pausing, your budget limit may be set too low. Competitive bids help your ad stay in a strong position to catch eyes and get more clicks to your website.
Expand your targeting, both for location and for devices (computer, mobile and tablet).
Make sure your ads and website are relevant to the keywords you bid on. Would someone searching your terms expect to see and ad for your business?


How can I keep my costs down?
While your first instinct may be to lower your budget, first try lowering your maximum bids. Yes, this could mean fewer customers visit your site. But if you increase your quality score and build ads with a strong performance history, you may be able to win a good ad position with a lower bid. That would lower your cost=per-click and help stretch your budget.
How do I know if Bing Ads is working?
View a wide range of performance trends in your account to quickly see key stats: ad clicks, the number of times your ad appeared (impressions), spend, average cost-per-click, click-through rate, average ad position, cost per acquisition, and conversions. You can also run performance reports to get insights into how well your campaigns are doing.
Can I run more than one ad?
Yes! In fact, we encourage it. Only one ad will show at a time but running multiple ads lets you test different approaches to see what's working best with your target customers. Frequently, businesses try out different ads for specific products or pages.




Getting started with Bing Ads

How do I get started?
Sign up for Bing Ads
Which keywords should I choose?
You have a few options to help choose your keywords. First you'll want to think of the terms one of your customers might use to search for your products and offerings. Those search terms are a great starting point. Then you can use tools right in your account to find more keywords. Within Bing Ads, click Campaigns on the top of the page. Click the Keywords tab, and then click Add Keywords. This will let you:
	
Search for new keywords based on one you enter.
Search a website for keywords.
Search your destination URLs for keywords.


How can I write a good ad?
Here are a few tips that can help make your ad stand out.
	
Keep your ads relevant. One way to improve relevance is to use your customer's most popular search terms in your ad titles and txt.
Describe what sets your product apart.
Use your customers' language. Use words and writing tone that are likely to attract your typical customer.
Be specific. This clearer and more specific your offering, the better. For example, rather than "big discount," specify and exact percentage, such as "50 percent off."
Give customers a reason to click your ad right now. Offer a specific call to action, such as encouraging customers to request a brochure or consultation, download a free e-book, subscribe to a newsletter, or take advantage of a limited-time discount.























Sign up with Bing Ads to get started





































